


Exchange-traded fund - Wikipedia





















 






Exchange-traded fund

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

An exchange-traded fund (ETF) is an investment fund traded on stock exchanges, much like stocks.[1][2] An ETF holds assets such as stocks, commodities, or bonds and generally operates with an arbitrage mechanism designed to keep it trading close to its net asset value,[3] although deviations can occasionally occur. Most ETFs track an index, such as a stock index or bond index. ETFs may be attractive as investments because of their low costs, tax efficiency, and stock-like features.[4][5] By 2013, ETFs had become the most popular type of exchange-traded product.[citation needed]
ETF distributors only buy or sell ETFs directly from or to authorized participants, which are large broker-dealers with whom they have entered into agreements—and then, only in creation units, which are large blocks of tens of thousands of ETF shares, usually exchanged in-kind with baskets of the underlying securities. Authorized participants may wish to invest in the ETF shares for the long-term, but they usually act as market makers on the open market, using their ability to exchange creation units with their underlying securities to provide liquidity of the ETF shares and help ensure that their intraday market price approximates the net asset value of the underlying assets.[3] Other investors, such as individuals using a retail broker, trade ETF shares on this secondary market.
An ETF combines the valuation feature of a mutual fund or unit investment trust, which can be bought or sold at the end of each trading day for its net asset value, with the tradability feature of a closed-end fund, which trades throughout the trading day at prices that may be more or less than its net asset value. Closed-end funds are not considered to be ETFs, even though they are funds and are traded on an exchange. ETFs have been available in the US since 1993 and in Europe since 1999. ETFs traditionally have been index funds, but in 2008 the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission began to authorize the creation of actively managed ETFs.[3]
ETFs offer both tax efficiency and lower transaction costs. More than US$2 trillion were invested in ETFs in the United States between when they were introduced in 1993 and 2015. By the end of 2015, ETFs offered "1,800 different products, covering almost every conceivable market sector, niche and trading strategy".[6]



Contents


1 Structure

1.1 United States


2 History
3 Investment uses
4 Types

4.1 Index ETFs
4.2 Stock ETFs
4.3 Bond ETFs
4.4 Commodity ETFs
4.5 Currency ETFs
4.6 Actively managed ETFs
4.7 Exchange-traded grantor trusts
4.8 Inverse ETFs
4.9 Leveraged ETFs


5 ETFs compared to mutual funds

5.1 Costs
5.2 Taxation
5.3 Trading


6 Regulation
7 Risks

7.1 Tracking error
7.2 Effects on stability
7.3 Regulatory risk
7.4 Counterparty risk


8 Liquidity
9 Criticism
10 Issuers of ETFs
11 See also
12 References
13 Further reading
14 External links



Structure[edit]
An ETF is a type of fund. It owns assets (bonds, stocks, gold bars, etc.) and divides ownership of itself into shares that are held by shareholders. The details of the structure (such as a corporation or trust) will vary by country, and even within one country there may be multiple possible structures.[7] The shareholders indirectly own the assets of the fund, and they will typically get an annual report. Shareholders are entitled to a share of the profits, such as interest or dividends, and they may get a residual value in case the fund is liquidated. Their ownership interest in the fund can easily be bought and sold.
ETFs are similar in many ways to traditional mutual funds, except that shares in an ETF can be bought and sold throughout the day like stocks on a stock exchange through a broker-dealer. Unlike traditional mutual funds, ETFs do not sell or redeem their individual shares at net asset value (NAV). Instead, financial institutions purchase and redeem ETF shares directly from the ETF, but only in large blocks (such as 50,000 shares), called creation units. Purchases and redemptions of the creation units generally are in kind, with the institutional investor contributing or receiving a basket of securities of the same type and proportion held by the ETF, although some ETFs may require or permit a purchasing or redeeming shareholder to substitute cash for some or all of the securities in the basket of assets.[3]
The ability to purchase and redeem creation units gives ETFs an arbitrage mechanism intended to minimize the potential deviation between the market price and the net asset value of ETF shares. Existing ETFs have transparent portfolios, so institutional investors will know exactly what portfolio assets they must assemble if they wish to purchase a creation unit, and the exchange disseminates the updated net asset value of the shares throughout the trading day, typically at 15-second intervals.[3]
If there is strong investor demand for an ETF, its share price will temporarily rise above its net asset value per share, giving arbitrageurs an incentive to purchase additional creation units from the ETF and sell the component ETF shares in the open market. The additional supply of ETF shares reduces the market price per share, generally eliminating the premium over net asset value. A similar process applies when there is weak demand for an ETF: its shares trade at a discount from net asset value.
United States[edit]
In the United States, most ETFs are structured as open-end management investment companies (the same structure used by mutual funds and money market funds), although a few ETFs, including some of the largest ones, are structured as unit investment trusts. ETFs structured as open-end funds have greater flexibility in constructing a portfolio and are not prohibited from participating in securities lending programs or from using futures and options in achieving their investment objectives.[8]
Under existing regulations, a new ETF must receive an order from the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC), giving it relief from provisions of the Investment Company Act of 1940 that would not otherwise allow the ETF structure. In 2008, the SEC proposed rules that would allow the creation of ETFs without the need for exemptive orders. Under the SEC proposal, an ETF would be defined as a registered open-end management investment company that:

issues (or redeems) creation units in exchange for the deposit (or delivery) of basket assets the current value of which is disseminated per share by a national securities exchange at regular intervals during the trading day
identifies itself as an ETF in any sales literature
issues shares that are approved for listing and trading on a securities exchange
discloses each business day on its publicly available web site the prior business day's net asset value and closing market price of the fund's shares, and the premium or discount of the closing market price against the net asset value of the fund's shares as a percentage of net asset value
either is an index fund, or discloses each business day on its publicly available web site the identities and weighting of the component securities and other assets held by the fund[3]

The SEC rule proposal would allow ETFs either to be index funds or to be fully transparent actively managed funds. Historically, all ETFs in the United States had been index funds.[citation needed] In 2008, however, the SEC began issuing exemptive orders to fully transparent actively managed ETFs. The first such order was to PowerShares Actively Managed Exchange-Traded Fund Trust,[9] and the first actively managed ETF in the United States was the Bear Stearns Current Yield Fund, a short-term income fund that began trading on the American Stock Exchange under the symbol YYY on March 25, 2008.[10] The SEC rule proposal indicates that the SEC may still consider future applications for exemptive orders for actively managed ETFs that do not satisfy the proposed rule's transparency requirements.[3]
Some ETFs invest primarily in commodities or commodity-based instruments, such as crude oil and precious metals. Although these commodity ETFs are similar in practice to ETFs that invest in securities, they are not investment companies under the Investment Company Act of 1940.[3]
Publicly traded grantor trusts, such as Merrill Lynch's HOLDRs securities, are sometimes considered to be ETFs, although they lack many of the characteristics of other ETFs. Investors in a grantor trust have a direct interest in the underlying basket of securities, which does not change except to reflect corporate actions such as stock splits and mergers. Funds of this type are not investment companies under the Investment Company Act of 1940.[11]
As of 2009, there were approximately 1,500 exchange-traded funds traded on US exchanges.[12] This count uses the wider definition of ETF, including HOLDRs and closed-end funds.
History[edit]
ETFs had their genesis in 1989 with Index Participation Shares, an S&P 500 proxy that traded on the American Stock Exchange and the Philadelphia Stock Exchange. This product, however, was short-lived after a lawsuit by the Chicago Mercantile Exchange was successful in stopping sales in the United States.[13]
A similar product, Toronto Index Participation Shares, started trading on the Toronto Stock Exchange (TSE) in 1990. The shares, which tracked the TSE 35 and later the TSE 100 indices, proved to be popular. The popularity of these products led the American Stock Exchange to try to develop something that would satisfy SEC regulation in the United States.[13]
Nathan Most and Steven Bloom, under the direction of Ivers Riley, designed and developed Standard & Poor's Depositary Receipts (NYSE Arca: SPY), which were introduced in January 1993.[14][15] Known as SPDRs or "Spiders", the fund became the largest ETF in the world. In May 1995 they introduced the MidCap SPDRs (NYSE Arca: MDY).
Barclays Global Investors, a subsidiary of Barclays PLC, in conjunction with MSCI and as its underwriter, a Boston-based third party distributor, Funds Distributor Inc., entered the market in 1996 with World Equity Benchmark Shares (WEBS), which became iShares MSCI Index Fund Shares. WEBS tracked MSCI country indices, originally 17, of the funds' index provider, Morgan Stanley. WEBS were particularly innovative because they gave casual investors easy access to foreign markets. While SPDRs were organized as unit investment trusts, WEBS were set up as a mutual fund, the first of their kind.[16][17]
In 1998, State Street Global Advisors introduced "Sector Spiders", which follow nine sectors of the S&P 500.[18] Also in 1998, the "Dow Diamonds" (NYSE Arca: DIA) were introduced, tracking the famous Dow Jones Industrial Average. In 1999, the influential "cubes" (NASDAQ: QQQ), were launched attempting to replicate the movement of the NASDAQ-100.
In 2000, Barclays Global Investors put a significant effort behind the ETF marketplace, with a strong emphasis on education and distribution to reach long-term investors. The iShares line was launched in early 2000. Within five years iShares had surpassed the assets of any other ETF competitor in the U.S. and Europe. Barclays Global Investors was sold to BlackRock in 2009.
The Vanguard Group entered the market in 2001. The first fund was Vanguard Total Stock Market ETF (NYSE Arca: VTI), which has become quite popular, and they made the Vanguard Extended Market Index ETF (VXF). Some of Vanguard's ETFs are a share class of an existing mutual fund.
iShares made the first bond funds in July 2002, based on US Treasury bonds and corporate bonds, such as iShares iBoxx $ Invst Grade Crp Bond (LQD). They also created a TIPS fund. In 2007, they introduced funds based on junk and muni bonds; about the same time SPDR and Vanguard got in gear and created several of their bond funds.
Since then ETFs have proliferated, tailored to an increasingly specific array of regions, sectors, commodities, bonds, futures, and other asset classes. As of January 2014, there were over 1,500 ETFs traded in the U.S., with over $1.7 trillion in assets.[19] In December 2014, U.S. ETF assets went above $2 trillion.[20]
Investment uses[edit]
ETFs generally provide the easy diversification, low expense ratios, and tax efficiency of index funds, while still maintaining all the features of ordinary stock, such as limit orders, short selling, and options. Because ETFs can be economically acquired, held, and disposed of, some investors invest in ETF shares as a long-term investment for asset allocation purposes, while other investors trade ETF shares frequently to implement market timing investment strategies.[8] Among the advantages of ETFs are the following:[11][21]

Lower costs: ETFs generally have lower costs than other investment products because most ETFs are not actively managed and because ETFs are insulated from the costs of having to buy and sell securities to accommodate shareholder purchases and redemptions. ETFs typically have lower marketing, distribution and accounting expenses, and most ETFs do not have 12b-1 fees.
Buying and selling flexibility: ETFs can be bought and sold at current market prices at any time during the trading day, unlike mutual funds and unit investment trusts, which can only be traded at the end of the trading day. As publicly traded securities, their shares can be purchased on margin and sold short, enabling the use of hedging strategies, and traded using stop orders and limit orders, which allow investors to specify the price points at which they are willing to trade.
Tax efficiency: ETFs generally generate relatively low capital gains, because they typically have low turnover of their portfolio securities. While this is an advantage they share with other index funds, their tax efficiency is further enhanced because they do not have to sell securities to meet investor redemptions.
Market exposure and diversification: ETFs provide an economical way to rebalance portfolio allocations and to "equitize" cash by investing it quickly. An index ETF inherently provides diversification across an entire index. ETFs offer exposure to a diverse variety of markets, including broad-based indices, broad-based international and country-specific indices, industry sector-specific indices, bond indices, and commodities.
Transparency: ETFs, whether index funds or actively managed, have transparent portfolios and are priced at frequent intervals throughout the trading day.

Some of these advantages derive from the status of most ETFs as index funds.
Types[edit]
For more details on this topic, see List of American exchange-traded funds.
Index ETFs[edit]
Most ETFs are index funds that attempt to replicate the performance of a specific index. Indexes may be based on stocks, bonds, commodities, or currencies. An index fund seeks to track the performance of an index by holding in its portfolio either the contents of the index or a representative sample of the securities in the index.[8] As of June 2012, in the United States, about 1200 index ETFs exist, with about 50 actively managed ETFs. Index ETF assets are about $1.2 trillion, compared with about $7 billion for actively managed ETFs.[22] Some index ETFs, known as leveraged ETFs or inverse ETFs, use investments in derivatives to seek a return that corresponds to a multiple of, or the inverse (opposite) of, the daily performance of the index.[23]
Some index ETFs invest 100% of their assets proportionately in the securities underlying an index, a manner of investing called replication. Other index ETFs use representative sampling, investing 80% to 95% of their assets in the securities of an underlying index and investing the remaining 5% to 20% of their assets in other holdings, such as futures, option and swap contracts, and securities not in the underlying index, that the fund's adviser believes will help the ETF to achieve its investment objective. There are various ways the ETF can be weighted, such as equal weighting or revenue weighting.[24] For index ETFs that invest in indices with thousands of underlying securities, some index ETFs employ "aggressive sampling" and invest in only a tiny percentage of the underlying securities.[25][26]
Stock ETFs[edit]
The first and most popular ETFs track stocks. Many funds track national indexes; for example, Vanguard Total Stock Market ETF NYSE Arca: VTI tracks the CRSP U.S. Total Market Index, and several funds track the S&P 500, both indexes for US stocks. Other funds own stocks from many countries; for example, Vanguard Total International Stock Index NYSE Arca: VXUS tracks the MSCI All Country World ex USA Investable Market Index, while the iShares MSCI EAFE Index NYSE Arca: EFA tracks the MSCI EAFE Index, both "world ex-US" indexes.
Stock ETFs can have different styles, such as large-cap, small-cap, growth, value, et cetera. For example, the S&P 500 index is large- and mid-cap, so the SPDR S&P 500 ETF will not contain small-cap stocks. Others such as iShares Russell 2000 are mainly for small-cap stocks. There are many style ETFs such as iShares Russell 1000 Growth and iShares Russell 1000 Value. ETFs focusing on dividends have been popular in the first few years of the 2010s decade, such as iShares Select Dividend.[27]
ETFs can also be sector funds. These can be broad sectors, like finance and technology, or specific niche areas, like green power. They can also be for one country or global. Critics have said that no one needs a sector fund.[28] This point is not really specific to ETFs; the issues are the same as with mutual funds. The funds are popular since people can put their money into the latest fashionable trend, rather than investing in boring areas with no "cachet".
Bond ETFs[edit]
Exchange-traded funds that invest in bonds are known as bond ETFs.[29] They thrive during economic recessions because investors pull their money out of the stock market and into bonds (for example, government treasury bonds or those issued by companies regarded as financially stable). Because of this cause and effect relationship, the performance of bond ETFs may be indicative of broader economic conditions.[30] There are several advantages to bond ETFs such as the reasonable trading commissions, but this benefit can be negatively offset by fees if bought and sold through a third party.[31]
Commodity ETFs[edit]
Commodity ETFs (CETFs or ETCs) invest in commodities, such as precious metals, agricultural products, or hydrocarbons. Among the first commodity ETFs were gold exchange-traded funds, which have been offered in a number of countries. The idea of a Gold ETF was first officially conceptualised by Benchmark Asset Management Company Private Ltd in India when they filed a proposal with the SEBI in May 2002.[32] The first gold exchange-traded fund was Gold Bullion Securities launched on the ASX in 2003, and the first silver exchange-traded fund was iShares Silver Trust launched on the NYSE in 2006. As of November 2010 a commodity ETF, namely SPDR Gold Shares, was the second-largest ETF by market capitalization.[33]
However, generally commodity ETFs are index funds tracking non-security indices. Because they do not invest in securities, commodity ETFs are not regulated as investment companies under the Investment Company Act of 1940 in the United States, although their public offering is subject to SEC review and they need an SEC no-action letter under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. They may, however, be subject to regulation by the Commodity Futures Trading Commission.[34][35]
The earliest commodity ETFs, such as SPDR Gold Shares (NYSE Arca: GLD) and iShares Silver Trust (NYSE Arca: SLV), owned the physical commodity (e.g., gold and silver bars). Similar to these are ETFS Physical Palladium (NYSE Arca: PALL) and ETFS Physical Platinum (NYSE Arca: PPLT). However, most ETCs implement a futures trading strategy, which may produce quite different results from owning the commodity.
Commodity ETFs trade just like shares, are simple and efficient and provide exposure to an ever-increasing range of commodities and commodity indices, including energy, metals, softs and agriculture. However, it is important for an investor to realize that there are often other factors that affect the price of a commodity ETF that might not be immediately apparent. For example, buyers of an oil ETF such as USO might think that as long as oil goes up, they will profit roughly linearly. What isn't clear to the novice investor is the method by which these funds gain exposure to their underlying commodities. In the case of many commodity funds, they simply roll so-called front-month futures contracts from month to month. This does give exposure to the commodity, but subjects the investor to risks involved in different prices along the term structure, such as a high cost to roll.[36][37]
ETC can also refer to exchange-traded notes, which are not exchange-traded funds.
Currency ETFs[edit]
In 2005, Rydex Investments launched the first currency ETF called the Euro Currency Trust (NYSE Arca: FXE) in New York. Since then Rydex has launched a series of funds tracking all major currencies under their brand CurrencyShares. In 2007 Deutsche Bank's db x-trackers launched EONIA Total Return Index ETF in Frankfurt tracking the euro, and later in 2008 the Sterling Money Market ETF (LSE: XGBP) and US Dollar Money Market ETF (LSE: XUSD) in London. In 2009, ETF Securities launched the world's largest FX platform tracking the MSFXSM Index covering 18 long or short USD ETC vs. single G10 currencies. The funds are total return products where the investor gets access to the FX spot change, local institutional interest rates and a collateral yield.
Actively managed ETFs[edit]
See also: List of American exchange-traded funds § Active ETFs
Most ETFs are index funds, but some ETFs do have active management. Actively managed ETFs have been offered in the United States only since 2008. The first active ETF was Bear Stearns Current Yield ETF (Ticker: YYY).[38] Currently, actively managed ETFs are fully transparent, publishing their current securities portfolios on their web sites daily. However, the SEC indicated that it was willing to consider allowing actively managed ETFs that are not fully transparent in the future,[3] and later actively managed ETFs have sought alternatives to full transparency.
The fully transparent nature of existing ETFs means that an actively managed ETF is at risk from arbitrage activities by market participants who might choose to front run its trades as daily reports of the ETF's holdings reveals its manager's trading strategy. The initial actively managed equity ETFs addressed this problem by trading only weekly or monthly. Actively managed debt ETFs, which are less susceptible to front-running, trade their holdings more frequently.[39]
The actively managed ETF market has largely been seen as more favorable to bond funds, because concerns about disclosing bond holdings are less pronounced, there are fewer product choices, and there is increased appetite for bond products. Pimco's Enhanced Short Duration ETF NYSE: MINT is the largest actively managed ETF, with approximately $3.93 billion in assets as of May 16, 2014.[40]
Actively managed ETFs grew faster in their first three years of existence than index ETFs did in their first three years of existence. As track records develop, many see actively managed ETFs as a significant competitive threat to actively managed mutual funds.[41] However, many academic studies have questioned the value of active management. Jack Bogle of Vanguard Group wrote an article in the Financial Analysts Journal where he estimated that higher fees as well as hidden costs (such a more trading fees and lower return from holding cash) reduce returns for investors by around 2.66 percentage points a year "a huge differential considering that long-term real returns from American equities have been 6.45%."[42] Even without considering hidden costs, high fees negatively affect long-term performance. In another Financial Analysts Journal article, Nobel laureate, Bill Sharpe "calculated that someone who saved via a low-cost fund would have a standard of living in retirement 20% higher than someone who saved in a high-cost fund".[42]
Exchange-traded grantor trusts[edit]
An exchange-traded grantor trust was used to give a direct interest in a static basket of stocks selected from a particular industry. Such products have some properties in common with ETFs—low costs, low turnover, and tax efficiency:but are generally regarded as separate from ETFs. The leading example was Holding Company Depositary Receipts, or HOLDRs, a proprietary Merrill Lynch product, but these have now disappeared from the scene.[11][43][44] SPDR Gold Shares is a grantor trust.
Inverse ETFs[edit]
Main article: Inverse exchange-traded fund
Inverse ETFs are constructed by using various derivatives for the purpose of profiting from a decline in the value of the underlying benchmark. It is a similar type of investment to holding several short positions or using a combination of advanced investment strategies to profit from falling prices. Many inverse ETFs use daily futures as their underlying benchmark.[45]
Leveraged ETFs[edit]
Leveraged exchange-traded funds (LETFs or leveraged ETFs) are a type of ETF that attempt to achieve returns that are more sensitive to market movements than non-leveraged ETFs.[46] Leveraged index ETFs are often marketed as bull or bear funds. A leveraged bull ETF fund might for example attempt to achieve daily returns that are 2x or 3x more pronounced than the Dow Jones Industrial Average or the S&P 500. A leveraged inverse (bear) ETF fund on the other hand may attempt to achieve returns that are -2x or -3x the daily index return, meaning that it will gain double or triple the loss of the market. Leveraged ETFs require the use of financial engineering techniques, including the use of equity swaps, derivatives and rebalancing, and re-indexing to achieve the desired return.[47] The most common way to construct leveraged ETFs is by trading futures contracts.
The rebalancing and re-indexing of leveraged ETFs may have considerable costs when markets are volatile.[48][49] The rebalancing problem is that the fund manager incurs trading losses because he needs to buy when the index goes up and sell when the index goes down in order to maintain a fixed leverage ratio. A 2.5% daily change in the index will for example reduce value of a -2x bear fund by about 0.18% per day, which means that about a third of the fund may be wasted in trading losses within a year (1-(1-0.18%)252=36.5%). Investors may however circumvent this problem by buying or writing futures directly, accepting a varying leverage ratio.[citation needed] A more reasonable estimate of daily market changes is 0.5%, which leads to a 2.6% yearly loss of principal in a 3x leveraged fund.
The re-indexing problem of leveraged ETFs stems from the arithmetic effect of volatility of the underlying index.[50] Take, for example, an index that begins at 100 and a 2X fund based on that index that also starts at 100. In a first trading period (for example, a day), the index rises 10% to 110. The 2X fund will then rise 20% to 120. The index then drops back to 100 (a drop of 9.09%), so that it is now even. The drop in the 2X fund will be 18.18% (2*9.09). But 18.18% of 120 is 21.82. This puts the value of the 2X fund at 98.18. Even though the index is unchanged after two trading periods, an investor in the 2X fund would have lost 1.82%. This decline in value can be even greater for inverse funds (leveraged funds with negative multipliers such as -1, -2, or -3). It always occurs when the change in value of the underlying index changes direction. And the decay in value increases with volatility of the underlying index.
The effect of leverage is also reflected in the pricing of options written on leveraged ETFs. In particular, the terminal payoff of a leveraged ETF European/American put or call depends on the realized variance (hence the path) of the underlying index. The impact of leverage ratio can also be observed from the implied volatility surfaces of leveraged ETF options.[51] For instance, the implied volatility curves of inverse leveraged ETFs (with negative multipliers such as -1, -2, or -3) are commonly observed to be increasing in strike, which is characteristically different from the implied volatility smiles or skews seen for index options or non-leveraged ETF options.
The SEC, in May 2017, granted approval of a pair of 4x leveraged ETF related to S&P 500 Futures, before rescinding the approval a few weeks later. The decision concerns two potential products: ForceShares Daily 4X US Market Futures Long Fund, which would have listed under the ticker UP, and ForceShares Daily 4X US Market Futures Short Fund, with the ticker DOWN.[52]
ETFs compared to mutual funds[edit]
Costs[edit]
ETFs have a reputation for lower costs than traditional mutual funds. This will be evident as a lower expense ratio. This is mainly from two factors, the fact that most ETFs are index funds and some advantages of the ETF structure. However, this needs to be compared in each case, since some index mutual funds also have a very low expense ratio, and some ETFs' expense ratios are relatively high. An index fund is much simpler to run, since it does not require some security selection, and can be largely done by computer. Not only does an ETF have lower shareholder-related expenses, but because it does not have to invest cash contributions or fund cash redemptions, an ETF does not have to maintain a cash reserve for redemptions and saves on brokerage expenses.[53] Mutual funds can charge 1% to 3%, or more; index fund expense ratios are generally lower, while ETFs are almost always less than 1%. Over the long term, these cost differences can compound into a noticeable difference.[54]
Because ETFs trade on an exchange, each transaction is generally subject to a brokerage commission. Commissions depend on the brokerage and which plan is chosen by the customer. For example, a typical flat fee schedule from an online brokerage firm in the United States ranges from $10 to $20, but it can be as low as $0 with discount brokers. Due to this commission cost, the amount invested has a great bearing; someone who wishes to invest $100 per month may have a significant percentage of their investment destroyed immediately, while for someone making a $200,000 investment, the commission cost may be negligible. Generally, mutual funds obtained directly from the fund company itself do not charge a brokerage fee. Thus, when low or no-cost transactions are available, ETFs become very competitive.[55]
The cost difference is more evident when compared with mutual funds that charge a front-end or back-end load as ETFs do not have loads at all. The redemption fee and short-term trading fees are examples of other fees associated with mutual funds that do not exist with ETFs. Traders should be cautious if they plan to trade inverse and leveraged ETFs for short periods of time. Close attention should be paid to transaction costs and daily performance rates as the potential combined compound loss can sometimes go unrecognized and offset potential gains over a longer period of time.[56]
Taxation[edit]
ETFs are structured for tax efficiency and can be more attractive than mutual funds. In the U.S., whenever a mutual fund realizes a capital gain that is not balanced by a realized loss, the mutual fund must distribute the capital gains to its shareholders. This can happen whenever the mutual fund sells portfolio securities, whether to reallocate its investments or to fund shareholder redemptions. These gains are taxable to all shareholders, even those who reinvest the gains distributions in more shares of the fund. In contrast, ETFs are not redeemed by holders (instead, holders simply sell their ETF shares on the stock market, as they would a stock, or effect a non-taxable redemption of a creation unit for portfolio securities), so that investors generally only realize capital gains when they sell their own shares or when the ETF trades to reflect changes in the underlying index.[8]
In most cases, ETFs are more tax-efficient than conventional mutual funds in the same asset classes or categories.[57] Because Vanguard's ETFs are a share-class of their mutual funds, they don't get all the tax advantages if there are net redemptions on the mutual fund shares.[58] Although they do not get all the tax advantages, they get an additional advantage from tax loss harvesting any capital losses from net redemptions.[59][60]
In the U.K., ETFs can be shielded from capital gains tax by placing them in an Individual Savings Account or self-invested personal pension, in the same manner as many other shares. Because UK-resident ETFs would be liable for UK corporation tax on non-UK dividends, most ETFs which hold non-UK companies sold to UK investors are issued in Ireland or Luxembourg.[61]
Trading[edit]
An important benefit of an ETF is the stock-like features offered. A mutual fund is bought or sold at the end of a day's trading, whereas ETFs can be traded whenever the market is open. Since ETFs trade on the market, investors can carry out the same types of trades that they can with a stock. For instance, investors can sell short, use a limit order, use a stop-loss order, buy on margin, and invest as much or as little money as they wish (there is no minimum investment requirement).[62] Also, many ETFs have the capability for options (puts and calls) to be written against them. Covered call strategies allow investors and traders to potentially increase their returns on their ETF purchases by collecting premiums (the proceeds of a call sale or write) on calls written against them. Mutual funds do not offer those features.[63]
Regulation[edit]
New regulations were put in place following the 2010 Flash Crash, when prices of ETFs and other stocks and options became volatile, with trading markets spiking[64]:1 and bids falling as low as a penny a share[6] in what the Commodity Futures Trading Commission (CFTC) investigation described as one of the most turbulent periods in the history of financial markets.[64]:1
These regulations proved to be inadequate to protect investors in the August 24, 2015 flash crash,[6] "when the price of many ETFs appeared to come unhinged from their underlying value". ETFs were consequently put under even greater scrutiny by regulators and investors.[6] Analysts at Morningstar claimed in December 2015 that "ETFs are a “digital-age technology” governed by “Depression-era legislation,”"[6]
Risks[edit]
Tracking error[edit]
The ETF tracking error is the difference between the returns of the ETF and its reference index or asset. A non-zero tracking error therefore represents a failure to replicate the reference as stated in the ETF prospectus. The tracking error is computed based on the prevailing price of the ETF and its reference. It is different than the premium/discount which is the difference between the ETF’s NAV (updated only once a day) and its market price. Tracking errors are more significant when the ETF provider uses strategies other than full replication of the underlying index. Some of the most liquid equity ETFs tend to have better tracking performance because the underlying is also sufficiently liquid, allowing for full replication.[65] In contrast, some ETFs, such as commodities ETFs and their leveraged ETFs, do not necessarily employ full replication because the physical assets cannot be stored easily or used to create a leveraged exposure, or the reference asset or index is illiquid.[66] Futures-based ETFs may also suffer from negative roll yields, as seen in the VIX futures market.
Effects on stability[edit]
ETFs that buy and hold commodities or futures of commodities have become popular. For example, SPDR Gold Shares ETF (GLD) has 21 million ounces in trust.[67] The silver ETF, SLV, is also very large. The commodity ETFs are in effect consumers of their target commodities, thereby affecting the price in a spurious fashion.[68][69][70] In the words of the IMF, “Some market participants believe the growing popularity of exchange-traded funds (ETFs) may have contributed to equity price appreciation in some emerging economies, and warn that leverage embedded in ETFs could pose financial stability risks if equity prices were to decline for a protracted period.”[71]
Regulatory risk[edit]
Synthetic ETFs are attracting regulatory attention from the FSB,[72] the IMF,[73] and the BIS.[74] Areas of concern include the lack of transparency in products and increasing complexity; conflicts of interest; and lack of regulatory compliance.
Counterparty risk[edit]
A synthetic ETF has counterparty risk, because the counterparty is contractually obligated to match the return on the index. The deal is arranged with collateral posted by the swap counterparty. A potential hazard is that the investment bank offering the ETF might post its own collateral, and that collateral could be of dubious quality. Furthermore, the investment bank could use its own trading desk as counterparty. These types of set-ups are not allowed under the European guidelines, Undertakings for Collective Investment in Transferable Securities (UCITS), so the investor should look for UCITS III-compliant funds.[68]
Liquidity[edit]
ETFs have a wide range of liquidity. Some funds are constantly traded, with tens of millions of shares per day changing hands, while others trade only once in a while, even not trading for some days. There are many funds that do not trade very often. This just means that most trading is conducted in the most popular funds. The most active funds (such as SPY, IWM, QQQ, et cetera) are very liquid, with high volume and tight spreads. In these cases, the investor is almost sure to get a "reasonable" price, even in difficult conditions. With other funds, it is worthwhile to take some care in execution. This does not mean that less popular funds are not a quality investment. This is in contrast with traditional mutual funds, where everyone who trades on the same day gets the same price.
Criticism[edit]
John C. Bogle, founder of the Vanguard Group, a leading issuer of index mutual funds (and, since Bogle's retirement, of ETFs), has argued that ETFs represent short-term speculation, that their trading expenses decrease returns to investors, and that most ETFs provide insufficient diversification. He concedes that a broadly diversified ETF that is held over time can be a good investment.[75]
ETFs are dependent on the efficacy of the arbitrage mechanism in order for their share price to track net asset value. While the average deviation between the daily closing price and the daily NAV of ETFs that track domestic indices is generally less than 2%, the deviations may be more significant for ETFs that track certain foreign indices.[8] The Wall Street Journal reported in November 2008, during a period of market turbulence, that some lightly traded ETFs frequently had deviations of 5% or more, exceeding 10% in a handful of cases, although even for these niche ETFs, the average deviation was only a little more than 1%. The trades with the greatest deviations tended to be made immediately after the market opened.[76]
According to a study on ETF returns in 2009 by Morgan Stanley, ETFs missed in 2009 their targets by an average of 1.25 percentage points, a gap more than twice as wide as the 0.52-percentage-point average they posted in 2008.[77] Part of this so-called tracking error is attributed to the proliferation of ETFs targeting exotic investments or areas where trading is less frequent, such as emerging-market stocks, future-contracts based commodity indices and junk bonds.[citation needed]
The tax advantages of ETFs are of no relevance for investors using tax-deferred accounts (or indeed, investors who are tax-exempt in the first place).[78] However, the lower expense ratios are proving difficult for the proponents of traditional mutual funds to overcome.
In a survey of investment professionals, the most frequently cited disadvantage of ETFs was the unknown, untested indices used by many ETFs, followed by the overwhelming number of choices.[5]
Some critics claim that ETFs can be, and have been, used to manipulate market prices, including having been used for short selling that has been asserted by some observers (including Jim Cramer of theStreet.com) to have contributed to the market collapse of 2008.
Issuers of ETFs[edit]
Main article: List of exchange-traded funds

AdvisorShares: actively managed ETFs only, majority owned by Fund.com
Banco Itau: issues itnow in Bovespa
Bips Investment Managers: issues Bips (Beta Investment Performance Securities)
BNP Paribas: issues EasyETFs
BlackRock: issues iShares
Boost ETP: issues short (inverse) and leveraged exchange-traded products including 3X equity and commodity products
Charles Schwab: offers several commission-free ETFs for its clients
Deutsche Bank: issues db x-trackers ETFs, as well as managing PowerShares DB commodity- and currency-based ETFs
ETF Securities: issues ETFs or specialised commodity ETCs
Franklin Templeton: Issues liberty line of ETFs
Global X Funds: issues ETFs
Guggenheim Funds: issues specialty Guggenheim Funds ETFs
Horizons ETFs Management (USA): issues the Covered Call ETF (HSPX)
Indo Premier Investment Management: issues Premier ETFs in Indonesia Stock Exchange
Invesco: issues PowerShares ETFs, as well as BLDRS based on American Depositary Receipts
Lyxor Asset Management: issues Lyxor ETFs
Merrill Lynch: issues HOLDRs
ProShares: U.S.-based firm offering alternative ETFs
Source UK Services: a European joint-venture between Bank of America Merrill Lynch, Goldman Sachs, Morgan Stanley, Nomura and J. P. Morgan issues ETFs and ETCs
State Street Global Advisors: issues SPDRs
Van Eck Global: issues Market Vectors ETFs
Vanguard Group: issues Vanguard ETFs, formerly known as VIPERs
WisdomTree Investments

See also[edit]

Enhanced indexing
Pension fund
Separately managed account

References[edit]


^ "Introduction to Exchange-Traded Funds", Investopedia
^ "Exchange-Traded Funds (ETFs)". U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. Retrieved November 8, 2013. 
^ a b c d e f g h i Exchange-Traded Funds, SEC Release Nos. 33-8901, IC-28193, 73 Fed. Reg. 14618 (March 11, 2008).
^ State Street Global Advisors and Knowledge@Wharton, ETFs Changing the Way Advisors Do Business, According to State Street and Wharton Study, Business Wire (June 10, 2008).
^ a b The Impact of Exchange Traded Products on the Financial Advisory Industry: A Joint Study of State Street Global Advisors and Knowledge@Wharton (2008).
^ a b c d e Weinberg, Ari I. (6 December 2015). "Should You Fear the ETF? ETFs are scaring regulators and investors: Here are the dangers—real and perceived". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 7 December 2015. 
^ SPDR ETFs: Basics of Product Structure SSGA
^ a b c d e Actively Managed Exchange-Traded Funds, SEC Release No. IC-25258, 66 Fed. Reg. 57614 (November 8, 2001).
^ PowerShares Capital Management LLC, et al.; Notice of Application, Release No. IC-28140 (February 1, 2008), 73 Fed. Reg. 7328 (February 7, 2008) (notice); PowerShares Capital Management LLC, Release No. IC-28171 (February 27, 2008) (order). The SEC issued orders to Bear Stearns Asset Management, Inc., Barclays Global Fund Advisors, and WisdomTree Trust on the same day.
^ American Stock Exchange Lists First Actively-Managed Exchange Traded Fund (March 25, 2008).
^ a b c ETFConnect, "Index ETFs – Know Your Funds" (visited April 7, 2008).
^ Peaceful Gains. "A List of exchange-traded funds". Retrieved October 23, 2009. 
^ a b Gastineau, Gary (2002). The Exchange-Traded Funds Manual. John Wiley and Sons. p. 32. ISBN 978-0-471-21894-4. 
^ Carrel, Lawrence (2008), ETFs for the Long Run, John Wiley & Sons, ISBN 978-0-470-13894-6
^ Jennifer Bayot (December 10, 2004). "Nathan Most Is Dead at 90; Investment Fund Innovator". New York Times. Retrieved April 23, 2008. 
^ Wiandt, Jim; William McClatchy (2002). Exchange Traded Funds. John Wiley and Sons. p. 82. ISBN 0-471-22513-4. 
^ Fabozzi, Frank (2003). The Handbook of Financial Instruments. John Wiley and Sons. p. 532. ISBN 0-471-22092-2. 
^ Ferri, Richard A. (2008). The ETF Book, John Wiley and Sons, 191 ISBN 0-470-13063-6.
^ "ETF League Table as of Jan. 21, 2014". IndexUniverse. 
^ U.S. ETF Assets Hit $2 Trillion Milestone - Yahoo Finance
^ American Stock Exchange, ETFs – Individual Investor (visited April 7, 2008).
^ [ETF Statistics For June 2012: Actively Managed Assets Less Than 1% http://etfdailynews.com/2012/07/10/etf-statistics-for-june-2012-actively-managed-assets-less-than-1/]
^ The Case Against Leveraged ETFs, Seeking Alpha (May 17, 2007).
^ [1], Revenue Shares (July 10, 2015).
^ "Our Take on the Bond ETF Dilemma". News.morningstar.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ Stacy L. Fuller, The Evolution of Actively Managed Exchange-Traded Funds, Review of Securities & Commodities Regulation (April 16, 2008).
^ Banner Year of Dividend Growth Sends Cash to Dividend ETFs - Yahoo Finance
^ "Do You Need a Sector Fund?". Morningstar. 
^ Bond ETF Definition
^ "Indicators for Trading in Government Bond ETFs". Tradingmarkets.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "Bond ETFs: A Viable Alternative". Investopedia.com. September 19, 2009. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "Benchmark Asset Management Company conceptualises Gold ETF". Etfglobalinvestor.net. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "Largest ETFs: Top 25 ETFs By Market Cap". ETFdb. Retrieved November 3, 2010. 
^ Michael Sackheim, Michael Schmidtberger & James Munsell, DB Commodity Index Tracking Fund: An Innovative Exchange-Traded Fund, Futures Industry (May/June 2006).
^ Koyfman, Yevgeniy (August 21, 2009). "No Gas: Barclays Halts Issuance of Natural Gas ETN". Indexuniverse.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ tom Lauricella (November 2, 2009). "Gold Mutual Funds Vs. Gold ETFs: It Depends on the Goal". Online.wsj.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "The Future of Commodity ETFs". News.morningstar.com. August 25, 2009. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ Jaffe, Chuck. "Bear Stearns Current Yield (YYY)". The Seattle Time. 
^ David Hoffman, Active ETFs are, well, less active; Dynamics of trading translate into little active management, Investment News (April 21, 2008).
^ Tran, Hung. "MINT Tops BOND As Biggest Active ETF". IndexUniverse. 
^ AlphaBaskets.com report on active vs. index ETFs, AlphaBaskets.com (April 11, 2011).
^ a b "Buttonwood: Against the odds". The Economist. 
^ "All The HOLDRS Are Now History, NYSE Says". ETF.com. 
^ Palash R. Ghosh (August 18, 2005). "HOLDRs Vs. ETFs: What Investors Should Know". Investment Advisor. Summit Business Media. Retrieved January 8, 2011. 
^ Staff, Investopedia (2007-11-04). "Inverse ETF". Investopedia. Retrieved 2017-02-28. 
^ "ProFunds readies first leveraged ETFs - ETF Investing". MarketWatch. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "RYDEX ETF TRUST (Form: 485APOS, Received: 11/08/2006 16:27:55)". Esignal.brand.edgar-online.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ http://olympiainv.com/Memos/ETFs.pdf
^ Maxey, Daisy (August 4, 2009). "Fidelity the Latest to Caution on ETFs". Online.wsj.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "A Guide To Shorting Leveraged ETFs". www.signalplot.com. 
^ Leung, Tim (2014). "Implied Volatility of Leveraged ETF Options". Applied Mathematical Finance, Taylor & Francis. SSRN 2164518 .  Check date values in: |access-date= (help); Missing or empty |url= (help); |access-date= requires |url= (help)
^ https://www.reuters.com/article/us-sec-etfs-idUSKCN18C2RO
^ John M. Baker, Creation Units and the Rise of Exchange-Traded Funds, Investment Adviser (July 2000).
^ Mutual Fund Fees Jump 5 Percent on moneywatch.bnet.com
^ Fidelity Offers iShares ETFs Commission-Free on news.morningstar.com
^ Yates, Tristan. "Tristan Yates: What Can we Learn from the 2008 Leveraged ETF Collapse?". Tradingmarkets.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ Dan Culloton, Are ETFs Really More Tax-Efficient Than Mutual Funds? Morningstar (February 14, 2006).
^ The Problem With Vanguard VIPERs ETFs (December 29, 2009).
^ Vanguard ETFs have Different Tax Considerations Than Other ETFs (December 29, 2009).
^ ETF Tax Efficiency (December 29, 2009).
^ Steve Lodge (April 16, 2010). "Are ETF dividends taxed differently? - Yahoo! UK & Ireland Finance". Uk.finance.yahoo.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ Gastineau, Gary (2002). The Exchange-Traded Funds Manual. John Wiley and Sons. p. 227. ISBN 978-0-471-21894-4. 
^ Larry Connors, "Trading Covered Calls with ETFs", Tradingmarkets (March 4, 2008).
^ a b Kirilenko, Andrei; Kyle, Albert S.; Samadi, Mehrdad; Tuzun, Tugkan (May 5, 2014), The Flash Crash: The Impact of High Frequency Trading on an Electronic Market (PDF), retrieved 24 April 2015 
^ Avellaneda and Zhang, “Path-Dependence of Leveraged ETF Returns” SIAM J. of Financial Math, Vol. 1, pp. 586–603 2013. https://www.math.nyu.edu/faculty/avellane/SIAMLETFS.pdf.pdf
^ Guo and Leung, “Understanding the Tracking Errors of Commodity Leveraged ETFs” SSRN, 2013. http://papers.ssrn.com/sol3/papers.cfm?abstract_id=2389411
^ Amount as of July 2015; figure taken from the home page of http://www.spdrgoldshares.com/.
^ a b John Rubino, “Emerging Threat Funds?” CFA Magazine, September–October 2011. pp. 30–33.
^ Stephen Kovaka, Just Say No to the Silver ETF, SilverSeek.com (April 27, 2007)
^ Theodore Butler, The Smoking Gun, SilverSeek.com (August 22, 2008)
^ Global Financial Stability Report: Durable Financial Stability: Getting There from Here, April 2011
^ Financial Stability Board, “Potential financial stability issues arising from recent trends in Exchange-Traded Funds (ETFs)”, April 2011.
^ International Monetary Fund, Global Financial Stability Report: Durable Financial Stability: Getting There from Here, April 2011.
^ Srichander Ramaswamy, “Market structures and systemic risks of exchange-traded funds.” Working paper 343, April 2011. Bank for International Settlements.
^ John C. Bogle, 'Value' Strategies, Wall Street Journal (February 9, 2007).
^ Ian Salisbury, Some ETFs Fall Short on Pricing; Certain Trades Slip Below Value of Holdings, Wall Street Journal (November 21, 2008).
^ ETFs Were Wider Off the Mark in 2009, Wall Street Journal (February 19, 2010).
^ Wilfred Dellva, Exchange-Traded Funds Not for Everyone, Journal of Financial Planning (April 2001).


Further reading[edit]

Carrell, Lawrence. ETFs for the Long Run: What They Are, How They Work, and Simple Strategies for Successful Long-Term Investing. JW Wiley, 2008. ISBN 978-0-470-13894-6
Ferri, Richard A. The ETF Book: All You Need to Know About Exchange-Traded Funds. Wiley, 2009. ISBN 0-470-53746-9
Humphries, William. Leveraged ETFs: The Trojan Horse Has Passed the Margin-Rule Gates. 34 Seattle U.L. Rev. 299 (2010), available at [2].
Koesterich, Russ. The ETF Strategist: Balancing Risk and Reward for Superior Returns. Portfolio, 2008. ISBN 978-1-59184-207-1
Lemke, Thomas P; Lins, Gerald T. & McGuire, W. John. Regulation of Exchange-Traded Funds. Matthew Bender, 2015. ISBN 978-0-7698-9131-6

External links[edit]

The ETF Hall of Fame: 25 People Who Revolutionized the ETF Industry—ETF Database
Exchange Traded Funds (ETF)—Johannesburg Stock Exchange (JSE)
Exchange Traded Funds (ETF)—London Stock Exchange (LSE)
Exchange Traded Funds (ETFs) & Index Funds—NASDAQ Stock Market
Exchange Traded Products—New York Stock Exchange
Exchange Traded Funds (ETF)—Toronto Stock Exchange (TSX)
Exchange Traded Funds (ETF)—Australian Stock Exchange (ASX)
Exchange Traded Funds (ETFs) listed on XETRA or on Nasdaq OMX Nordic—ETFSverige.se information website
Using ETFs in investment portfolios—Exchange Traded Fund Basics, Investor Knowledge Centre (Vanguard Investments Australia)
Benefits of ETFs—Australian ETF Information Network
Cross-referenced list of funds—U.S., Canadian, and U.K. ETFs organized by industry, region, and investment strategy
Global ETF browser—Free ETF Screener based on fundamentals
Find ETFs by Stock Tool—Free tool for finding ETFs by its stocks
Worldwide Exchange Traded Funds—Investing.com global ETFs by category







v
t
e


Investment management



Investment fund
structures



Common contractual fund
Exchange-traded fund
Fond commun de placement
Fund of funds
Index fund
Investment trust
Hedge fund
Listed investment company
Mutual fund
Offshore fund
Open-ended investment company
Pension Fund
Private equity fund
Real estate investment trust
Royalty trust
SICAV
Umbrella fund
Unit investment trust
Unit trust
Unitised insurance fund





Investment styles



Active / passive management
Impact investing
Manager of managers
Socially responsible investing
Value / growth investing





Theory · Terminology



Closed-end fund
Efficient-market hypothesis
Net asset value
Open-end fund





Related topics



Alternative investment
Asset management firms
Robo-advisor
Returns-based style analysis
Traditional investments
UCITS










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Exchange-traded_fund&oldid=792170490"					
Categories: Exchange-traded fundsHidden categories: CS1 errors: datesPages using web citations with no URLPages using citations with accessdate and no URLUse mdy dates from August 2014All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from June 2017Articles with unsourced statements from April 2015Articles with unsourced statements from March 2013Articles with unsourced statements from August 2010 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةБългарскиBosanskiCatalàČeštinaDeutschEestiEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Bahasa IndonesiaItalianoLietuviųNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsРусскийSuomiSvenskaதமிழ்中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 24 July 2017, at 22:07.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Exchange-traded fund - Wikipedia





















 






Exchange-traded fund

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

An exchange-traded fund (ETF) is an investment fund traded on stock exchanges, much like stocks.[1][2] An ETF holds assets such as stocks, commodities, or bonds and generally operates with an arbitrage mechanism designed to keep it trading close to its net asset value,[3] although deviations can occasionally occur. Most ETFs track an index, such as a stock index or bond index. ETFs may be attractive as investments because of their low costs, tax efficiency, and stock-like features.[4][5] By 2013, ETFs had become the most popular type of exchange-traded product.[citation needed]
ETF distributors only buy or sell ETFs directly from or to authorized participants, which are large broker-dealers with whom they have entered into agreements—and then, only in creation units, which are large blocks of tens of thousands of ETF shares, usually exchanged in-kind with baskets of the underlying securities. Authorized participants may wish to invest in the ETF shares for the long-term, but they usually act as market makers on the open market, using their ability to exchange creation units with their underlying securities to provide liquidity of the ETF shares and help ensure that their intraday market price approximates the net asset value of the underlying assets.[3] Other investors, such as individuals using a retail broker, trade ETF shares on this secondary market.
An ETF combines the valuation feature of a mutual fund or unit investment trust, which can be bought or sold at the end of each trading day for its net asset value, with the tradability feature of a closed-end fund, which trades throughout the trading day at prices that may be more or less than its net asset value. Closed-end funds are not considered to be ETFs, even though they are funds and are traded on an exchange. ETFs have been available in the US since 1993 and in Europe since 1999. ETFs traditionally have been index funds, but in 2008 the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission began to authorize the creation of actively managed ETFs.[3]
ETFs offer both tax efficiency and lower transaction costs. More than US$2 trillion were invested in ETFs in the United States between when they were introduced in 1993 and 2015. By the end of 2015, ETFs offered "1,800 different products, covering almost every conceivable market sector, niche and trading strategy".[6]



Contents


1 Structure

1.1 United States


2 History
3 Investment uses
4 Types

4.1 Index ETFs
4.2 Stock ETFs
4.3 Bond ETFs
4.4 Commodity ETFs
4.5 Currency ETFs
4.6 Actively managed ETFs
4.7 Exchange-traded grantor trusts
4.8 Inverse ETFs
4.9 Leveraged ETFs


5 ETFs compared to mutual funds

5.1 Costs
5.2 Taxation
5.3 Trading


6 Regulation
7 Risks

7.1 Tracking error
7.2 Effects on stability
7.3 Regulatory risk
7.4 Counterparty risk


8 Liquidity
9 Criticism
10 Issuers of ETFs
11 See also
12 References
13 Further reading
14 External links



Structure[edit]
An ETF is a type of fund. It owns assets (bonds, stocks, gold bars, etc.) and divides ownership of itself into shares that are held by shareholders. The details of the structure (such as a corporation or trust) will vary by country, and even within one country there may be multiple possible structures.[7] The shareholders indirectly own the assets of the fund, and they will typically get an annual report. Shareholders are entitled to a share of the profits, such as interest or dividends, and they may get a residual value in case the fund is liquidated. Their ownership interest in the fund can easily be bought and sold.
ETFs are similar in many ways to traditional mutual funds, except that shares in an ETF can be bought and sold throughout the day like stocks on a stock exchange through a broker-dealer. Unlike traditional mutual funds, ETFs do not sell or redeem their individual shares at net asset value (NAV). Instead, financial institutions purchase and redeem ETF shares directly from the ETF, but only in large blocks (such as 50,000 shares), called creation units. Purchases and redemptions of the creation units generally are in kind, with the institutional investor contributing or receiving a basket of securities of the same type and proportion held by the ETF, although some ETFs may require or permit a purchasing or redeeming shareholder to substitute cash for some or all of the securities in the basket of assets.[3]
The ability to purchase and redeem creation units gives ETFs an arbitrage mechanism intended to minimize the potential deviation between the market price and the net asset value of ETF shares. Existing ETFs have transparent portfolios, so institutional investors will know exactly what portfolio assets they must assemble if they wish to purchase a creation unit, and the exchange disseminates the updated net asset value of the shares throughout the trading day, typically at 15-second intervals.[3]
If there is strong investor demand for an ETF, its share price will temporarily rise above its net asset value per share, giving arbitrageurs an incentive to purchase additional creation units from the ETF and sell the component ETF shares in the open market. The additional supply of ETF shares reduces the market price per share, generally eliminating the premium over net asset value. A similar process applies when there is weak demand for an ETF: its shares trade at a discount from net asset value.
United States[edit]
In the United States, most ETFs are structured as open-end management investment companies (the same structure used by mutual funds and money market funds), although a few ETFs, including some of the largest ones, are structured as unit investment trusts. ETFs structured as open-end funds have greater flexibility in constructing a portfolio and are not prohibited from participating in securities lending programs or from using futures and options in achieving their investment objectives.[8]
Under existing regulations, a new ETF must receive an order from the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC), giving it relief from provisions of the Investment Company Act of 1940 that would not otherwise allow the ETF structure. In 2008, the SEC proposed rules that would allow the creation of ETFs without the need for exemptive orders. Under the SEC proposal, an ETF would be defined as a registered open-end management investment company that:

issues (or redeems) creation units in exchange for the deposit (or delivery) of basket assets the current value of which is disseminated per share by a national securities exchange at regular intervals during the trading day
identifies itself as an ETF in any sales literature
issues shares that are approved for listing and trading on a securities exchange
discloses each business day on its publicly available web site the prior business day's net asset value and closing market price of the fund's shares, and the premium or discount of the closing market price against the net asset value of the fund's shares as a percentage of net asset value
either is an index fund, or discloses each business day on its publicly available web site the identities and weighting of the component securities and other assets held by the fund[3]

The SEC rule proposal would allow ETFs either to be index funds or to be fully transparent actively managed funds. Historically, all ETFs in the United States had been index funds.[citation needed] In 2008, however, the SEC began issuing exemptive orders to fully transparent actively managed ETFs. The first such order was to PowerShares Actively Managed Exchange-Traded Fund Trust,[9] and the first actively managed ETF in the United States was the Bear Stearns Current Yield Fund, a short-term income fund that began trading on the American Stock Exchange under the symbol YYY on March 25, 2008.[10] The SEC rule proposal indicates that the SEC may still consider future applications for exemptive orders for actively managed ETFs that do not satisfy the proposed rule's transparency requirements.[3]
Some ETFs invest primarily in commodities or commodity-based instruments, such as crude oil and precious metals. Although these commodity ETFs are similar in practice to ETFs that invest in securities, they are not investment companies under the Investment Company Act of 1940.[3]
Publicly traded grantor trusts, such as Merrill Lynch's HOLDRs securities, are sometimes considered to be ETFs, although they lack many of the characteristics of other ETFs. Investors in a grantor trust have a direct interest in the underlying basket of securities, which does not change except to reflect corporate actions such as stock splits and mergers. Funds of this type are not investment companies under the Investment Company Act of 1940.[11]
As of 2009, there were approximately 1,500 exchange-traded funds traded on US exchanges.[12] This count uses the wider definition of ETF, including HOLDRs and closed-end funds.
History[edit]
ETFs had their genesis in 1989 with Index Participation Shares, an S&P 500 proxy that traded on the American Stock Exchange and the Philadelphia Stock Exchange. This product, however, was short-lived after a lawsuit by the Chicago Mercantile Exchange was successful in stopping sales in the United States.[13]
A similar product, Toronto Index Participation Shares, started trading on the Toronto Stock Exchange (TSE) in 1990. The shares, which tracked the TSE 35 and later the TSE 100 indices, proved to be popular. The popularity of these products led the American Stock Exchange to try to develop something that would satisfy SEC regulation in the United States.[13]
Nathan Most and Steven Bloom, under the direction of Ivers Riley, designed and developed Standard & Poor's Depositary Receipts (NYSE Arca: SPY), which were introduced in January 1993.[14][15] Known as SPDRs or "Spiders", the fund became the largest ETF in the world. In May 1995 they introduced the MidCap SPDRs (NYSE Arca: MDY).
Barclays Global Investors, a subsidiary of Barclays PLC, in conjunction with MSCI and as its underwriter, a Boston-based third party distributor, Funds Distributor Inc., entered the market in 1996 with World Equity Benchmark Shares (WEBS), which became iShares MSCI Index Fund Shares. WEBS tracked MSCI country indices, originally 17, of the funds' index provider, Morgan Stanley. WEBS were particularly innovative because they gave casual investors easy access to foreign markets. While SPDRs were organized as unit investment trusts, WEBS were set up as a mutual fund, the first of their kind.[16][17]
In 1998, State Street Global Advisors introduced "Sector Spiders", which follow nine sectors of the S&P 500.[18] Also in 1998, the "Dow Diamonds" (NYSE Arca: DIA) were introduced, tracking the famous Dow Jones Industrial Average. In 1999, the influential "cubes" (NASDAQ: QQQ), were launched attempting to replicate the movement of the NASDAQ-100.
In 2000, Barclays Global Investors put a significant effort behind the ETF marketplace, with a strong emphasis on education and distribution to reach long-term investors. The iShares line was launched in early 2000. Within five years iShares had surpassed the assets of any other ETF competitor in the U.S. and Europe. Barclays Global Investors was sold to BlackRock in 2009.
The Vanguard Group entered the market in 2001. The first fund was Vanguard Total Stock Market ETF (NYSE Arca: VTI), which has become quite popular, and they made the Vanguard Extended Market Index ETF (VXF). Some of Vanguard's ETFs are a share class of an existing mutual fund.
iShares made the first bond funds in July 2002, based on US Treasury bonds and corporate bonds, such as iShares iBoxx $ Invst Grade Crp Bond (LQD). They also created a TIPS fund. In 2007, they introduced funds based on junk and muni bonds; about the same time SPDR and Vanguard got in gear and created several of their bond funds.
Since then ETFs have proliferated, tailored to an increasingly specific array of regions, sectors, commodities, bonds, futures, and other asset classes. As of January 2014, there were over 1,500 ETFs traded in the U.S., with over $1.7 trillion in assets.[19] In December 2014, U.S. ETF assets went above $2 trillion.[20]
Investment uses[edit]
ETFs generally provide the easy diversification, low expense ratios, and tax efficiency of index funds, while still maintaining all the features of ordinary stock, such as limit orders, short selling, and options. Because ETFs can be economically acquired, held, and disposed of, some investors invest in ETF shares as a long-term investment for asset allocation purposes, while other investors trade ETF shares frequently to implement market timing investment strategies.[8] Among the advantages of ETFs are the following:[11][21]

Lower costs: ETFs generally have lower costs than other investment products because most ETFs are not actively managed and because ETFs are insulated from the costs of having to buy and sell securities to accommodate shareholder purchases and redemptions. ETFs typically have lower marketing, distribution and accounting expenses, and most ETFs do not have 12b-1 fees.
Buying and selling flexibility: ETFs can be bought and sold at current market prices at any time during the trading day, unlike mutual funds and unit investment trusts, which can only be traded at the end of the trading day. As publicly traded securities, their shares can be purchased on margin and sold short, enabling the use of hedging strategies, and traded using stop orders and limit orders, which allow investors to specify the price points at which they are willing to trade.
Tax efficiency: ETFs generally generate relatively low capital gains, because they typically have low turnover of their portfolio securities. While this is an advantage they share with other index funds, their tax efficiency is further enhanced because they do not have to sell securities to meet investor redemptions.
Market exposure and diversification: ETFs provide an economical way to rebalance portfolio allocations and to "equitize" cash by investing it quickly. An index ETF inherently provides diversification across an entire index. ETFs offer exposure to a diverse variety of markets, including broad-based indices, broad-based international and country-specific indices, industry sector-specific indices, bond indices, and commodities.
Transparency: ETFs, whether index funds or actively managed, have transparent portfolios and are priced at frequent intervals throughout the trading day.

Some of these advantages derive from the status of most ETFs as index funds.
Types[edit]
For more details on this topic, see List of American exchange-traded funds.
Index ETFs[edit]
Most ETFs are index funds that attempt to replicate the performance of a specific index. Indexes may be based on stocks, bonds, commodities, or currencies. An index fund seeks to track the performance of an index by holding in its portfolio either the contents of the index or a representative sample of the securities in the index.[8] As of June 2012, in the United States, about 1200 index ETFs exist, with about 50 actively managed ETFs. Index ETF assets are about $1.2 trillion, compared with about $7 billion for actively managed ETFs.[22] Some index ETFs, known as leveraged ETFs or inverse ETFs, use investments in derivatives to seek a return that corresponds to a multiple of, or the inverse (opposite) of, the daily performance of the index.[23]
Some index ETFs invest 100% of their assets proportionately in the securities underlying an index, a manner of investing called replication. Other index ETFs use representative sampling, investing 80% to 95% of their assets in the securities of an underlying index and investing the remaining 5% to 20% of their assets in other holdings, such as futures, option and swap contracts, and securities not in the underlying index, that the fund's adviser believes will help the ETF to achieve its investment objective. There are various ways the ETF can be weighted, such as equal weighting or revenue weighting.[24] For index ETFs that invest in indices with thousands of underlying securities, some index ETFs employ "aggressive sampling" and invest in only a tiny percentage of the underlying securities.[25][26]
Stock ETFs[edit]
The first and most popular ETFs track stocks. Many funds track national indexes; for example, Vanguard Total Stock Market ETF NYSE Arca: VTI tracks the CRSP U.S. Total Market Index, and several funds track the S&P 500, both indexes for US stocks. Other funds own stocks from many countries; for example, Vanguard Total International Stock Index NYSE Arca: VXUS tracks the MSCI All Country World ex USA Investable Market Index, while the iShares MSCI EAFE Index NYSE Arca: EFA tracks the MSCI EAFE Index, both "world ex-US" indexes.
Stock ETFs can have different styles, such as large-cap, small-cap, growth, value, et cetera. For example, the S&P 500 index is large- and mid-cap, so the SPDR S&P 500 ETF will not contain small-cap stocks. Others such as iShares Russell 2000 are mainly for small-cap stocks. There are many style ETFs such as iShares Russell 1000 Growth and iShares Russell 1000 Value. ETFs focusing on dividends have been popular in the first few years of the 2010s decade, such as iShares Select Dividend.[27]
ETFs can also be sector funds. These can be broad sectors, like finance and technology, or specific niche areas, like green power. They can also be for one country or global. Critics have said that no one needs a sector fund.[28] This point is not really specific to ETFs; the issues are the same as with mutual funds. The funds are popular since people can put their money into the latest fashionable trend, rather than investing in boring areas with no "cachet".
Bond ETFs[edit]
Exchange-traded funds that invest in bonds are known as bond ETFs.[29] They thrive during economic recessions because investors pull their money out of the stock market and into bonds (for example, government treasury bonds or those issued by companies regarded as financially stable). Because of this cause and effect relationship, the performance of bond ETFs may be indicative of broader economic conditions.[30] There are several advantages to bond ETFs such as the reasonable trading commissions, but this benefit can be negatively offset by fees if bought and sold through a third party.[31]
Commodity ETFs[edit]
Commodity ETFs (CETFs or ETCs) invest in commodities, such as precious metals, agricultural products, or hydrocarbons. Among the first commodity ETFs were gold exchange-traded funds, which have been offered in a number of countries. The idea of a Gold ETF was first officially conceptualised by Benchmark Asset Management Company Private Ltd in India when they filed a proposal with the SEBI in May 2002.[32] The first gold exchange-traded fund was Gold Bullion Securities launched on the ASX in 2003, and the first silver exchange-traded fund was iShares Silver Trust launched on the NYSE in 2006. As of November 2010 a commodity ETF, namely SPDR Gold Shares, was the second-largest ETF by market capitalization.[33]
However, generally commodity ETFs are index funds tracking non-security indices. Because they do not invest in securities, commodity ETFs are not regulated as investment companies under the Investment Company Act of 1940 in the United States, although their public offering is subject to SEC review and they need an SEC no-action letter under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. They may, however, be subject to regulation by the Commodity Futures Trading Commission.[34][35]
The earliest commodity ETFs, such as SPDR Gold Shares (NYSE Arca: GLD) and iShares Silver Trust (NYSE Arca: SLV), owned the physical commodity (e.g., gold and silver bars). Similar to these are ETFS Physical Palladium (NYSE Arca: PALL) and ETFS Physical Platinum (NYSE Arca: PPLT). However, most ETCs implement a futures trading strategy, which may produce quite different results from owning the commodity.
Commodity ETFs trade just like shares, are simple and efficient and provide exposure to an ever-increasing range of commodities and commodity indices, including energy, metals, softs and agriculture. However, it is important for an investor to realize that there are often other factors that affect the price of a commodity ETF that might not be immediately apparent. For example, buyers of an oil ETF such as USO might think that as long as oil goes up, they will profit roughly linearly. What isn't clear to the novice investor is the method by which these funds gain exposure to their underlying commodities. In the case of many commodity funds, they simply roll so-called front-month futures contracts from month to month. This does give exposure to the commodity, but subjects the investor to risks involved in different prices along the term structure, such as a high cost to roll.[36][37]
ETC can also refer to exchange-traded notes, which are not exchange-traded funds.
Currency ETFs[edit]
In 2005, Rydex Investments launched the first currency ETF called the Euro Currency Trust (NYSE Arca: FXE) in New York. Since then Rydex has launched a series of funds tracking all major currencies under their brand CurrencyShares. In 2007 Deutsche Bank's db x-trackers launched EONIA Total Return Index ETF in Frankfurt tracking the euro, and later in 2008 the Sterling Money Market ETF (LSE: XGBP) and US Dollar Money Market ETF (LSE: XUSD) in London. In 2009, ETF Securities launched the world's largest FX platform tracking the MSFXSM Index covering 18 long or short USD ETC vs. single G10 currencies. The funds are total return products where the investor gets access to the FX spot change, local institutional interest rates and a collateral yield.
Actively managed ETFs[edit]
See also: List of American exchange-traded funds § Active ETFs
Most ETFs are index funds, but some ETFs do have active management. Actively managed ETFs have been offered in the United States only since 2008. The first active ETF was Bear Stearns Current Yield ETF (Ticker: YYY).[38] Currently, actively managed ETFs are fully transparent, publishing their current securities portfolios on their web sites daily. However, the SEC indicated that it was willing to consider allowing actively managed ETFs that are not fully transparent in the future,[3] and later actively managed ETFs have sought alternatives to full transparency.
The fully transparent nature of existing ETFs means that an actively managed ETF is at risk from arbitrage activities by market participants who might choose to front run its trades as daily reports of the ETF's holdings reveals its manager's trading strategy. The initial actively managed equity ETFs addressed this problem by trading only weekly or monthly. Actively managed debt ETFs, which are less susceptible to front-running, trade their holdings more frequently.[39]
The actively managed ETF market has largely been seen as more favorable to bond funds, because concerns about disclosing bond holdings are less pronounced, there are fewer product choices, and there is increased appetite for bond products. Pimco's Enhanced Short Duration ETF NYSE: MINT is the largest actively managed ETF, with approximately $3.93 billion in assets as of May 16, 2014.[40]
Actively managed ETFs grew faster in their first three years of existence than index ETFs did in their first three years of existence. As track records develop, many see actively managed ETFs as a significant competitive threat to actively managed mutual funds.[41] However, many academic studies have questioned the value of active management. Jack Bogle of Vanguard Group wrote an article in the Financial Analysts Journal where he estimated that higher fees as well as hidden costs (such a more trading fees and lower return from holding cash) reduce returns for investors by around 2.66 percentage points a year "a huge differential considering that long-term real returns from American equities have been 6.45%."[42] Even without considering hidden costs, high fees negatively affect long-term performance. In another Financial Analysts Journal article, Nobel laureate, Bill Sharpe "calculated that someone who saved via a low-cost fund would have a standard of living in retirement 20% higher than someone who saved in a high-cost fund".[42]
Exchange-traded grantor trusts[edit]
An exchange-traded grantor trust was used to give a direct interest in a static basket of stocks selected from a particular industry. Such products have some properties in common with ETFs—low costs, low turnover, and tax efficiency:but are generally regarded as separate from ETFs. The leading example was Holding Company Depositary Receipts, or HOLDRs, a proprietary Merrill Lynch product, but these have now disappeared from the scene.[11][43][44] SPDR Gold Shares is a grantor trust.
Inverse ETFs[edit]
Main article: Inverse exchange-traded fund
Inverse ETFs are constructed by using various derivatives for the purpose of profiting from a decline in the value of the underlying benchmark. It is a similar type of investment to holding several short positions or using a combination of advanced investment strategies to profit from falling prices. Many inverse ETFs use daily futures as their underlying benchmark.[45]
Leveraged ETFs[edit]
Leveraged exchange-traded funds (LETFs or leveraged ETFs) are a type of ETF that attempt to achieve returns that are more sensitive to market movements than non-leveraged ETFs.[46] Leveraged index ETFs are often marketed as bull or bear funds. A leveraged bull ETF fund might for example attempt to achieve daily returns that are 2x or 3x more pronounced than the Dow Jones Industrial Average or the S&P 500. A leveraged inverse (bear) ETF fund on the other hand may attempt to achieve returns that are -2x or -3x the daily index return, meaning that it will gain double or triple the loss of the market. Leveraged ETFs require the use of financial engineering techniques, including the use of equity swaps, derivatives and rebalancing, and re-indexing to achieve the desired return.[47] The most common way to construct leveraged ETFs is by trading futures contracts.
The rebalancing and re-indexing of leveraged ETFs may have considerable costs when markets are volatile.[48][49] The rebalancing problem is that the fund manager incurs trading losses because he needs to buy when the index goes up and sell when the index goes down in order to maintain a fixed leverage ratio. A 2.5% daily change in the index will for example reduce value of a -2x bear fund by about 0.18% per day, which means that about a third of the fund may be wasted in trading losses within a year (1-(1-0.18%)252=36.5%). Investors may however circumvent this problem by buying or writing futures directly, accepting a varying leverage ratio.[citation needed] A more reasonable estimate of daily market changes is 0.5%, which leads to a 2.6% yearly loss of principal in a 3x leveraged fund.
The re-indexing problem of leveraged ETFs stems from the arithmetic effect of volatility of the underlying index.[50] Take, for example, an index that begins at 100 and a 2X fund based on that index that also starts at 100. In a first trading period (for example, a day), the index rises 10% to 110. The 2X fund will then rise 20% to 120. The index then drops back to 100 (a drop of 9.09%), so that it is now even. The drop in the 2X fund will be 18.18% (2*9.09). But 18.18% of 120 is 21.82. This puts the value of the 2X fund at 98.18. Even though the index is unchanged after two trading periods, an investor in the 2X fund would have lost 1.82%. This decline in value can be even greater for inverse funds (leveraged funds with negative multipliers such as -1, -2, or -3). It always occurs when the change in value of the underlying index changes direction. And the decay in value increases with volatility of the underlying index.
The effect of leverage is also reflected in the pricing of options written on leveraged ETFs. In particular, the terminal payoff of a leveraged ETF European/American put or call depends on the realized variance (hence the path) of the underlying index. The impact of leverage ratio can also be observed from the implied volatility surfaces of leveraged ETF options.[51] For instance, the implied volatility curves of inverse leveraged ETFs (with negative multipliers such as -1, -2, or -3) are commonly observed to be increasing in strike, which is characteristically different from the implied volatility smiles or skews seen for index options or non-leveraged ETF options.
The SEC, in May 2017, granted approval of a pair of 4x leveraged ETF related to S&P 500 Futures, before rescinding the approval a few weeks later. The decision concerns two potential products: ForceShares Daily 4X US Market Futures Long Fund, which would have listed under the ticker UP, and ForceShares Daily 4X US Market Futures Short Fund, with the ticker DOWN.[52]
ETFs compared to mutual funds[edit]
Costs[edit]
ETFs have a reputation for lower costs than traditional mutual funds. This will be evident as a lower expense ratio. This is mainly from two factors, the fact that most ETFs are index funds and some advantages of the ETF structure. However, this needs to be compared in each case, since some index mutual funds also have a very low expense ratio, and some ETFs' expense ratios are relatively high. An index fund is much simpler to run, since it does not require some security selection, and can be largely done by computer. Not only does an ETF have lower shareholder-related expenses, but because it does not have to invest cash contributions or fund cash redemptions, an ETF does not have to maintain a cash reserve for redemptions and saves on brokerage expenses.[53] Mutual funds can charge 1% to 3%, or more; index fund expense ratios are generally lower, while ETFs are almost always less than 1%. Over the long term, these cost differences can compound into a noticeable difference.[54]
Because ETFs trade on an exchange, each transaction is generally subject to a brokerage commission. Commissions depend on the brokerage and which plan is chosen by the customer. For example, a typical flat fee schedule from an online brokerage firm in the United States ranges from $10 to $20, but it can be as low as $0 with discount brokers. Due to this commission cost, the amount invested has a great bearing; someone who wishes to invest $100 per month may have a significant percentage of their investment destroyed immediately, while for someone making a $200,000 investment, the commission cost may be negligible. Generally, mutual funds obtained directly from the fund company itself do not charge a brokerage fee. Thus, when low or no-cost transactions are available, ETFs become very competitive.[55]
The cost difference is more evident when compared with mutual funds that charge a front-end or back-end load as ETFs do not have loads at all. The redemption fee and short-term trading fees are examples of other fees associated with mutual funds that do not exist with ETFs. Traders should be cautious if they plan to trade inverse and leveraged ETFs for short periods of time. Close attention should be paid to transaction costs and daily performance rates as the potential combined compound loss can sometimes go unrecognized and offset potential gains over a longer period of time.[56]
Taxation[edit]
ETFs are structured for tax efficiency and can be more attractive than mutual funds. In the U.S., whenever a mutual fund realizes a capital gain that is not balanced by a realized loss, the mutual fund must distribute the capital gains to its shareholders. This can happen whenever the mutual fund sells portfolio securities, whether to reallocate its investments or to fund shareholder redemptions. These gains are taxable to all shareholders, even those who reinvest the gains distributions in more shares of the fund. In contrast, ETFs are not redeemed by holders (instead, holders simply sell their ETF shares on the stock market, as they would a stock, or effect a non-taxable redemption of a creation unit for portfolio securities), so that investors generally only realize capital gains when they sell their own shares or when the ETF trades to reflect changes in the underlying index.[8]
In most cases, ETFs are more tax-efficient than conventional mutual funds in the same asset classes or categories.[57] Because Vanguard's ETFs are a share-class of their mutual funds, they don't get all the tax advantages if there are net redemptions on the mutual fund shares.[58] Although they do not get all the tax advantages, they get an additional advantage from tax loss harvesting any capital losses from net redemptions.[59][60]
In the U.K., ETFs can be shielded from capital gains tax by placing them in an Individual Savings Account or self-invested personal pension, in the same manner as many other shares. Because UK-resident ETFs would be liable for UK corporation tax on non-UK dividends, most ETFs which hold non-UK companies sold to UK investors are issued in Ireland or Luxembourg.[61]
Trading[edit]
An important benefit of an ETF is the stock-like features offered. A mutual fund is bought or sold at the end of a day's trading, whereas ETFs can be traded whenever the market is open. Since ETFs trade on the market, investors can carry out the same types of trades that they can with a stock. For instance, investors can sell short, use a limit order, use a stop-loss order, buy on margin, and invest as much or as little money as they wish (there is no minimum investment requirement).[62] Also, many ETFs have the capability for options (puts and calls) to be written against them. Covered call strategies allow investors and traders to potentially increase their returns on their ETF purchases by collecting premiums (the proceeds of a call sale or write) on calls written against them. Mutual funds do not offer those features.[63]
Regulation[edit]
New regulations were put in place following the 2010 Flash Crash, when prices of ETFs and other stocks and options became volatile, with trading markets spiking[64]:1 and bids falling as low as a penny a share[6] in what the Commodity Futures Trading Commission (CFTC) investigation described as one of the most turbulent periods in the history of financial markets.[64]:1
These regulations proved to be inadequate to protect investors in the August 24, 2015 flash crash,[6] "when the price of many ETFs appeared to come unhinged from their underlying value". ETFs were consequently put under even greater scrutiny by regulators and investors.[6] Analysts at Morningstar claimed in December 2015 that "ETFs are a “digital-age technology” governed by “Depression-era legislation,”"[6]
Risks[edit]
Tracking error[edit]
The ETF tracking error is the difference between the returns of the ETF and its reference index or asset. A non-zero tracking error therefore represents a failure to replicate the reference as stated in the ETF prospectus. The tracking error is computed based on the prevailing price of the ETF and its reference. It is different than the premium/discount which is the difference between the ETF’s NAV (updated only once a day) and its market price. Tracking errors are more significant when the ETF provider uses strategies other than full replication of the underlying index. Some of the most liquid equity ETFs tend to have better tracking performance because the underlying is also sufficiently liquid, allowing for full replication.[65] In contrast, some ETFs, such as commodities ETFs and their leveraged ETFs, do not necessarily employ full replication because the physical assets cannot be stored easily or used to create a leveraged exposure, or the reference asset or index is illiquid.[66] Futures-based ETFs may also suffer from negative roll yields, as seen in the VIX futures market.
Effects on stability[edit]
ETFs that buy and hold commodities or futures of commodities have become popular. For example, SPDR Gold Shares ETF (GLD) has 21 million ounces in trust.[67] The silver ETF, SLV, is also very large. The commodity ETFs are in effect consumers of their target commodities, thereby affecting the price in a spurious fashion.[68][69][70] In the words of the IMF, “Some market participants believe the growing popularity of exchange-traded funds (ETFs) may have contributed to equity price appreciation in some emerging economies, and warn that leverage embedded in ETFs could pose financial stability risks if equity prices were to decline for a protracted period.”[71]
Regulatory risk[edit]
Synthetic ETFs are attracting regulatory attention from the FSB,[72] the IMF,[73] and the BIS.[74] Areas of concern include the lack of transparency in products and increasing complexity; conflicts of interest; and lack of regulatory compliance.
Counterparty risk[edit]
A synthetic ETF has counterparty risk, because the counterparty is contractually obligated to match the return on the index. The deal is arranged with collateral posted by the swap counterparty. A potential hazard is that the investment bank offering the ETF might post its own collateral, and that collateral could be of dubious quality. Furthermore, the investment bank could use its own trading desk as counterparty. These types of set-ups are not allowed under the European guidelines, Undertakings for Collective Investment in Transferable Securities (UCITS), so the investor should look for UCITS III-compliant funds.[68]
Liquidity[edit]
ETFs have a wide range of liquidity. Some funds are constantly traded, with tens of millions of shares per day changing hands, while others trade only once in a while, even not trading for some days. There are many funds that do not trade very often. This just means that most trading is conducted in the most popular funds. The most active funds (such as SPY, IWM, QQQ, et cetera) are very liquid, with high volume and tight spreads. In these cases, the investor is almost sure to get a "reasonable" price, even in difficult conditions. With other funds, it is worthwhile to take some care in execution. This does not mean that less popular funds are not a quality investment. This is in contrast with traditional mutual funds, where everyone who trades on the same day gets the same price.
Criticism[edit]
John C. Bogle, founder of the Vanguard Group, a leading issuer of index mutual funds (and, since Bogle's retirement, of ETFs), has argued that ETFs represent short-term speculation, that their trading expenses decrease returns to investors, and that most ETFs provide insufficient diversification. He concedes that a broadly diversified ETF that is held over time can be a good investment.[75]
ETFs are dependent on the efficacy of the arbitrage mechanism in order for their share price to track net asset value. While the average deviation between the daily closing price and the daily NAV of ETFs that track domestic indices is generally less than 2%, the deviations may be more significant for ETFs that track certain foreign indices.[8] The Wall Street Journal reported in November 2008, during a period of market turbulence, that some lightly traded ETFs frequently had deviations of 5% or more, exceeding 10% in a handful of cases, although even for these niche ETFs, the average deviation was only a little more than 1%. The trades with the greatest deviations tended to be made immediately after the market opened.[76]
According to a study on ETF returns in 2009 by Morgan Stanley, ETFs missed in 2009 their targets by an average of 1.25 percentage points, a gap more than twice as wide as the 0.52-percentage-point average they posted in 2008.[77] Part of this so-called tracking error is attributed to the proliferation of ETFs targeting exotic investments or areas where trading is less frequent, such as emerging-market stocks, future-contracts based commodity indices and junk bonds.[citation needed]
The tax advantages of ETFs are of no relevance for investors using tax-deferred accounts (or indeed, investors who are tax-exempt in the first place).[78] However, the lower expense ratios are proving difficult for the proponents of traditional mutual funds to overcome.
In a survey of investment professionals, the most frequently cited disadvantage of ETFs was the unknown, untested indices used by many ETFs, followed by the overwhelming number of choices.[5]
Some critics claim that ETFs can be, and have been, used to manipulate market prices, including having been used for short selling that has been asserted by some observers (including Jim Cramer of theStreet.com) to have contributed to the market collapse of 2008.
Issuers of ETFs[edit]
Main article: List of exchange-traded funds

AdvisorShares: actively managed ETFs only, majority owned by Fund.com
Banco Itau: issues itnow in Bovespa
Bips Investment Managers: issues Bips (Beta Investment Performance Securities)
BNP Paribas: issues EasyETFs
BlackRock: issues iShares
Boost ETP: issues short (inverse) and leveraged exchange-traded products including 3X equity and commodity products
Charles Schwab: offers several commission-free ETFs for its clients
Deutsche Bank: issues db x-trackers ETFs, as well as managing PowerShares DB commodity- and currency-based ETFs
ETF Securities: issues ETFs or specialised commodity ETCs
Franklin Templeton: Issues liberty line of ETFs
Global X Funds: issues ETFs
Guggenheim Funds: issues specialty Guggenheim Funds ETFs
Horizons ETFs Management (USA): issues the Covered Call ETF (HSPX)
Indo Premier Investment Management: issues Premier ETFs in Indonesia Stock Exchange
Invesco: issues PowerShares ETFs, as well as BLDRS based on American Depositary Receipts
Lyxor Asset Management: issues Lyxor ETFs
Merrill Lynch: issues HOLDRs
ProShares: U.S.-based firm offering alternative ETFs
Source UK Services: a European joint-venture between Bank of America Merrill Lynch, Goldman Sachs, Morgan Stanley, Nomura and J. P. Morgan issues ETFs and ETCs
State Street Global Advisors: issues SPDRs
Van Eck Global: issues Market Vectors ETFs
Vanguard Group: issues Vanguard ETFs, formerly known as VIPERs
WisdomTree Investments

See also[edit]

Enhanced indexing
Pension fund
Separately managed account

References[edit]


^ "Introduction to Exchange-Traded Funds", Investopedia
^ "Exchange-Traded Funds (ETFs)". U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. Retrieved November 8, 2013. 
^ a b c d e f g h i Exchange-Traded Funds, SEC Release Nos. 33-8901, IC-28193, 73 Fed. Reg. 14618 (March 11, 2008).
^ State Street Global Advisors and Knowledge@Wharton, ETFs Changing the Way Advisors Do Business, According to State Street and Wharton Study, Business Wire (June 10, 2008).
^ a b The Impact of Exchange Traded Products on the Financial Advisory Industry: A Joint Study of State Street Global Advisors and Knowledge@Wharton (2008).
^ a b c d e Weinberg, Ari I. (6 December 2015). "Should You Fear the ETF? ETFs are scaring regulators and investors: Here are the dangers—real and perceived". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 7 December 2015. 
^ SPDR ETFs: Basics of Product Structure SSGA
^ a b c d e Actively Managed Exchange-Traded Funds, SEC Release No. IC-25258, 66 Fed. Reg. 57614 (November 8, 2001).
^ PowerShares Capital Management LLC, et al.; Notice of Application, Release No. IC-28140 (February 1, 2008), 73 Fed. Reg. 7328 (February 7, 2008) (notice); PowerShares Capital Management LLC, Release No. IC-28171 (February 27, 2008) (order). The SEC issued orders to Bear Stearns Asset Management, Inc., Barclays Global Fund Advisors, and WisdomTree Trust on the same day.
^ American Stock Exchange Lists First Actively-Managed Exchange Traded Fund (March 25, 2008).
^ a b c ETFConnect, "Index ETFs – Know Your Funds" (visited April 7, 2008).
^ Peaceful Gains. "A List of exchange-traded funds". Retrieved October 23, 2009. 
^ a b Gastineau, Gary (2002). The Exchange-Traded Funds Manual. John Wiley and Sons. p. 32. ISBN 978-0-471-21894-4. 
^ Carrel, Lawrence (2008), ETFs for the Long Run, John Wiley & Sons, ISBN 978-0-470-13894-6
^ Jennifer Bayot (December 10, 2004). "Nathan Most Is Dead at 90; Investment Fund Innovator". New York Times. Retrieved April 23, 2008. 
^ Wiandt, Jim; William McClatchy (2002). Exchange Traded Funds. John Wiley and Sons. p. 82. ISBN 0-471-22513-4. 
^ Fabozzi, Frank (2003). The Handbook of Financial Instruments. John Wiley and Sons. p. 532. ISBN 0-471-22092-2. 
^ Ferri, Richard A. (2008). The ETF Book, John Wiley and Sons, 191 ISBN 0-470-13063-6.
^ "ETF League Table as of Jan. 21, 2014". IndexUniverse. 
^ U.S. ETF Assets Hit $2 Trillion Milestone - Yahoo Finance
^ American Stock Exchange, ETFs – Individual Investor (visited April 7, 2008).
^ [ETF Statistics For June 2012: Actively Managed Assets Less Than 1% http://etfdailynews.com/2012/07/10/etf-statistics-for-june-2012-actively-managed-assets-less-than-1/]
^ The Case Against Leveraged ETFs, Seeking Alpha (May 17, 2007).
^ [1], Revenue Shares (July 10, 2015).
^ "Our Take on the Bond ETF Dilemma". News.morningstar.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ Stacy L. Fuller, The Evolution of Actively Managed Exchange-Traded Funds, Review of Securities & Commodities Regulation (April 16, 2008).
^ Banner Year of Dividend Growth Sends Cash to Dividend ETFs - Yahoo Finance
^ "Do You Need a Sector Fund?". Morningstar. 
^ Bond ETF Definition
^ "Indicators for Trading in Government Bond ETFs". Tradingmarkets.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "Bond ETFs: A Viable Alternative". Investopedia.com. September 19, 2009. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "Benchmark Asset Management Company conceptualises Gold ETF". Etfglobalinvestor.net. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "Largest ETFs: Top 25 ETFs By Market Cap". ETFdb. Retrieved November 3, 2010. 
^ Michael Sackheim, Michael Schmidtberger & James Munsell, DB Commodity Index Tracking Fund: An Innovative Exchange-Traded Fund, Futures Industry (May/June 2006).
^ Koyfman, Yevgeniy (August 21, 2009). "No Gas: Barclays Halts Issuance of Natural Gas ETN". Indexuniverse.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ tom Lauricella (November 2, 2009). "Gold Mutual Funds Vs. Gold ETFs: It Depends on the Goal". Online.wsj.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "The Future of Commodity ETFs". News.morningstar.com. August 25, 2009. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ Jaffe, Chuck. "Bear Stearns Current Yield (YYY)". The Seattle Time. 
^ David Hoffman, Active ETFs are, well, less active; Dynamics of trading translate into little active management, Investment News (April 21, 2008).
^ Tran, Hung. "MINT Tops BOND As Biggest Active ETF". IndexUniverse. 
^ AlphaBaskets.com report on active vs. index ETFs, AlphaBaskets.com (April 11, 2011).
^ a b "Buttonwood: Against the odds". The Economist. 
^ "All The HOLDRS Are Now History, NYSE Says". ETF.com. 
^ Palash R. Ghosh (August 18, 2005). "HOLDRs Vs. ETFs: What Investors Should Know". Investment Advisor. Summit Business Media. Retrieved January 8, 2011. 
^ Staff, Investopedia (2007-11-04). "Inverse ETF". Investopedia. Retrieved 2017-02-28. 
^ "ProFunds readies first leveraged ETFs - ETF Investing". MarketWatch. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "RYDEX ETF TRUST (Form: 485APOS, Received: 11/08/2006 16:27:55)". Esignal.brand.edgar-online.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ http://olympiainv.com/Memos/ETFs.pdf
^ Maxey, Daisy (August 4, 2009). "Fidelity the Latest to Caution on ETFs". Online.wsj.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "A Guide To Shorting Leveraged ETFs". www.signalplot.com. 
^ Leung, Tim (2014). "Implied Volatility of Leveraged ETF Options". Applied Mathematical Finance, Taylor & Francis. SSRN 2164518 .  Check date values in: |access-date= (help); Missing or empty |url= (help); |access-date= requires |url= (help)
^ https://www.reuters.com/article/us-sec-etfs-idUSKCN18C2RO
^ John M. Baker, Creation Units and the Rise of Exchange-Traded Funds, Investment Adviser (July 2000).
^ Mutual Fund Fees Jump 5 Percent on moneywatch.bnet.com
^ Fidelity Offers iShares ETFs Commission-Free on news.morningstar.com
^ Yates, Tristan. "Tristan Yates: What Can we Learn from the 2008 Leveraged ETF Collapse?". Tradingmarkets.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ Dan Culloton, Are ETFs Really More Tax-Efficient Than Mutual Funds? Morningstar (February 14, 2006).
^ The Problem With Vanguard VIPERs ETFs (December 29, 2009).
^ Vanguard ETFs have Different Tax Considerations Than Other ETFs (December 29, 2009).
^ ETF Tax Efficiency (December 29, 2009).
^ Steve Lodge (April 16, 2010). "Are ETF dividends taxed differently? - Yahoo! UK & Ireland Finance". Uk.finance.yahoo.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ Gastineau, Gary (2002). The Exchange-Traded Funds Manual. John Wiley and Sons. p. 227. ISBN 978-0-471-21894-4. 
^ Larry Connors, "Trading Covered Calls with ETFs", Tradingmarkets (March 4, 2008).
^ a b Kirilenko, Andrei; Kyle, Albert S.; Samadi, Mehrdad; Tuzun, Tugkan (May 5, 2014), The Flash Crash: The Impact of High Frequency Trading on an Electronic Market (PDF), retrieved 24 April 2015 
^ Avellaneda and Zhang, “Path-Dependence of Leveraged ETF Returns” SIAM J. of Financial Math, Vol. 1, pp. 586–603 2013. https://www.math.nyu.edu/faculty/avellane/SIAMLETFS.pdf.pdf
^ Guo and Leung, “Understanding the Tracking Errors of Commodity Leveraged ETFs” SSRN, 2013. http://papers.ssrn.com/sol3/papers.cfm?abstract_id=2389411
^ Amount as of July 2015; figure taken from the home page of http://www.spdrgoldshares.com/.
^ a b John Rubino, “Emerging Threat Funds?” CFA Magazine, September–October 2011. pp. 30–33.
^ Stephen Kovaka, Just Say No to the Silver ETF, SilverSeek.com (April 27, 2007)
^ Theodore Butler, The Smoking Gun, SilverSeek.com (August 22, 2008)
^ Global Financial Stability Report: Durable Financial Stability: Getting There from Here, April 2011
^ Financial Stability Board, “Potential financial stability issues arising from recent trends in Exchange-Traded Funds (ETFs)”, April 2011.
^ International Monetary Fund, Global Financial Stability Report: Durable Financial Stability: Getting There from Here, April 2011.
^ Srichander Ramaswamy, “Market structures and systemic risks of exchange-traded funds.” Working paper 343, April 2011. Bank for International Settlements.
^ John C. Bogle, 'Value' Strategies, Wall Street Journal (February 9, 2007).
^ Ian Salisbury, Some ETFs Fall Short on Pricing; Certain Trades Slip Below Value of Holdings, Wall Street Journal (November 21, 2008).
^ ETFs Were Wider Off the Mark in 2009, Wall Street Journal (February 19, 2010).
^ Wilfred Dellva, Exchange-Traded Funds Not for Everyone, Journal of Financial Planning (April 2001).


Further reading[edit]

Carrell, Lawrence. ETFs for the Long Run: What They Are, How They Work, and Simple Strategies for Successful Long-Term Investing. JW Wiley, 2008. ISBN 978-0-470-13894-6
Ferri, Richard A. The ETF Book: All You Need to Know About Exchange-Traded Funds. Wiley, 2009. ISBN 0-470-53746-9
Humphries, William. Leveraged ETFs: The Trojan Horse Has Passed the Margin-Rule Gates. 34 Seattle U.L. Rev. 299 (2010), available at [2].
Koesterich, Russ. The ETF Strategist: Balancing Risk and Reward for Superior Returns. Portfolio, 2008. ISBN 978-1-59184-207-1
Lemke, Thomas P; Lins, Gerald T. & McGuire, W. John. Regulation of Exchange-Traded Funds. Matthew Bender, 2015. ISBN 978-0-7698-9131-6

External links[edit]

The ETF Hall of Fame: 25 People Who Revolutionized the ETF Industry—ETF Database
Exchange Traded Funds (ETF)—Johannesburg Stock Exchange (JSE)
Exchange Traded Funds (ETF)—London Stock Exchange (LSE)
Exchange Traded Funds (ETFs) & Index Funds—NASDAQ Stock Market
Exchange Traded Products—New York Stock Exchange
Exchange Traded Funds (ETF)—Toronto Stock Exchange (TSX)
Exchange Traded Funds (ETF)—Australian Stock Exchange (ASX)
Exchange Traded Funds (ETFs) listed on XETRA or on Nasdaq OMX Nordic—ETFSverige.se information website
Using ETFs in investment portfolios—Exchange Traded Fund Basics, Investor Knowledge Centre (Vanguard Investments Australia)
Benefits of ETFs—Australian ETF Information Network
Cross-referenced list of funds—U.S., Canadian, and U.K. ETFs organized by industry, region, and investment strategy
Global ETF browser—Free ETF Screener based on fundamentals
Find ETFs by Stock Tool—Free tool for finding ETFs by its stocks
Worldwide Exchange Traded Funds—Investing.com global ETFs by category







v
t
e


Investment management



Investment fund
structures



Common contractual fund
Exchange-traded fund
Fond commun de placement
Fund of funds
Index fund
Investment trust
Hedge fund
Listed investment company
Mutual fund
Offshore fund
Open-ended investment company
Pension Fund
Private equity fund
Real estate investment trust
Royalty trust
SICAV
Umbrella fund
Unit investment trust
Unit trust
Unitised insurance fund





Investment styles



Active / passive management
Impact investing
Manager of managers
Socially responsible investing
Value / growth investing





Theory · Terminology



Closed-end fund
Efficient-market hypothesis
Net asset value
Open-end fund





Related topics



Alternative investment
Asset management firms
Robo-advisor
Returns-based style analysis
Traditional investments
UCITS










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Exchange-traded_fund&oldid=792170490"					
Categories: Exchange-traded fundsHidden categories: CS1 errors: datesPages using web citations with no URLPages using citations with accessdate and no URLUse mdy dates from August 2014All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from June 2017Articles with unsourced statements from April 2015Articles with unsourced statements from March 2013Articles with unsourced statements from August 2010 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةБългарскиBosanskiCatalàČeštinaDeutschEestiEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Bahasa IndonesiaItalianoLietuviųNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsРусскийSuomiSvenskaதமிழ்中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 24 July 2017, at 22:07.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Exchange-traded fund - Wikipedia





















 






Exchange-traded fund

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

An exchange-traded fund (ETF) is an investment fund traded on stock exchanges, much like stocks.[1][2] An ETF holds assets such as stocks, commodities, or bonds and generally operates with an arbitrage mechanism designed to keep it trading close to its net asset value,[3] although deviations can occasionally occur. Most ETFs track an index, such as a stock index or bond index. ETFs may be attractive as investments because of their low costs, tax efficiency, and stock-like features.[4][5] By 2013, ETFs had become the most popular type of exchange-traded product.[citation needed]
ETF distributors only buy or sell ETFs directly from or to authorized participants, which are large broker-dealers with whom they have entered into agreements—and then, only in creation units, which are large blocks of tens of thousands of ETF shares, usually exchanged in-kind with baskets of the underlying securities. Authorized participants may wish to invest in the ETF shares for the long-term, but they usually act as market makers on the open market, using their ability to exchange creation units with their underlying securities to provide liquidity of the ETF shares and help ensure that their intraday market price approximates the net asset value of the underlying assets.[3] Other investors, such as individuals using a retail broker, trade ETF shares on this secondary market.
An ETF combines the valuation feature of a mutual fund or unit investment trust, which can be bought or sold at the end of each trading day for its net asset value, with the tradability feature of a closed-end fund, which trades throughout the trading day at prices that may be more or less than its net asset value. Closed-end funds are not considered to be ETFs, even though they are funds and are traded on an exchange. ETFs have been available in the US since 1993 and in Europe since 1999. ETFs traditionally have been index funds, but in 2008 the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission began to authorize the creation of actively managed ETFs.[3]
ETFs offer both tax efficiency and lower transaction costs. More than US$2 trillion were invested in ETFs in the United States between when they were introduced in 1993 and 2015. By the end of 2015, ETFs offered "1,800 different products, covering almost every conceivable market sector, niche and trading strategy".[6]



Contents


1 Structure

1.1 United States


2 History
3 Investment uses
4 Types

4.1 Index ETFs
4.2 Stock ETFs
4.3 Bond ETFs
4.4 Commodity ETFs
4.5 Currency ETFs
4.6 Actively managed ETFs
4.7 Exchange-traded grantor trusts
4.8 Inverse ETFs
4.9 Leveraged ETFs


5 ETFs compared to mutual funds

5.1 Costs
5.2 Taxation
5.3 Trading


6 Regulation
7 Risks

7.1 Tracking error
7.2 Effects on stability
7.3 Regulatory risk
7.4 Counterparty risk


8 Liquidity
9 Criticism
10 Issuers of ETFs
11 See also
12 References
13 Further reading
14 External links



Structure[edit]
An ETF is a type of fund. It owns assets (bonds, stocks, gold bars, etc.) and divides ownership of itself into shares that are held by shareholders. The details of the structure (such as a corporation or trust) will vary by country, and even within one country there may be multiple possible structures.[7] The shareholders indirectly own the assets of the fund, and they will typically get an annual report. Shareholders are entitled to a share of the profits, such as interest or dividends, and they may get a residual value in case the fund is liquidated. Their ownership interest in the fund can easily be bought and sold.
ETFs are similar in many ways to traditional mutual funds, except that shares in an ETF can be bought and sold throughout the day like stocks on a stock exchange through a broker-dealer. Unlike traditional mutual funds, ETFs do not sell or redeem their individual shares at net asset value (NAV). Instead, financial institutions purchase and redeem ETF shares directly from the ETF, but only in large blocks (such as 50,000 shares), called creation units. Purchases and redemptions of the creation units generally are in kind, with the institutional investor contributing or receiving a basket of securities of the same type and proportion held by the ETF, although some ETFs may require or permit a purchasing or redeeming shareholder to substitute cash for some or all of the securities in the basket of assets.[3]
The ability to purchase and redeem creation units gives ETFs an arbitrage mechanism intended to minimize the potential deviation between the market price and the net asset value of ETF shares. Existing ETFs have transparent portfolios, so institutional investors will know exactly what portfolio assets they must assemble if they wish to purchase a creation unit, and the exchange disseminates the updated net asset value of the shares throughout the trading day, typically at 15-second intervals.[3]
If there is strong investor demand for an ETF, its share price will temporarily rise above its net asset value per share, giving arbitrageurs an incentive to purchase additional creation units from the ETF and sell the component ETF shares in the open market. The additional supply of ETF shares reduces the market price per share, generally eliminating the premium over net asset value. A similar process applies when there is weak demand for an ETF: its shares trade at a discount from net asset value.
United States[edit]
In the United States, most ETFs are structured as open-end management investment companies (the same structure used by mutual funds and money market funds), although a few ETFs, including some of the largest ones, are structured as unit investment trusts. ETFs structured as open-end funds have greater flexibility in constructing a portfolio and are not prohibited from participating in securities lending programs or from using futures and options in achieving their investment objectives.[8]
Under existing regulations, a new ETF must receive an order from the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC), giving it relief from provisions of the Investment Company Act of 1940 that would not otherwise allow the ETF structure. In 2008, the SEC proposed rules that would allow the creation of ETFs without the need for exemptive orders. Under the SEC proposal, an ETF would be defined as a registered open-end management investment company that:

issues (or redeems) creation units in exchange for the deposit (or delivery) of basket assets the current value of which is disseminated per share by a national securities exchange at regular intervals during the trading day
identifies itself as an ETF in any sales literature
issues shares that are approved for listing and trading on a securities exchange
discloses each business day on its publicly available web site the prior business day's net asset value and closing market price of the fund's shares, and the premium or discount of the closing market price against the net asset value of the fund's shares as a percentage of net asset value
either is an index fund, or discloses each business day on its publicly available web site the identities and weighting of the component securities and other assets held by the fund[3]

The SEC rule proposal would allow ETFs either to be index funds or to be fully transparent actively managed funds. Historically, all ETFs in the United States had been index funds.[citation needed] In 2008, however, the SEC began issuing exemptive orders to fully transparent actively managed ETFs. The first such order was to PowerShares Actively Managed Exchange-Traded Fund Trust,[9] and the first actively managed ETF in the United States was the Bear Stearns Current Yield Fund, a short-term income fund that began trading on the American Stock Exchange under the symbol YYY on March 25, 2008.[10] The SEC rule proposal indicates that the SEC may still consider future applications for exemptive orders for actively managed ETFs that do not satisfy the proposed rule's transparency requirements.[3]
Some ETFs invest primarily in commodities or commodity-based instruments, such as crude oil and precious metals. Although these commodity ETFs are similar in practice to ETFs that invest in securities, they are not investment companies under the Investment Company Act of 1940.[3]
Publicly traded grantor trusts, such as Merrill Lynch's HOLDRs securities, are sometimes considered to be ETFs, although they lack many of the characteristics of other ETFs. Investors in a grantor trust have a direct interest in the underlying basket of securities, which does not change except to reflect corporate actions such as stock splits and mergers. Funds of this type are not investment companies under the Investment Company Act of 1940.[11]
As of 2009, there were approximately 1,500 exchange-traded funds traded on US exchanges.[12] This count uses the wider definition of ETF, including HOLDRs and closed-end funds.
History[edit]
ETFs had their genesis in 1989 with Index Participation Shares, an S&P 500 proxy that traded on the American Stock Exchange and the Philadelphia Stock Exchange. This product, however, was short-lived after a lawsuit by the Chicago Mercantile Exchange was successful in stopping sales in the United States.[13]
A similar product, Toronto Index Participation Shares, started trading on the Toronto Stock Exchange (TSE) in 1990. The shares, which tracked the TSE 35 and later the TSE 100 indices, proved to be popular. The popularity of these products led the American Stock Exchange to try to develop something that would satisfy SEC regulation in the United States.[13]
Nathan Most and Steven Bloom, under the direction of Ivers Riley, designed and developed Standard & Poor's Depositary Receipts (NYSE Arca: SPY), which were introduced in January 1993.[14][15] Known as SPDRs or "Spiders", the fund became the largest ETF in the world. In May 1995 they introduced the MidCap SPDRs (NYSE Arca: MDY).
Barclays Global Investors, a subsidiary of Barclays PLC, in conjunction with MSCI and as its underwriter, a Boston-based third party distributor, Funds Distributor Inc., entered the market in 1996 with World Equity Benchmark Shares (WEBS), which became iShares MSCI Index Fund Shares. WEBS tracked MSCI country indices, originally 17, of the funds' index provider, Morgan Stanley. WEBS were particularly innovative because they gave casual investors easy access to foreign markets. While SPDRs were organized as unit investment trusts, WEBS were set up as a mutual fund, the first of their kind.[16][17]
In 1998, State Street Global Advisors introduced "Sector Spiders", which follow nine sectors of the S&P 500.[18] Also in 1998, the "Dow Diamonds" (NYSE Arca: DIA) were introduced, tracking the famous Dow Jones Industrial Average. In 1999, the influential "cubes" (NASDAQ: QQQ), were launched attempting to replicate the movement of the NASDAQ-100.
In 2000, Barclays Global Investors put a significant effort behind the ETF marketplace, with a strong emphasis on education and distribution to reach long-term investors. The iShares line was launched in early 2000. Within five years iShares had surpassed the assets of any other ETF competitor in the U.S. and Europe. Barclays Global Investors was sold to BlackRock in 2009.
The Vanguard Group entered the market in 2001. The first fund was Vanguard Total Stock Market ETF (NYSE Arca: VTI), which has become quite popular, and they made the Vanguard Extended Market Index ETF (VXF). Some of Vanguard's ETFs are a share class of an existing mutual fund.
iShares made the first bond funds in July 2002, based on US Treasury bonds and corporate bonds, such as iShares iBoxx $ Invst Grade Crp Bond (LQD). They also created a TIPS fund. In 2007, they introduced funds based on junk and muni bonds; about the same time SPDR and Vanguard got in gear and created several of their bond funds.
Since then ETFs have proliferated, tailored to an increasingly specific array of regions, sectors, commodities, bonds, futures, and other asset classes. As of January 2014, there were over 1,500 ETFs traded in the U.S., with over $1.7 trillion in assets.[19] In December 2014, U.S. ETF assets went above $2 trillion.[20]
Investment uses[edit]
ETFs generally provide the easy diversification, low expense ratios, and tax efficiency of index funds, while still maintaining all the features of ordinary stock, such as limit orders, short selling, and options. Because ETFs can be economically acquired, held, and disposed of, some investors invest in ETF shares as a long-term investment for asset allocation purposes, while other investors trade ETF shares frequently to implement market timing investment strategies.[8] Among the advantages of ETFs are the following:[11][21]

Lower costs: ETFs generally have lower costs than other investment products because most ETFs are not actively managed and because ETFs are insulated from the costs of having to buy and sell securities to accommodate shareholder purchases and redemptions. ETFs typically have lower marketing, distribution and accounting expenses, and most ETFs do not have 12b-1 fees.
Buying and selling flexibility: ETFs can be bought and sold at current market prices at any time during the trading day, unlike mutual funds and unit investment trusts, which can only be traded at the end of the trading day. As publicly traded securities, their shares can be purchased on margin and sold short, enabling the use of hedging strategies, and traded using stop orders and limit orders, which allow investors to specify the price points at which they are willing to trade.
Tax efficiency: ETFs generally generate relatively low capital gains, because they typically have low turnover of their portfolio securities. While this is an advantage they share with other index funds, their tax efficiency is further enhanced because they do not have to sell securities to meet investor redemptions.
Market exposure and diversification: ETFs provide an economical way to rebalance portfolio allocations and to "equitize" cash by investing it quickly. An index ETF inherently provides diversification across an entire index. ETFs offer exposure to a diverse variety of markets, including broad-based indices, broad-based international and country-specific indices, industry sector-specific indices, bond indices, and commodities.
Transparency: ETFs, whether index funds or actively managed, have transparent portfolios and are priced at frequent intervals throughout the trading day.

Some of these advantages derive from the status of most ETFs as index funds.
Types[edit]
For more details on this topic, see List of American exchange-traded funds.
Index ETFs[edit]
Most ETFs are index funds that attempt to replicate the performance of a specific index. Indexes may be based on stocks, bonds, commodities, or currencies. An index fund seeks to track the performance of an index by holding in its portfolio either the contents of the index or a representative sample of the securities in the index.[8] As of June 2012, in the United States, about 1200 index ETFs exist, with about 50 actively managed ETFs. Index ETF assets are about $1.2 trillion, compared with about $7 billion for actively managed ETFs.[22] Some index ETFs, known as leveraged ETFs or inverse ETFs, use investments in derivatives to seek a return that corresponds to a multiple of, or the inverse (opposite) of, the daily performance of the index.[23]
Some index ETFs invest 100% of their assets proportionately in the securities underlying an index, a manner of investing called replication. Other index ETFs use representative sampling, investing 80% to 95% of their assets in the securities of an underlying index and investing the remaining 5% to 20% of their assets in other holdings, such as futures, option and swap contracts, and securities not in the underlying index, that the fund's adviser believes will help the ETF to achieve its investment objective. There are various ways the ETF can be weighted, such as equal weighting or revenue weighting.[24] For index ETFs that invest in indices with thousands of underlying securities, some index ETFs employ "aggressive sampling" and invest in only a tiny percentage of the underlying securities.[25][26]
Stock ETFs[edit]
The first and most popular ETFs track stocks. Many funds track national indexes; for example, Vanguard Total Stock Market ETF NYSE Arca: VTI tracks the CRSP U.S. Total Market Index, and several funds track the S&P 500, both indexes for US stocks. Other funds own stocks from many countries; for example, Vanguard Total International Stock Index NYSE Arca: VXUS tracks the MSCI All Country World ex USA Investable Market Index, while the iShares MSCI EAFE Index NYSE Arca: EFA tracks the MSCI EAFE Index, both "world ex-US" indexes.
Stock ETFs can have different styles, such as large-cap, small-cap, growth, value, et cetera. For example, the S&P 500 index is large- and mid-cap, so the SPDR S&P 500 ETF will not contain small-cap stocks. Others such as iShares Russell 2000 are mainly for small-cap stocks. There are many style ETFs such as iShares Russell 1000 Growth and iShares Russell 1000 Value. ETFs focusing on dividends have been popular in the first few years of the 2010s decade, such as iShares Select Dividend.[27]
ETFs can also be sector funds. These can be broad sectors, like finance and technology, or specific niche areas, like green power. They can also be for one country or global. Critics have said that no one needs a sector fund.[28] This point is not really specific to ETFs; the issues are the same as with mutual funds. The funds are popular since people can put their money into the latest fashionable trend, rather than investing in boring areas with no "cachet".
Bond ETFs[edit]
Exchange-traded funds that invest in bonds are known as bond ETFs.[29] They thrive during economic recessions because investors pull their money out of the stock market and into bonds (for example, government treasury bonds or those issued by companies regarded as financially stable). Because of this cause and effect relationship, the performance of bond ETFs may be indicative of broader economic conditions.[30] There are several advantages to bond ETFs such as the reasonable trading commissions, but this benefit can be negatively offset by fees if bought and sold through a third party.[31]
Commodity ETFs[edit]
Commodity ETFs (CETFs or ETCs) invest in commodities, such as precious metals, agricultural products, or hydrocarbons. Among the first commodity ETFs were gold exchange-traded funds, which have been offered in a number of countries. The idea of a Gold ETF was first officially conceptualised by Benchmark Asset Management Company Private Ltd in India when they filed a proposal with the SEBI in May 2002.[32] The first gold exchange-traded fund was Gold Bullion Securities launched on the ASX in 2003, and the first silver exchange-traded fund was iShares Silver Trust launched on the NYSE in 2006. As of November 2010 a commodity ETF, namely SPDR Gold Shares, was the second-largest ETF by market capitalization.[33]
However, generally commodity ETFs are index funds tracking non-security indices. Because they do not invest in securities, commodity ETFs are not regulated as investment companies under the Investment Company Act of 1940 in the United States, although their public offering is subject to SEC review and they need an SEC no-action letter under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. They may, however, be subject to regulation by the Commodity Futures Trading Commission.[34][35]
The earliest commodity ETFs, such as SPDR Gold Shares (NYSE Arca: GLD) and iShares Silver Trust (NYSE Arca: SLV), owned the physical commodity (e.g., gold and silver bars). Similar to these are ETFS Physical Palladium (NYSE Arca: PALL) and ETFS Physical Platinum (NYSE Arca: PPLT). However, most ETCs implement a futures trading strategy, which may produce quite different results from owning the commodity.
Commodity ETFs trade just like shares, are simple and efficient and provide exposure to an ever-increasing range of commodities and commodity indices, including energy, metals, softs and agriculture. However, it is important for an investor to realize that there are often other factors that affect the price of a commodity ETF that might not be immediately apparent. For example, buyers of an oil ETF such as USO might think that as long as oil goes up, they will profit roughly linearly. What isn't clear to the novice investor is the method by which these funds gain exposure to their underlying commodities. In the case of many commodity funds, they simply roll so-called front-month futures contracts from month to month. This does give exposure to the commodity, but subjects the investor to risks involved in different prices along the term structure, such as a high cost to roll.[36][37]
ETC can also refer to exchange-traded notes, which are not exchange-traded funds.
Currency ETFs[edit]
In 2005, Rydex Investments launched the first currency ETF called the Euro Currency Trust (NYSE Arca: FXE) in New York. Since then Rydex has launched a series of funds tracking all major currencies under their brand CurrencyShares. In 2007 Deutsche Bank's db x-trackers launched EONIA Total Return Index ETF in Frankfurt tracking the euro, and later in 2008 the Sterling Money Market ETF (LSE: XGBP) and US Dollar Money Market ETF (LSE: XUSD) in London. In 2009, ETF Securities launched the world's largest FX platform tracking the MSFXSM Index covering 18 long or short USD ETC vs. single G10 currencies. The funds are total return products where the investor gets access to the FX spot change, local institutional interest rates and a collateral yield.
Actively managed ETFs[edit]
See also: List of American exchange-traded funds § Active ETFs
Most ETFs are index funds, but some ETFs do have active management. Actively managed ETFs have been offered in the United States only since 2008. The first active ETF was Bear Stearns Current Yield ETF (Ticker: YYY).[38] Currently, actively managed ETFs are fully transparent, publishing their current securities portfolios on their web sites daily. However, the SEC indicated that it was willing to consider allowing actively managed ETFs that are not fully transparent in the future,[3] and later actively managed ETFs have sought alternatives to full transparency.
The fully transparent nature of existing ETFs means that an actively managed ETF is at risk from arbitrage activities by market participants who might choose to front run its trades as daily reports of the ETF's holdings reveals its manager's trading strategy. The initial actively managed equity ETFs addressed this problem by trading only weekly or monthly. Actively managed debt ETFs, which are less susceptible to front-running, trade their holdings more frequently.[39]
The actively managed ETF market has largely been seen as more favorable to bond funds, because concerns about disclosing bond holdings are less pronounced, there are fewer product choices, and there is increased appetite for bond products. Pimco's Enhanced Short Duration ETF NYSE: MINT is the largest actively managed ETF, with approximately $3.93 billion in assets as of May 16, 2014.[40]
Actively managed ETFs grew faster in their first three years of existence than index ETFs did in their first three years of existence. As track records develop, many see actively managed ETFs as a significant competitive threat to actively managed mutual funds.[41] However, many academic studies have questioned the value of active management. Jack Bogle of Vanguard Group wrote an article in the Financial Analysts Journal where he estimated that higher fees as well as hidden costs (such a more trading fees and lower return from holding cash) reduce returns for investors by around 2.66 percentage points a year "a huge differential considering that long-term real returns from American equities have been 6.45%."[42] Even without considering hidden costs, high fees negatively affect long-term performance. In another Financial Analysts Journal article, Nobel laureate, Bill Sharpe "calculated that someone who saved via a low-cost fund would have a standard of living in retirement 20% higher than someone who saved in a high-cost fund".[42]
Exchange-traded grantor trusts[edit]
An exchange-traded grantor trust was used to give a direct interest in a static basket of stocks selected from a particular industry. Such products have some properties in common with ETFs—low costs, low turnover, and tax efficiency:but are generally regarded as separate from ETFs. The leading example was Holding Company Depositary Receipts, or HOLDRs, a proprietary Merrill Lynch product, but these have now disappeared from the scene.[11][43][44] SPDR Gold Shares is a grantor trust.
Inverse ETFs[edit]
Main article: Inverse exchange-traded fund
Inverse ETFs are constructed by using various derivatives for the purpose of profiting from a decline in the value of the underlying benchmark. It is a similar type of investment to holding several short positions or using a combination of advanced investment strategies to profit from falling prices. Many inverse ETFs use daily futures as their underlying benchmark.[45]
Leveraged ETFs[edit]
Leveraged exchange-traded funds (LETFs or leveraged ETFs) are a type of ETF that attempt to achieve returns that are more sensitive to market movements than non-leveraged ETFs.[46] Leveraged index ETFs are often marketed as bull or bear funds. A leveraged bull ETF fund might for example attempt to achieve daily returns that are 2x or 3x more pronounced than the Dow Jones Industrial Average or the S&P 500. A leveraged inverse (bear) ETF fund on the other hand may attempt to achieve returns that are -2x or -3x the daily index return, meaning that it will gain double or triple the loss of the market. Leveraged ETFs require the use of financial engineering techniques, including the use of equity swaps, derivatives and rebalancing, and re-indexing to achieve the desired return.[47] The most common way to construct leveraged ETFs is by trading futures contracts.
The rebalancing and re-indexing of leveraged ETFs may have considerable costs when markets are volatile.[48][49] The rebalancing problem is that the fund manager incurs trading losses because he needs to buy when the index goes up and sell when the index goes down in order to maintain a fixed leverage ratio. A 2.5% daily change in the index will for example reduce value of a -2x bear fund by about 0.18% per day, which means that about a third of the fund may be wasted in trading losses within a year (1-(1-0.18%)252=36.5%). Investors may however circumvent this problem by buying or writing futures directly, accepting a varying leverage ratio.[citation needed] A more reasonable estimate of daily market changes is 0.5%, which leads to a 2.6% yearly loss of principal in a 3x leveraged fund.
The re-indexing problem of leveraged ETFs stems from the arithmetic effect of volatility of the underlying index.[50] Take, for example, an index that begins at 100 and a 2X fund based on that index that also starts at 100. In a first trading period (for example, a day), the index rises 10% to 110. The 2X fund will then rise 20% to 120. The index then drops back to 100 (a drop of 9.09%), so that it is now even. The drop in the 2X fund will be 18.18% (2*9.09). But 18.18% of 120 is 21.82. This puts the value of the 2X fund at 98.18. Even though the index is unchanged after two trading periods, an investor in the 2X fund would have lost 1.82%. This decline in value can be even greater for inverse funds (leveraged funds with negative multipliers such as -1, -2, or -3). It always occurs when the change in value of the underlying index changes direction. And the decay in value increases with volatility of the underlying index.
The effect of leverage is also reflected in the pricing of options written on leveraged ETFs. In particular, the terminal payoff of a leveraged ETF European/American put or call depends on the realized variance (hence the path) of the underlying index. The impact of leverage ratio can also be observed from the implied volatility surfaces of leveraged ETF options.[51] For instance, the implied volatility curves of inverse leveraged ETFs (with negative multipliers such as -1, -2, or -3) are commonly observed to be increasing in strike, which is characteristically different from the implied volatility smiles or skews seen for index options or non-leveraged ETF options.
The SEC, in May 2017, granted approval of a pair of 4x leveraged ETF related to S&P 500 Futures, before rescinding the approval a few weeks later. The decision concerns two potential products: ForceShares Daily 4X US Market Futures Long Fund, which would have listed under the ticker UP, and ForceShares Daily 4X US Market Futures Short Fund, with the ticker DOWN.[52]
ETFs compared to mutual funds[edit]
Costs[edit]
ETFs have a reputation for lower costs than traditional mutual funds. This will be evident as a lower expense ratio. This is mainly from two factors, the fact that most ETFs are index funds and some advantages of the ETF structure. However, this needs to be compared in each case, since some index mutual funds also have a very low expense ratio, and some ETFs' expense ratios are relatively high. An index fund is much simpler to run, since it does not require some security selection, and can be largely done by computer. Not only does an ETF have lower shareholder-related expenses, but because it does not have to invest cash contributions or fund cash redemptions, an ETF does not have to maintain a cash reserve for redemptions and saves on brokerage expenses.[53] Mutual funds can charge 1% to 3%, or more; index fund expense ratios are generally lower, while ETFs are almost always less than 1%. Over the long term, these cost differences can compound into a noticeable difference.[54]
Because ETFs trade on an exchange, each transaction is generally subject to a brokerage commission. Commissions depend on the brokerage and which plan is chosen by the customer. For example, a typical flat fee schedule from an online brokerage firm in the United States ranges from $10 to $20, but it can be as low as $0 with discount brokers. Due to this commission cost, the amount invested has a great bearing; someone who wishes to invest $100 per month may have a significant percentage of their investment destroyed immediately, while for someone making a $200,000 investment, the commission cost may be negligible. Generally, mutual funds obtained directly from the fund company itself do not charge a brokerage fee. Thus, when low or no-cost transactions are available, ETFs become very competitive.[55]
The cost difference is more evident when compared with mutual funds that charge a front-end or back-end load as ETFs do not have loads at all. The redemption fee and short-term trading fees are examples of other fees associated with mutual funds that do not exist with ETFs. Traders should be cautious if they plan to trade inverse and leveraged ETFs for short periods of time. Close attention should be paid to transaction costs and daily performance rates as the potential combined compound loss can sometimes go unrecognized and offset potential gains over a longer period of time.[56]
Taxation[edit]
ETFs are structured for tax efficiency and can be more attractive than mutual funds. In the U.S., whenever a mutual fund realizes a capital gain that is not balanced by a realized loss, the mutual fund must distribute the capital gains to its shareholders. This can happen whenever the mutual fund sells portfolio securities, whether to reallocate its investments or to fund shareholder redemptions. These gains are taxable to all shareholders, even those who reinvest the gains distributions in more shares of the fund. In contrast, ETFs are not redeemed by holders (instead, holders simply sell their ETF shares on the stock market, as they would a stock, or effect a non-taxable redemption of a creation unit for portfolio securities), so that investors generally only realize capital gains when they sell their own shares or when the ETF trades to reflect changes in the underlying index.[8]
In most cases, ETFs are more tax-efficient than conventional mutual funds in the same asset classes or categories.[57] Because Vanguard's ETFs are a share-class of their mutual funds, they don't get all the tax advantages if there are net redemptions on the mutual fund shares.[58] Although they do not get all the tax advantages, they get an additional advantage from tax loss harvesting any capital losses from net redemptions.[59][60]
In the U.K., ETFs can be shielded from capital gains tax by placing them in an Individual Savings Account or self-invested personal pension, in the same manner as many other shares. Because UK-resident ETFs would be liable for UK corporation tax on non-UK dividends, most ETFs which hold non-UK companies sold to UK investors are issued in Ireland or Luxembourg.[61]
Trading[edit]
An important benefit of an ETF is the stock-like features offered. A mutual fund is bought or sold at the end of a day's trading, whereas ETFs can be traded whenever the market is open. Since ETFs trade on the market, investors can carry out the same types of trades that they can with a stock. For instance, investors can sell short, use a limit order, use a stop-loss order, buy on margin, and invest as much or as little money as they wish (there is no minimum investment requirement).[62] Also, many ETFs have the capability for options (puts and calls) to be written against them. Covered call strategies allow investors and traders to potentially increase their returns on their ETF purchases by collecting premiums (the proceeds of a call sale or write) on calls written against them. Mutual funds do not offer those features.[63]
Regulation[edit]
New regulations were put in place following the 2010 Flash Crash, when prices of ETFs and other stocks and options became volatile, with trading markets spiking[64]:1 and bids falling as low as a penny a share[6] in what the Commodity Futures Trading Commission (CFTC) investigation described as one of the most turbulent periods in the history of financial markets.[64]:1
These regulations proved to be inadequate to protect investors in the August 24, 2015 flash crash,[6] "when the price of many ETFs appeared to come unhinged from their underlying value". ETFs were consequently put under even greater scrutiny by regulators and investors.[6] Analysts at Morningstar claimed in December 2015 that "ETFs are a “digital-age technology” governed by “Depression-era legislation,”"[6]
Risks[edit]
Tracking error[edit]
The ETF tracking error is the difference between the returns of the ETF and its reference index or asset. A non-zero tracking error therefore represents a failure to replicate the reference as stated in the ETF prospectus. The tracking error is computed based on the prevailing price of the ETF and its reference. It is different than the premium/discount which is the difference between the ETF’s NAV (updated only once a day) and its market price. Tracking errors are more significant when the ETF provider uses strategies other than full replication of the underlying index. Some of the most liquid equity ETFs tend to have better tracking performance because the underlying is also sufficiently liquid, allowing for full replication.[65] In contrast, some ETFs, such as commodities ETFs and their leveraged ETFs, do not necessarily employ full replication because the physical assets cannot be stored easily or used to create a leveraged exposure, or the reference asset or index is illiquid.[66] Futures-based ETFs may also suffer from negative roll yields, as seen in the VIX futures market.
Effects on stability[edit]
ETFs that buy and hold commodities or futures of commodities have become popular. For example, SPDR Gold Shares ETF (GLD) has 21 million ounces in trust.[67] The silver ETF, SLV, is also very large. The commodity ETFs are in effect consumers of their target commodities, thereby affecting the price in a spurious fashion.[68][69][70] In the words of the IMF, “Some market participants believe the growing popularity of exchange-traded funds (ETFs) may have contributed to equity price appreciation in some emerging economies, and warn that leverage embedded in ETFs could pose financial stability risks if equity prices were to decline for a protracted period.”[71]
Regulatory risk[edit]
Synthetic ETFs are attracting regulatory attention from the FSB,[72] the IMF,[73] and the BIS.[74] Areas of concern include the lack of transparency in products and increasing complexity; conflicts of interest; and lack of regulatory compliance.
Counterparty risk[edit]
A synthetic ETF has counterparty risk, because the counterparty is contractually obligated to match the return on the index. The deal is arranged with collateral posted by the swap counterparty. A potential hazard is that the investment bank offering the ETF might post its own collateral, and that collateral could be of dubious quality. Furthermore, the investment bank could use its own trading desk as counterparty. These types of set-ups are not allowed under the European guidelines, Undertakings for Collective Investment in Transferable Securities (UCITS), so the investor should look for UCITS III-compliant funds.[68]
Liquidity[edit]
ETFs have a wide range of liquidity. Some funds are constantly traded, with tens of millions of shares per day changing hands, while others trade only once in a while, even not trading for some days. There are many funds that do not trade very often. This just means that most trading is conducted in the most popular funds. The most active funds (such as SPY, IWM, QQQ, et cetera) are very liquid, with high volume and tight spreads. In these cases, the investor is almost sure to get a "reasonable" price, even in difficult conditions. With other funds, it is worthwhile to take some care in execution. This does not mean that less popular funds are not a quality investment. This is in contrast with traditional mutual funds, where everyone who trades on the same day gets the same price.
Criticism[edit]
John C. Bogle, founder of the Vanguard Group, a leading issuer of index mutual funds (and, since Bogle's retirement, of ETFs), has argued that ETFs represent short-term speculation, that their trading expenses decrease returns to investors, and that most ETFs provide insufficient diversification. He concedes that a broadly diversified ETF that is held over time can be a good investment.[75]
ETFs are dependent on the efficacy of the arbitrage mechanism in order for their share price to track net asset value. While the average deviation between the daily closing price and the daily NAV of ETFs that track domestic indices is generally less than 2%, the deviations may be more significant for ETFs that track certain foreign indices.[8] The Wall Street Journal reported in November 2008, during a period of market turbulence, that some lightly traded ETFs frequently had deviations of 5% or more, exceeding 10% in a handful of cases, although even for these niche ETFs, the average deviation was only a little more than 1%. The trades with the greatest deviations tended to be made immediately after the market opened.[76]
According to a study on ETF returns in 2009 by Morgan Stanley, ETFs missed in 2009 their targets by an average of 1.25 percentage points, a gap more than twice as wide as the 0.52-percentage-point average they posted in 2008.[77] Part of this so-called tracking error is attributed to the proliferation of ETFs targeting exotic investments or areas where trading is less frequent, such as emerging-market stocks, future-contracts based commodity indices and junk bonds.[citation needed]
The tax advantages of ETFs are of no relevance for investors using tax-deferred accounts (or indeed, investors who are tax-exempt in the first place).[78] However, the lower expense ratios are proving difficult for the proponents of traditional mutual funds to overcome.
In a survey of investment professionals, the most frequently cited disadvantage of ETFs was the unknown, untested indices used by many ETFs, followed by the overwhelming number of choices.[5]
Some critics claim that ETFs can be, and have been, used to manipulate market prices, including having been used for short selling that has been asserted by some observers (including Jim Cramer of theStreet.com) to have contributed to the market collapse of 2008.
Issuers of ETFs[edit]
Main article: List of exchange-traded funds

AdvisorShares: actively managed ETFs only, majority owned by Fund.com
Banco Itau: issues itnow in Bovespa
Bips Investment Managers: issues Bips (Beta Investment Performance Securities)
BNP Paribas: issues EasyETFs
BlackRock: issues iShares
Boost ETP: issues short (inverse) and leveraged exchange-traded products including 3X equity and commodity products
Charles Schwab: offers several commission-free ETFs for its clients
Deutsche Bank: issues db x-trackers ETFs, as well as managing PowerShares DB commodity- and currency-based ETFs
ETF Securities: issues ETFs or specialised commodity ETCs
Franklin Templeton: Issues liberty line of ETFs
Global X Funds: issues ETFs
Guggenheim Funds: issues specialty Guggenheim Funds ETFs
Horizons ETFs Management (USA): issues the Covered Call ETF (HSPX)
Indo Premier Investment Management: issues Premier ETFs in Indonesia Stock Exchange
Invesco: issues PowerShares ETFs, as well as BLDRS based on American Depositary Receipts
Lyxor Asset Management: issues Lyxor ETFs
Merrill Lynch: issues HOLDRs
ProShares: U.S.-based firm offering alternative ETFs
Source UK Services: a European joint-venture between Bank of America Merrill Lynch, Goldman Sachs, Morgan Stanley, Nomura and J. P. Morgan issues ETFs and ETCs
State Street Global Advisors: issues SPDRs
Van Eck Global: issues Market Vectors ETFs
Vanguard Group: issues Vanguard ETFs, formerly known as VIPERs
WisdomTree Investments

See also[edit]

Enhanced indexing
Pension fund
Separately managed account

References[edit]


^ "Introduction to Exchange-Traded Funds", Investopedia
^ "Exchange-Traded Funds (ETFs)". U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. Retrieved November 8, 2013. 
^ a b c d e f g h i Exchange-Traded Funds, SEC Release Nos. 33-8901, IC-28193, 73 Fed. Reg. 14618 (March 11, 2008).
^ State Street Global Advisors and Knowledge@Wharton, ETFs Changing the Way Advisors Do Business, According to State Street and Wharton Study, Business Wire (June 10, 2008).
^ a b The Impact of Exchange Traded Products on the Financial Advisory Industry: A Joint Study of State Street Global Advisors and Knowledge@Wharton (2008).
^ a b c d e Weinberg, Ari I. (6 December 2015). "Should You Fear the ETF? ETFs are scaring regulators and investors: Here are the dangers—real and perceived". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 7 December 2015. 
^ SPDR ETFs: Basics of Product Structure SSGA
^ a b c d e Actively Managed Exchange-Traded Funds, SEC Release No. IC-25258, 66 Fed. Reg. 57614 (November 8, 2001).
^ PowerShares Capital Management LLC, et al.; Notice of Application, Release No. IC-28140 (February 1, 2008), 73 Fed. Reg. 7328 (February 7, 2008) (notice); PowerShares Capital Management LLC, Release No. IC-28171 (February 27, 2008) (order). The SEC issued orders to Bear Stearns Asset Management, Inc., Barclays Global Fund Advisors, and WisdomTree Trust on the same day.
^ American Stock Exchange Lists First Actively-Managed Exchange Traded Fund (March 25, 2008).
^ a b c ETFConnect, "Index ETFs – Know Your Funds" (visited April 7, 2008).
^ Peaceful Gains. "A List of exchange-traded funds". Retrieved October 23, 2009. 
^ a b Gastineau, Gary (2002). The Exchange-Traded Funds Manual. John Wiley and Sons. p. 32. ISBN 978-0-471-21894-4. 
^ Carrel, Lawrence (2008), ETFs for the Long Run, John Wiley & Sons, ISBN 978-0-470-13894-6
^ Jennifer Bayot (December 10, 2004). "Nathan Most Is Dead at 90; Investment Fund Innovator". New York Times. Retrieved April 23, 2008. 
^ Wiandt, Jim; William McClatchy (2002). Exchange Traded Funds. John Wiley and Sons. p. 82. ISBN 0-471-22513-4. 
^ Fabozzi, Frank (2003). The Handbook of Financial Instruments. John Wiley and Sons. p. 532. ISBN 0-471-22092-2. 
^ Ferri, Richard A. (2008). The ETF Book, John Wiley and Sons, 191 ISBN 0-470-13063-6.
^ "ETF League Table as of Jan. 21, 2014". IndexUniverse. 
^ U.S. ETF Assets Hit $2 Trillion Milestone - Yahoo Finance
^ American Stock Exchange, ETFs – Individual Investor (visited April 7, 2008).
^ [ETF Statistics For June 2012: Actively Managed Assets Less Than 1% http://etfdailynews.com/2012/07/10/etf-statistics-for-june-2012-actively-managed-assets-less-than-1/]
^ The Case Against Leveraged ETFs, Seeking Alpha (May 17, 2007).
^ [1], Revenue Shares (July 10, 2015).
^ "Our Take on the Bond ETF Dilemma". News.morningstar.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ Stacy L. Fuller, The Evolution of Actively Managed Exchange-Traded Funds, Review of Securities & Commodities Regulation (April 16, 2008).
^ Banner Year of Dividend Growth Sends Cash to Dividend ETFs - Yahoo Finance
^ "Do You Need a Sector Fund?". Morningstar. 
^ Bond ETF Definition
^ "Indicators for Trading in Government Bond ETFs". Tradingmarkets.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "Bond ETFs: A Viable Alternative". Investopedia.com. September 19, 2009. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "Benchmark Asset Management Company conceptualises Gold ETF". Etfglobalinvestor.net. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "Largest ETFs: Top 25 ETFs By Market Cap". ETFdb. Retrieved November 3, 2010. 
^ Michael Sackheim, Michael Schmidtberger & James Munsell, DB Commodity Index Tracking Fund: An Innovative Exchange-Traded Fund, Futures Industry (May/June 2006).
^ Koyfman, Yevgeniy (August 21, 2009). "No Gas: Barclays Halts Issuance of Natural Gas ETN". Indexuniverse.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ tom Lauricella (November 2, 2009). "Gold Mutual Funds Vs. Gold ETFs: It Depends on the Goal". Online.wsj.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "The Future of Commodity ETFs". News.morningstar.com. August 25, 2009. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ Jaffe, Chuck. "Bear Stearns Current Yield (YYY)". The Seattle Time. 
^ David Hoffman, Active ETFs are, well, less active; Dynamics of trading translate into little active management, Investment News (April 21, 2008).
^ Tran, Hung. "MINT Tops BOND As Biggest Active ETF". IndexUniverse. 
^ AlphaBaskets.com report on active vs. index ETFs, AlphaBaskets.com (April 11, 2011).
^ a b "Buttonwood: Against the odds". The Economist. 
^ "All The HOLDRS Are Now History, NYSE Says". ETF.com. 
^ Palash R. Ghosh (August 18, 2005). "HOLDRs Vs. ETFs: What Investors Should Know". Investment Advisor. Summit Business Media. Retrieved January 8, 2011. 
^ Staff, Investopedia (2007-11-04). "Inverse ETF". Investopedia. Retrieved 2017-02-28. 
^ "ProFunds readies first leveraged ETFs - ETF Investing". MarketWatch. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "RYDEX ETF TRUST (Form: 485APOS, Received: 11/08/2006 16:27:55)". Esignal.brand.edgar-online.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ http://olympiainv.com/Memos/ETFs.pdf
^ Maxey, Daisy (August 4, 2009). "Fidelity the Latest to Caution on ETFs". Online.wsj.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "A Guide To Shorting Leveraged ETFs". www.signalplot.com. 
^ Leung, Tim (2014). "Implied Volatility of Leveraged ETF Options". Applied Mathematical Finance, Taylor & Francis. SSRN 2164518 .  Check date values in: |access-date= (help); Missing or empty |url= (help); |access-date= requires |url= (help)
^ https://www.reuters.com/article/us-sec-etfs-idUSKCN18C2RO
^ John M. Baker, Creation Units and the Rise of Exchange-Traded Funds, Investment Adviser (July 2000).
^ Mutual Fund Fees Jump 5 Percent on moneywatch.bnet.com
^ Fidelity Offers iShares ETFs Commission-Free on news.morningstar.com
^ Yates, Tristan. "Tristan Yates: What Can we Learn from the 2008 Leveraged ETF Collapse?". Tradingmarkets.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ Dan Culloton, Are ETFs Really More Tax-Efficient Than Mutual Funds? Morningstar (February 14, 2006).
^ The Problem With Vanguard VIPERs ETFs (December 29, 2009).
^ Vanguard ETFs have Different Tax Considerations Than Other ETFs (December 29, 2009).
^ ETF Tax Efficiency (December 29, 2009).
^ Steve Lodge (April 16, 2010). "Are ETF dividends taxed differently? - Yahoo! UK & Ireland Finance". Uk.finance.yahoo.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ Gastineau, Gary (2002). The Exchange-Traded Funds Manual. John Wiley and Sons. p. 227. ISBN 978-0-471-21894-4. 
^ Larry Connors, "Trading Covered Calls with ETFs", Tradingmarkets (March 4, 2008).
^ a b Kirilenko, Andrei; Kyle, Albert S.; Samadi, Mehrdad; Tuzun, Tugkan (May 5, 2014), The Flash Crash: The Impact of High Frequency Trading on an Electronic Market (PDF), retrieved 24 April 2015 
^ Avellaneda and Zhang, “Path-Dependence of Leveraged ETF Returns” SIAM J. of Financial Math, Vol. 1, pp. 586–603 2013. https://www.math.nyu.edu/faculty/avellane/SIAMLETFS.pdf.pdf
^ Guo and Leung, “Understanding the Tracking Errors of Commodity Leveraged ETFs” SSRN, 2013. http://papers.ssrn.com/sol3/papers.cfm?abstract_id=2389411
^ Amount as of July 2015; figure taken from the home page of http://www.spdrgoldshares.com/.
^ a b John Rubino, “Emerging Threat Funds?” CFA Magazine, September–October 2011. pp. 30–33.
^ Stephen Kovaka, Just Say No to the Silver ETF, SilverSeek.com (April 27, 2007)
^ Theodore Butler, The Smoking Gun, SilverSeek.com (August 22, 2008)
^ Global Financial Stability Report: Durable Financial Stability: Getting There from Here, April 2011
^ Financial Stability Board, “Potential financial stability issues arising from recent trends in Exchange-Traded Funds (ETFs)”, April 2011.
^ International Monetary Fund, Global Financial Stability Report: Durable Financial Stability: Getting There from Here, April 2011.
^ Srichander Ramaswamy, “Market structures and systemic risks of exchange-traded funds.” Working paper 343, April 2011. Bank for International Settlements.
^ John C. Bogle, 'Value' Strategies, Wall Street Journal (February 9, 2007).
^ Ian Salisbury, Some ETFs Fall Short on Pricing; Certain Trades Slip Below Value of Holdings, Wall Street Journal (November 21, 2008).
^ ETFs Were Wider Off the Mark in 2009, Wall Street Journal (February 19, 2010).
^ Wilfred Dellva, Exchange-Traded Funds Not for Everyone, Journal of Financial Planning (April 2001).


Further reading[edit]

Carrell, Lawrence. ETFs for the Long Run: What They Are, How They Work, and Simple Strategies for Successful Long-Term Investing. JW Wiley, 2008. ISBN 978-0-470-13894-6
Ferri, Richard A. The ETF Book: All You Need to Know About Exchange-Traded Funds. Wiley, 2009. ISBN 0-470-53746-9
Humphries, William. Leveraged ETFs: The Trojan Horse Has Passed the Margin-Rule Gates. 34 Seattle U.L. Rev. 299 (2010), available at [2].
Koesterich, Russ. The ETF Strategist: Balancing Risk and Reward for Superior Returns. Portfolio, 2008. ISBN 978-1-59184-207-1
Lemke, Thomas P; Lins, Gerald T. & McGuire, W. John. Regulation of Exchange-Traded Funds. Matthew Bender, 2015. ISBN 978-0-7698-9131-6

External links[edit]

The ETF Hall of Fame: 25 People Who Revolutionized the ETF Industry—ETF Database
Exchange Traded Funds (ETF)—Johannesburg Stock Exchange (JSE)
Exchange Traded Funds (ETF)—London Stock Exchange (LSE)
Exchange Traded Funds (ETFs) & Index Funds—NASDAQ Stock Market
Exchange Traded Products—New York Stock Exchange
Exchange Traded Funds (ETF)—Toronto Stock Exchange (TSX)
Exchange Traded Funds (ETF)—Australian Stock Exchange (ASX)
Exchange Traded Funds (ETFs) listed on XETRA or on Nasdaq OMX Nordic—ETFSverige.se information website
Using ETFs in investment portfolios—Exchange Traded Fund Basics, Investor Knowledge Centre (Vanguard Investments Australia)
Benefits of ETFs—Australian ETF Information Network
Cross-referenced list of funds—U.S., Canadian, and U.K. ETFs organized by industry, region, and investment strategy
Global ETF browser—Free ETF Screener based on fundamentals
Find ETFs by Stock Tool—Free tool for finding ETFs by its stocks
Worldwide Exchange Traded Funds—Investing.com global ETFs by category







v
t
e


Investment management



Investment fund
structures



Common contractual fund
Exchange-traded fund
Fond commun de placement
Fund of funds
Index fund
Investment trust
Hedge fund
Listed investment company
Mutual fund
Offshore fund
Open-ended investment company
Pension Fund
Private equity fund
Real estate investment trust
Royalty trust
SICAV
Umbrella fund
Unit investment trust
Unit trust
Unitised insurance fund





Investment styles



Active / passive management
Impact investing
Manager of managers
Socially responsible investing
Value / growth investing





Theory · Terminology



Closed-end fund
Efficient-market hypothesis
Net asset value
Open-end fund





Related topics



Alternative investment
Asset management firms
Robo-advisor
Returns-based style analysis
Traditional investments
UCITS










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Exchange-traded_fund&oldid=792170490"					
Categories: Exchange-traded fundsHidden categories: CS1 errors: datesPages using web citations with no URLPages using citations with accessdate and no URLUse mdy dates from August 2014All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from June 2017Articles with unsourced statements from April 2015Articles with unsourced statements from March 2013Articles with unsourced statements from August 2010 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةБългарскиBosanskiCatalàČeštinaDeutschEestiEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Bahasa IndonesiaItalianoLietuviųNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsРусскийSuomiSvenskaதமிழ்中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 24 July 2017, at 22:07.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Exchange-traded fund - Wikipedia





















 






Exchange-traded fund

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

An exchange-traded fund (ETF) is an investment fund traded on stock exchanges, much like stocks.[1][2] An ETF holds assets such as stocks, commodities, or bonds and generally operates with an arbitrage mechanism designed to keep it trading close to its net asset value,[3] although deviations can occasionally occur. Most ETFs track an index, such as a stock index or bond index. ETFs may be attractive as investments because of their low costs, tax efficiency, and stock-like features.[4][5] By 2013, ETFs had become the most popular type of exchange-traded product.[citation needed]
ETF distributors only buy or sell ETFs directly from or to authorized participants, which are large broker-dealers with whom they have entered into agreements—and then, only in creation units, which are large blocks of tens of thousands of ETF shares, usually exchanged in-kind with baskets of the underlying securities. Authorized participants may wish to invest in the ETF shares for the long-term, but they usually act as market makers on the open market, using their ability to exchange creation units with their underlying securities to provide liquidity of the ETF shares and help ensure that their intraday market price approximates the net asset value of the underlying assets.[3] Other investors, such as individuals using a retail broker, trade ETF shares on this secondary market.
An ETF combines the valuation feature of a mutual fund or unit investment trust, which can be bought or sold at the end of each trading day for its net asset value, with the tradability feature of a closed-end fund, which trades throughout the trading day at prices that may be more or less than its net asset value. Closed-end funds are not considered to be ETFs, even though they are funds and are traded on an exchange. ETFs have been available in the US since 1993 and in Europe since 1999. ETFs traditionally have been index funds, but in 2008 the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission began to authorize the creation of actively managed ETFs.[3]
ETFs offer both tax efficiency and lower transaction costs. More than US$2 trillion were invested in ETFs in the United States between when they were introduced in 1993 and 2015. By the end of 2015, ETFs offered "1,800 different products, covering almost every conceivable market sector, niche and trading strategy".[6]



Contents


1 Structure

1.1 United States


2 History
3 Investment uses
4 Types

4.1 Index ETFs
4.2 Stock ETFs
4.3 Bond ETFs
4.4 Commodity ETFs
4.5 Currency ETFs
4.6 Actively managed ETFs
4.7 Exchange-traded grantor trusts
4.8 Inverse ETFs
4.9 Leveraged ETFs


5 ETFs compared to mutual funds

5.1 Costs
5.2 Taxation
5.3 Trading


6 Regulation
7 Risks

7.1 Tracking error
7.2 Effects on stability
7.3 Regulatory risk
7.4 Counterparty risk


8 Liquidity
9 Criticism
10 Issuers of ETFs
11 See also
12 References
13 Further reading
14 External links



Structure[edit]
An ETF is a type of fund. It owns assets (bonds, stocks, gold bars, etc.) and divides ownership of itself into shares that are held by shareholders. The details of the structure (such as a corporation or trust) will vary by country, and even within one country there may be multiple possible structures.[7] The shareholders indirectly own the assets of the fund, and they will typically get an annual report. Shareholders are entitled to a share of the profits, such as interest or dividends, and they may get a residual value in case the fund is liquidated. Their ownership interest in the fund can easily be bought and sold.
ETFs are similar in many ways to traditional mutual funds, except that shares in an ETF can be bought and sold throughout the day like stocks on a stock exchange through a broker-dealer. Unlike traditional mutual funds, ETFs do not sell or redeem their individual shares at net asset value (NAV). Instead, financial institutions purchase and redeem ETF shares directly from the ETF, but only in large blocks (such as 50,000 shares), called creation units. Purchases and redemptions of the creation units generally are in kind, with the institutional investor contributing or receiving a basket of securities of the same type and proportion held by the ETF, although some ETFs may require or permit a purchasing or redeeming shareholder to substitute cash for some or all of the securities in the basket of assets.[3]
The ability to purchase and redeem creation units gives ETFs an arbitrage mechanism intended to minimize the potential deviation between the market price and the net asset value of ETF shares. Existing ETFs have transparent portfolios, so institutional investors will know exactly what portfolio assets they must assemble if they wish to purchase a creation unit, and the exchange disseminates the updated net asset value of the shares throughout the trading day, typically at 15-second intervals.[3]
If there is strong investor demand for an ETF, its share price will temporarily rise above its net asset value per share, giving arbitrageurs an incentive to purchase additional creation units from the ETF and sell the component ETF shares in the open market. The additional supply of ETF shares reduces the market price per share, generally eliminating the premium over net asset value. A similar process applies when there is weak demand for an ETF: its shares trade at a discount from net asset value.
United States[edit]
In the United States, most ETFs are structured as open-end management investment companies (the same structure used by mutual funds and money market funds), although a few ETFs, including some of the largest ones, are structured as unit investment trusts. ETFs structured as open-end funds have greater flexibility in constructing a portfolio and are not prohibited from participating in securities lending programs or from using futures and options in achieving their investment objectives.[8]
Under existing regulations, a new ETF must receive an order from the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC), giving it relief from provisions of the Investment Company Act of 1940 that would not otherwise allow the ETF structure. In 2008, the SEC proposed rules that would allow the creation of ETFs without the need for exemptive orders. Under the SEC proposal, an ETF would be defined as a registered open-end management investment company that:

issues (or redeems) creation units in exchange for the deposit (or delivery) of basket assets the current value of which is disseminated per share by a national securities exchange at regular intervals during the trading day
identifies itself as an ETF in any sales literature
issues shares that are approved for listing and trading on a securities exchange
discloses each business day on its publicly available web site the prior business day's net asset value and closing market price of the fund's shares, and the premium or discount of the closing market price against the net asset value of the fund's shares as a percentage of net asset value
either is an index fund, or discloses each business day on its publicly available web site the identities and weighting of the component securities and other assets held by the fund[3]

The SEC rule proposal would allow ETFs either to be index funds or to be fully transparent actively managed funds. Historically, all ETFs in the United States had been index funds.[citation needed] In 2008, however, the SEC began issuing exemptive orders to fully transparent actively managed ETFs. The first such order was to PowerShares Actively Managed Exchange-Traded Fund Trust,[9] and the first actively managed ETF in the United States was the Bear Stearns Current Yield Fund, a short-term income fund that began trading on the American Stock Exchange under the symbol YYY on March 25, 2008.[10] The SEC rule proposal indicates that the SEC may still consider future applications for exemptive orders for actively managed ETFs that do not satisfy the proposed rule's transparency requirements.[3]
Some ETFs invest primarily in commodities or commodity-based instruments, such as crude oil and precious metals. Although these commodity ETFs are similar in practice to ETFs that invest in securities, they are not investment companies under the Investment Company Act of 1940.[3]
Publicly traded grantor trusts, such as Merrill Lynch's HOLDRs securities, are sometimes considered to be ETFs, although they lack many of the characteristics of other ETFs. Investors in a grantor trust have a direct interest in the underlying basket of securities, which does not change except to reflect corporate actions such as stock splits and mergers. Funds of this type are not investment companies under the Investment Company Act of 1940.[11]
As of 2009, there were approximately 1,500 exchange-traded funds traded on US exchanges.[12] This count uses the wider definition of ETF, including HOLDRs and closed-end funds.
History[edit]
ETFs had their genesis in 1989 with Index Participation Shares, an S&P 500 proxy that traded on the American Stock Exchange and the Philadelphia Stock Exchange. This product, however, was short-lived after a lawsuit by the Chicago Mercantile Exchange was successful in stopping sales in the United States.[13]
A similar product, Toronto Index Participation Shares, started trading on the Toronto Stock Exchange (TSE) in 1990. The shares, which tracked the TSE 35 and later the TSE 100 indices, proved to be popular. The popularity of these products led the American Stock Exchange to try to develop something that would satisfy SEC regulation in the United States.[13]
Nathan Most and Steven Bloom, under the direction of Ivers Riley, designed and developed Standard & Poor's Depositary Receipts (NYSE Arca: SPY), which were introduced in January 1993.[14][15] Known as SPDRs or "Spiders", the fund became the largest ETF in the world. In May 1995 they introduced the MidCap SPDRs (NYSE Arca: MDY).
Barclays Global Investors, a subsidiary of Barclays PLC, in conjunction with MSCI and as its underwriter, a Boston-based third party distributor, Funds Distributor Inc., entered the market in 1996 with World Equity Benchmark Shares (WEBS), which became iShares MSCI Index Fund Shares. WEBS tracked MSCI country indices, originally 17, of the funds' index provider, Morgan Stanley. WEBS were particularly innovative because they gave casual investors easy access to foreign markets. While SPDRs were organized as unit investment trusts, WEBS were set up as a mutual fund, the first of their kind.[16][17]
In 1998, State Street Global Advisors introduced "Sector Spiders", which follow nine sectors of the S&P 500.[18] Also in 1998, the "Dow Diamonds" (NYSE Arca: DIA) were introduced, tracking the famous Dow Jones Industrial Average. In 1999, the influential "cubes" (NASDAQ: QQQ), were launched attempting to replicate the movement of the NASDAQ-100.
In 2000, Barclays Global Investors put a significant effort behind the ETF marketplace, with a strong emphasis on education and distribution to reach long-term investors. The iShares line was launched in early 2000. Within five years iShares had surpassed the assets of any other ETF competitor in the U.S. and Europe. Barclays Global Investors was sold to BlackRock in 2009.
The Vanguard Group entered the market in 2001. The first fund was Vanguard Total Stock Market ETF (NYSE Arca: VTI), which has become quite popular, and they made the Vanguard Extended Market Index ETF (VXF). Some of Vanguard's ETFs are a share class of an existing mutual fund.
iShares made the first bond funds in July 2002, based on US Treasury bonds and corporate bonds, such as iShares iBoxx $ Invst Grade Crp Bond (LQD). They also created a TIPS fund. In 2007, they introduced funds based on junk and muni bonds; about the same time SPDR and Vanguard got in gear and created several of their bond funds.
Since then ETFs have proliferated, tailored to an increasingly specific array of regions, sectors, commodities, bonds, futures, and other asset classes. As of January 2014, there were over 1,500 ETFs traded in the U.S., with over $1.7 trillion in assets.[19] In December 2014, U.S. ETF assets went above $2 trillion.[20]
Investment uses[edit]
ETFs generally provide the easy diversification, low expense ratios, and tax efficiency of index funds, while still maintaining all the features of ordinary stock, such as limit orders, short selling, and options. Because ETFs can be economically acquired, held, and disposed of, some investors invest in ETF shares as a long-term investment for asset allocation purposes, while other investors trade ETF shares frequently to implement market timing investment strategies.[8] Among the advantages of ETFs are the following:[11][21]

Lower costs: ETFs generally have lower costs than other investment products because most ETFs are not actively managed and because ETFs are insulated from the costs of having to buy and sell securities to accommodate shareholder purchases and redemptions. ETFs typically have lower marketing, distribution and accounting expenses, and most ETFs do not have 12b-1 fees.
Buying and selling flexibility: ETFs can be bought and sold at current market prices at any time during the trading day, unlike mutual funds and unit investment trusts, which can only be traded at the end of the trading day. As publicly traded securities, their shares can be purchased on margin and sold short, enabling the use of hedging strategies, and traded using stop orders and limit orders, which allow investors to specify the price points at which they are willing to trade.
Tax efficiency: ETFs generally generate relatively low capital gains, because they typically have low turnover of their portfolio securities. While this is an advantage they share with other index funds, their tax efficiency is further enhanced because they do not have to sell securities to meet investor redemptions.
Market exposure and diversification: ETFs provide an economical way to rebalance portfolio allocations and to "equitize" cash by investing it quickly. An index ETF inherently provides diversification across an entire index. ETFs offer exposure to a diverse variety of markets, including broad-based indices, broad-based international and country-specific indices, industry sector-specific indices, bond indices, and commodities.
Transparency: ETFs, whether index funds or actively managed, have transparent portfolios and are priced at frequent intervals throughout the trading day.

Some of these advantages derive from the status of most ETFs as index funds.
Types[edit]
For more details on this topic, see List of American exchange-traded funds.
Index ETFs[edit]
Most ETFs are index funds that attempt to replicate the performance of a specific index. Indexes may be based on stocks, bonds, commodities, or currencies. An index fund seeks to track the performance of an index by holding in its portfolio either the contents of the index or a representative sample of the securities in the index.[8] As of June 2012, in the United States, about 1200 index ETFs exist, with about 50 actively managed ETFs. Index ETF assets are about $1.2 trillion, compared with about $7 billion for actively managed ETFs.[22] Some index ETFs, known as leveraged ETFs or inverse ETFs, use investments in derivatives to seek a return that corresponds to a multiple of, or the inverse (opposite) of, the daily performance of the index.[23]
Some index ETFs invest 100% of their assets proportionately in the securities underlying an index, a manner of investing called replication. Other index ETFs use representative sampling, investing 80% to 95% of their assets in the securities of an underlying index and investing the remaining 5% to 20% of their assets in other holdings, such as futures, option and swap contracts, and securities not in the underlying index, that the fund's adviser believes will help the ETF to achieve its investment objective. There are various ways the ETF can be weighted, such as equal weighting or revenue weighting.[24] For index ETFs that invest in indices with thousands of underlying securities, some index ETFs employ "aggressive sampling" and invest in only a tiny percentage of the underlying securities.[25][26]
Stock ETFs[edit]
The first and most popular ETFs track stocks. Many funds track national indexes; for example, Vanguard Total Stock Market ETF NYSE Arca: VTI tracks the CRSP U.S. Total Market Index, and several funds track the S&P 500, both indexes for US stocks. Other funds own stocks from many countries; for example, Vanguard Total International Stock Index NYSE Arca: VXUS tracks the MSCI All Country World ex USA Investable Market Index, while the iShares MSCI EAFE Index NYSE Arca: EFA tracks the MSCI EAFE Index, both "world ex-US" indexes.
Stock ETFs can have different styles, such as large-cap, small-cap, growth, value, et cetera. For example, the S&P 500 index is large- and mid-cap, so the SPDR S&P 500 ETF will not contain small-cap stocks. Others such as iShares Russell 2000 are mainly for small-cap stocks. There are many style ETFs such as iShares Russell 1000 Growth and iShares Russell 1000 Value. ETFs focusing on dividends have been popular in the first few years of the 2010s decade, such as iShares Select Dividend.[27]
ETFs can also be sector funds. These can be broad sectors, like finance and technology, or specific niche areas, like green power. They can also be for one country or global. Critics have said that no one needs a sector fund.[28] This point is not really specific to ETFs; the issues are the same as with mutual funds. The funds are popular since people can put their money into the latest fashionable trend, rather than investing in boring areas with no "cachet".
Bond ETFs[edit]
Exchange-traded funds that invest in bonds are known as bond ETFs.[29] They thrive during economic recessions because investors pull their money out of the stock market and into bonds (for example, government treasury bonds or those issued by companies regarded as financially stable). Because of this cause and effect relationship, the performance of bond ETFs may be indicative of broader economic conditions.[30] There are several advantages to bond ETFs such as the reasonable trading commissions, but this benefit can be negatively offset by fees if bought and sold through a third party.[31]
Commodity ETFs[edit]
Commodity ETFs (CETFs or ETCs) invest in commodities, such as precious metals, agricultural products, or hydrocarbons. Among the first commodity ETFs were gold exchange-traded funds, which have been offered in a number of countries. The idea of a Gold ETF was first officially conceptualised by Benchmark Asset Management Company Private Ltd in India when they filed a proposal with the SEBI in May 2002.[32] The first gold exchange-traded fund was Gold Bullion Securities launched on the ASX in 2003, and the first silver exchange-traded fund was iShares Silver Trust launched on the NYSE in 2006. As of November 2010 a commodity ETF, namely SPDR Gold Shares, was the second-largest ETF by market capitalization.[33]
However, generally commodity ETFs are index funds tracking non-security indices. Because they do not invest in securities, commodity ETFs are not regulated as investment companies under the Investment Company Act of 1940 in the United States, although their public offering is subject to SEC review and they need an SEC no-action letter under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. They may, however, be subject to regulation by the Commodity Futures Trading Commission.[34][35]
The earliest commodity ETFs, such as SPDR Gold Shares (NYSE Arca: GLD) and iShares Silver Trust (NYSE Arca: SLV), owned the physical commodity (e.g., gold and silver bars). Similar to these are ETFS Physical Palladium (NYSE Arca: PALL) and ETFS Physical Platinum (NYSE Arca: PPLT). However, most ETCs implement a futures trading strategy, which may produce quite different results from owning the commodity.
Commodity ETFs trade just like shares, are simple and efficient and provide exposure to an ever-increasing range of commodities and commodity indices, including energy, metals, softs and agriculture. However, it is important for an investor to realize that there are often other factors that affect the price of a commodity ETF that might not be immediately apparent. For example, buyers of an oil ETF such as USO might think that as long as oil goes up, they will profit roughly linearly. What isn't clear to the novice investor is the method by which these funds gain exposure to their underlying commodities. In the case of many commodity funds, they simply roll so-called front-month futures contracts from month to month. This does give exposure to the commodity, but subjects the investor to risks involved in different prices along the term structure, such as a high cost to roll.[36][37]
ETC can also refer to exchange-traded notes, which are not exchange-traded funds.
Currency ETFs[edit]
In 2005, Rydex Investments launched the first currency ETF called the Euro Currency Trust (NYSE Arca: FXE) in New York. Since then Rydex has launched a series of funds tracking all major currencies under their brand CurrencyShares. In 2007 Deutsche Bank's db x-trackers launched EONIA Total Return Index ETF in Frankfurt tracking the euro, and later in 2008 the Sterling Money Market ETF (LSE: XGBP) and US Dollar Money Market ETF (LSE: XUSD) in London. In 2009, ETF Securities launched the world's largest FX platform tracking the MSFXSM Index covering 18 long or short USD ETC vs. single G10 currencies. The funds are total return products where the investor gets access to the FX spot change, local institutional interest rates and a collateral yield.
Actively managed ETFs[edit]
See also: List of American exchange-traded funds § Active ETFs
Most ETFs are index funds, but some ETFs do have active management. Actively managed ETFs have been offered in the United States only since 2008. The first active ETF was Bear Stearns Current Yield ETF (Ticker: YYY).[38] Currently, actively managed ETFs are fully transparent, publishing their current securities portfolios on their web sites daily. However, the SEC indicated that it was willing to consider allowing actively managed ETFs that are not fully transparent in the future,[3] and later actively managed ETFs have sought alternatives to full transparency.
The fully transparent nature of existing ETFs means that an actively managed ETF is at risk from arbitrage activities by market participants who might choose to front run its trades as daily reports of the ETF's holdings reveals its manager's trading strategy. The initial actively managed equity ETFs addressed this problem by trading only weekly or monthly. Actively managed debt ETFs, which are less susceptible to front-running, trade their holdings more frequently.[39]
The actively managed ETF market has largely been seen as more favorable to bond funds, because concerns about disclosing bond holdings are less pronounced, there are fewer product choices, and there is increased appetite for bond products. Pimco's Enhanced Short Duration ETF NYSE: MINT is the largest actively managed ETF, with approximately $3.93 billion in assets as of May 16, 2014.[40]
Actively managed ETFs grew faster in their first three years of existence than index ETFs did in their first three years of existence. As track records develop, many see actively managed ETFs as a significant competitive threat to actively managed mutual funds.[41] However, many academic studies have questioned the value of active management. Jack Bogle of Vanguard Group wrote an article in the Financial Analysts Journal where he estimated that higher fees as well as hidden costs (such a more trading fees and lower return from holding cash) reduce returns for investors by around 2.66 percentage points a year "a huge differential considering that long-term real returns from American equities have been 6.45%."[42] Even without considering hidden costs, high fees negatively affect long-term performance. In another Financial Analysts Journal article, Nobel laureate, Bill Sharpe "calculated that someone who saved via a low-cost fund would have a standard of living in retirement 20% higher than someone who saved in a high-cost fund".[42]
Exchange-traded grantor trusts[edit]
An exchange-traded grantor trust was used to give a direct interest in a static basket of stocks selected from a particular industry. Such products have some properties in common with ETFs—low costs, low turnover, and tax efficiency:but are generally regarded as separate from ETFs. The leading example was Holding Company Depositary Receipts, or HOLDRs, a proprietary Merrill Lynch product, but these have now disappeared from the scene.[11][43][44] SPDR Gold Shares is a grantor trust.
Inverse ETFs[edit]
Main article: Inverse exchange-traded fund
Inverse ETFs are constructed by using various derivatives for the purpose of profiting from a decline in the value of the underlying benchmark. It is a similar type of investment to holding several short positions or using a combination of advanced investment strategies to profit from falling prices. Many inverse ETFs use daily futures as their underlying benchmark.[45]
Leveraged ETFs[edit]
Leveraged exchange-traded funds (LETFs or leveraged ETFs) are a type of ETF that attempt to achieve returns that are more sensitive to market movements than non-leveraged ETFs.[46] Leveraged index ETFs are often marketed as bull or bear funds. A leveraged bull ETF fund might for example attempt to achieve daily returns that are 2x or 3x more pronounced than the Dow Jones Industrial Average or the S&P 500. A leveraged inverse (bear) ETF fund on the other hand may attempt to achieve returns that are -2x or -3x the daily index return, meaning that it will gain double or triple the loss of the market. Leveraged ETFs require the use of financial engineering techniques, including the use of equity swaps, derivatives and rebalancing, and re-indexing to achieve the desired return.[47] The most common way to construct leveraged ETFs is by trading futures contracts.
The rebalancing and re-indexing of leveraged ETFs may have considerable costs when markets are volatile.[48][49] The rebalancing problem is that the fund manager incurs trading losses because he needs to buy when the index goes up and sell when the index goes down in order to maintain a fixed leverage ratio. A 2.5% daily change in the index will for example reduce value of a -2x bear fund by about 0.18% per day, which means that about a third of the fund may be wasted in trading losses within a year (1-(1-0.18%)252=36.5%). Investors may however circumvent this problem by buying or writing futures directly, accepting a varying leverage ratio.[citation needed] A more reasonable estimate of daily market changes is 0.5%, which leads to a 2.6% yearly loss of principal in a 3x leveraged fund.
The re-indexing problem of leveraged ETFs stems from the arithmetic effect of volatility of the underlying index.[50] Take, for example, an index that begins at 100 and a 2X fund based on that index that also starts at 100. In a first trading period (for example, a day), the index rises 10% to 110. The 2X fund will then rise 20% to 120. The index then drops back to 100 (a drop of 9.09%), so that it is now even. The drop in the 2X fund will be 18.18% (2*9.09). But 18.18% of 120 is 21.82. This puts the value of the 2X fund at 98.18. Even though the index is unchanged after two trading periods, an investor in the 2X fund would have lost 1.82%. This decline in value can be even greater for inverse funds (leveraged funds with negative multipliers such as -1, -2, or -3). It always occurs when the change in value of the underlying index changes direction. And the decay in value increases with volatility of the underlying index.
The effect of leverage is also reflected in the pricing of options written on leveraged ETFs. In particular, the terminal payoff of a leveraged ETF European/American put or call depends on the realized variance (hence the path) of the underlying index. The impact of leverage ratio can also be observed from the implied volatility surfaces of leveraged ETF options.[51] For instance, the implied volatility curves of inverse leveraged ETFs (with negative multipliers such as -1, -2, or -3) are commonly observed to be increasing in strike, which is characteristically different from the implied volatility smiles or skews seen for index options or non-leveraged ETF options.
The SEC, in May 2017, granted approval of a pair of 4x leveraged ETF related to S&P 500 Futures, before rescinding the approval a few weeks later. The decision concerns two potential products: ForceShares Daily 4X US Market Futures Long Fund, which would have listed under the ticker UP, and ForceShares Daily 4X US Market Futures Short Fund, with the ticker DOWN.[52]
ETFs compared to mutual funds[edit]
Costs[edit]
ETFs have a reputation for lower costs than traditional mutual funds. This will be evident as a lower expense ratio. This is mainly from two factors, the fact that most ETFs are index funds and some advantages of the ETF structure. However, this needs to be compared in each case, since some index mutual funds also have a very low expense ratio, and some ETFs' expense ratios are relatively high. An index fund is much simpler to run, since it does not require some security selection, and can be largely done by computer. Not only does an ETF have lower shareholder-related expenses, but because it does not have to invest cash contributions or fund cash redemptions, an ETF does not have to maintain a cash reserve for redemptions and saves on brokerage expenses.[53] Mutual funds can charge 1% to 3%, or more; index fund expense ratios are generally lower, while ETFs are almost always less than 1%. Over the long term, these cost differences can compound into a noticeable difference.[54]
Because ETFs trade on an exchange, each transaction is generally subject to a brokerage commission. Commissions depend on the brokerage and which plan is chosen by the customer. For example, a typical flat fee schedule from an online brokerage firm in the United States ranges from $10 to $20, but it can be as low as $0 with discount brokers. Due to this commission cost, the amount invested has a great bearing; someone who wishes to invest $100 per month may have a significant percentage of their investment destroyed immediately, while for someone making a $200,000 investment, the commission cost may be negligible. Generally, mutual funds obtained directly from the fund company itself do not charge a brokerage fee. Thus, when low or no-cost transactions are available, ETFs become very competitive.[55]
The cost difference is more evident when compared with mutual funds that charge a front-end or back-end load as ETFs do not have loads at all. The redemption fee and short-term trading fees are examples of other fees associated with mutual funds that do not exist with ETFs. Traders should be cautious if they plan to trade inverse and leveraged ETFs for short periods of time. Close attention should be paid to transaction costs and daily performance rates as the potential combined compound loss can sometimes go unrecognized and offset potential gains over a longer period of time.[56]
Taxation[edit]
ETFs are structured for tax efficiency and can be more attractive than mutual funds. In the U.S., whenever a mutual fund realizes a capital gain that is not balanced by a realized loss, the mutual fund must distribute the capital gains to its shareholders. This can happen whenever the mutual fund sells portfolio securities, whether to reallocate its investments or to fund shareholder redemptions. These gains are taxable to all shareholders, even those who reinvest the gains distributions in more shares of the fund. In contrast, ETFs are not redeemed by holders (instead, holders simply sell their ETF shares on the stock market, as they would a stock, or effect a non-taxable redemption of a creation unit for portfolio securities), so that investors generally only realize capital gains when they sell their own shares or when the ETF trades to reflect changes in the underlying index.[8]
In most cases, ETFs are more tax-efficient than conventional mutual funds in the same asset classes or categories.[57] Because Vanguard's ETFs are a share-class of their mutual funds, they don't get all the tax advantages if there are net redemptions on the mutual fund shares.[58] Although they do not get all the tax advantages, they get an additional advantage from tax loss harvesting any capital losses from net redemptions.[59][60]
In the U.K., ETFs can be shielded from capital gains tax by placing them in an Individual Savings Account or self-invested personal pension, in the same manner as many other shares. Because UK-resident ETFs would be liable for UK corporation tax on non-UK dividends, most ETFs which hold non-UK companies sold to UK investors are issued in Ireland or Luxembourg.[61]
Trading[edit]
An important benefit of an ETF is the stock-like features offered. A mutual fund is bought or sold at the end of a day's trading, whereas ETFs can be traded whenever the market is open. Since ETFs trade on the market, investors can carry out the same types of trades that they can with a stock. For instance, investors can sell short, use a limit order, use a stop-loss order, buy on margin, and invest as much or as little money as they wish (there is no minimum investment requirement).[62] Also, many ETFs have the capability for options (puts and calls) to be written against them. Covered call strategies allow investors and traders to potentially increase their returns on their ETF purchases by collecting premiums (the proceeds of a call sale or write) on calls written against them. Mutual funds do not offer those features.[63]
Regulation[edit]
New regulations were put in place following the 2010 Flash Crash, when prices of ETFs and other stocks and options became volatile, with trading markets spiking[64]:1 and bids falling as low as a penny a share[6] in what the Commodity Futures Trading Commission (CFTC) investigation described as one of the most turbulent periods in the history of financial markets.[64]:1
These regulations proved to be inadequate to protect investors in the August 24, 2015 flash crash,[6] "when the price of many ETFs appeared to come unhinged from their underlying value". ETFs were consequently put under even greater scrutiny by regulators and investors.[6] Analysts at Morningstar claimed in December 2015 that "ETFs are a “digital-age technology” governed by “Depression-era legislation,”"[6]
Risks[edit]
Tracking error[edit]
The ETF tracking error is the difference between the returns of the ETF and its reference index or asset. A non-zero tracking error therefore represents a failure to replicate the reference as stated in the ETF prospectus. The tracking error is computed based on the prevailing price of the ETF and its reference. It is different than the premium/discount which is the difference between the ETF’s NAV (updated only once a day) and its market price. Tracking errors are more significant when the ETF provider uses strategies other than full replication of the underlying index. Some of the most liquid equity ETFs tend to have better tracking performance because the underlying is also sufficiently liquid, allowing for full replication.[65] In contrast, some ETFs, such as commodities ETFs and their leveraged ETFs, do not necessarily employ full replication because the physical assets cannot be stored easily or used to create a leveraged exposure, or the reference asset or index is illiquid.[66] Futures-based ETFs may also suffer from negative roll yields, as seen in the VIX futures market.
Effects on stability[edit]
ETFs that buy and hold commodities or futures of commodities have become popular. For example, SPDR Gold Shares ETF (GLD) has 21 million ounces in trust.[67] The silver ETF, SLV, is also very large. The commodity ETFs are in effect consumers of their target commodities, thereby affecting the price in a spurious fashion.[68][69][70] In the words of the IMF, “Some market participants believe the growing popularity of exchange-traded funds (ETFs) may have contributed to equity price appreciation in some emerging economies, and warn that leverage embedded in ETFs could pose financial stability risks if equity prices were to decline for a protracted period.”[71]
Regulatory risk[edit]
Synthetic ETFs are attracting regulatory attention from the FSB,[72] the IMF,[73] and the BIS.[74] Areas of concern include the lack of transparency in products and increasing complexity; conflicts of interest; and lack of regulatory compliance.
Counterparty risk[edit]
A synthetic ETF has counterparty risk, because the counterparty is contractually obligated to match the return on the index. The deal is arranged with collateral posted by the swap counterparty. A potential hazard is that the investment bank offering the ETF might post its own collateral, and that collateral could be of dubious quality. Furthermore, the investment bank could use its own trading desk as counterparty. These types of set-ups are not allowed under the European guidelines, Undertakings for Collective Investment in Transferable Securities (UCITS), so the investor should look for UCITS III-compliant funds.[68]
Liquidity[edit]
ETFs have a wide range of liquidity. Some funds are constantly traded, with tens of millions of shares per day changing hands, while others trade only once in a while, even not trading for some days. There are many funds that do not trade very often. This just means that most trading is conducted in the most popular funds. The most active funds (such as SPY, IWM, QQQ, et cetera) are very liquid, with high volume and tight spreads. In these cases, the investor is almost sure to get a "reasonable" price, even in difficult conditions. With other funds, it is worthwhile to take some care in execution. This does not mean that less popular funds are not a quality investment. This is in contrast with traditional mutual funds, where everyone who trades on the same day gets the same price.
Criticism[edit]
John C. Bogle, founder of the Vanguard Group, a leading issuer of index mutual funds (and, since Bogle's retirement, of ETFs), has argued that ETFs represent short-term speculation, that their trading expenses decrease returns to investors, and that most ETFs provide insufficient diversification. He concedes that a broadly diversified ETF that is held over time can be a good investment.[75]
ETFs are dependent on the efficacy of the arbitrage mechanism in order for their share price to track net asset value. While the average deviation between the daily closing price and the daily NAV of ETFs that track domestic indices is generally less than 2%, the deviations may be more significant for ETFs that track certain foreign indices.[8] The Wall Street Journal reported in November 2008, during a period of market turbulence, that some lightly traded ETFs frequently had deviations of 5% or more, exceeding 10% in a handful of cases, although even for these niche ETFs, the average deviation was only a little more than 1%. The trades with the greatest deviations tended to be made immediately after the market opened.[76]
According to a study on ETF returns in 2009 by Morgan Stanley, ETFs missed in 2009 their targets by an average of 1.25 percentage points, a gap more than twice as wide as the 0.52-percentage-point average they posted in 2008.[77] Part of this so-called tracking error is attributed to the proliferation of ETFs targeting exotic investments or areas where trading is less frequent, such as emerging-market stocks, future-contracts based commodity indices and junk bonds.[citation needed]
The tax advantages of ETFs are of no relevance for investors using tax-deferred accounts (or indeed, investors who are tax-exempt in the first place).[78] However, the lower expense ratios are proving difficult for the proponents of traditional mutual funds to overcome.
In a survey of investment professionals, the most frequently cited disadvantage of ETFs was the unknown, untested indices used by many ETFs, followed by the overwhelming number of choices.[5]
Some critics claim that ETFs can be, and have been, used to manipulate market prices, including having been used for short selling that has been asserted by some observers (including Jim Cramer of theStreet.com) to have contributed to the market collapse of 2008.
Issuers of ETFs[edit]
Main article: List of exchange-traded funds

AdvisorShares: actively managed ETFs only, majority owned by Fund.com
Banco Itau: issues itnow in Bovespa
Bips Investment Managers: issues Bips (Beta Investment Performance Securities)
BNP Paribas: issues EasyETFs
BlackRock: issues iShares
Boost ETP: issues short (inverse) and leveraged exchange-traded products including 3X equity and commodity products
Charles Schwab: offers several commission-free ETFs for its clients
Deutsche Bank: issues db x-trackers ETFs, as well as managing PowerShares DB commodity- and currency-based ETFs
ETF Securities: issues ETFs or specialised commodity ETCs
Franklin Templeton: Issues liberty line of ETFs
Global X Funds: issues ETFs
Guggenheim Funds: issues specialty Guggenheim Funds ETFs
Horizons ETFs Management (USA): issues the Covered Call ETF (HSPX)
Indo Premier Investment Management: issues Premier ETFs in Indonesia Stock Exchange
Invesco: issues PowerShares ETFs, as well as BLDRS based on American Depositary Receipts
Lyxor Asset Management: issues Lyxor ETFs
Merrill Lynch: issues HOLDRs
ProShares: U.S.-based firm offering alternative ETFs
Source UK Services: a European joint-venture between Bank of America Merrill Lynch, Goldman Sachs, Morgan Stanley, Nomura and J. P. Morgan issues ETFs and ETCs
State Street Global Advisors: issues SPDRs
Van Eck Global: issues Market Vectors ETFs
Vanguard Group: issues Vanguard ETFs, formerly known as VIPERs
WisdomTree Investments

See also[edit]

Enhanced indexing
Pension fund
Separately managed account

References[edit]


^ "Introduction to Exchange-Traded Funds", Investopedia
^ "Exchange-Traded Funds (ETFs)". U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. Retrieved November 8, 2013. 
^ a b c d e f g h i Exchange-Traded Funds, SEC Release Nos. 33-8901, IC-28193, 73 Fed. Reg. 14618 (March 11, 2008).
^ State Street Global Advisors and Knowledge@Wharton, ETFs Changing the Way Advisors Do Business, According to State Street and Wharton Study, Business Wire (June 10, 2008).
^ a b The Impact of Exchange Traded Products on the Financial Advisory Industry: A Joint Study of State Street Global Advisors and Knowledge@Wharton (2008).
^ a b c d e Weinberg, Ari I. (6 December 2015). "Should You Fear the ETF? ETFs are scaring regulators and investors: Here are the dangers—real and perceived". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 7 December 2015. 
^ SPDR ETFs: Basics of Product Structure SSGA
^ a b c d e Actively Managed Exchange-Traded Funds, SEC Release No. IC-25258, 66 Fed. Reg. 57614 (November 8, 2001).
^ PowerShares Capital Management LLC, et al.; Notice of Application, Release No. IC-28140 (February 1, 2008), 73 Fed. Reg. 7328 (February 7, 2008) (notice); PowerShares Capital Management LLC, Release No. IC-28171 (February 27, 2008) (order). The SEC issued orders to Bear Stearns Asset Management, Inc., Barclays Global Fund Advisors, and WisdomTree Trust on the same day.
^ American Stock Exchange Lists First Actively-Managed Exchange Traded Fund (March 25, 2008).
^ a b c ETFConnect, "Index ETFs – Know Your Funds" (visited April 7, 2008).
^ Peaceful Gains. "A List of exchange-traded funds". Retrieved October 23, 2009. 
^ a b Gastineau, Gary (2002). The Exchange-Traded Funds Manual. John Wiley and Sons. p. 32. ISBN 978-0-471-21894-4. 
^ Carrel, Lawrence (2008), ETFs for the Long Run, John Wiley & Sons, ISBN 978-0-470-13894-6
^ Jennifer Bayot (December 10, 2004). "Nathan Most Is Dead at 90; Investment Fund Innovator". New York Times. Retrieved April 23, 2008. 
^ Wiandt, Jim; William McClatchy (2002). Exchange Traded Funds. John Wiley and Sons. p. 82. ISBN 0-471-22513-4. 
^ Fabozzi, Frank (2003). The Handbook of Financial Instruments. John Wiley and Sons. p. 532. ISBN 0-471-22092-2. 
^ Ferri, Richard A. (2008). The ETF Book, John Wiley and Sons, 191 ISBN 0-470-13063-6.
^ "ETF League Table as of Jan. 21, 2014". IndexUniverse. 
^ U.S. ETF Assets Hit $2 Trillion Milestone - Yahoo Finance
^ American Stock Exchange, ETFs – Individual Investor (visited April 7, 2008).
^ [ETF Statistics For June 2012: Actively Managed Assets Less Than 1% http://etfdailynews.com/2012/07/10/etf-statistics-for-june-2012-actively-managed-assets-less-than-1/]
^ The Case Against Leveraged ETFs, Seeking Alpha (May 17, 2007).
^ [1], Revenue Shares (July 10, 2015).
^ "Our Take on the Bond ETF Dilemma". News.morningstar.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ Stacy L. Fuller, The Evolution of Actively Managed Exchange-Traded Funds, Review of Securities & Commodities Regulation (April 16, 2008).
^ Banner Year of Dividend Growth Sends Cash to Dividend ETFs - Yahoo Finance
^ "Do You Need a Sector Fund?". Morningstar. 
^ Bond ETF Definition
^ "Indicators for Trading in Government Bond ETFs". Tradingmarkets.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "Bond ETFs: A Viable Alternative". Investopedia.com. September 19, 2009. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "Benchmark Asset Management Company conceptualises Gold ETF". Etfglobalinvestor.net. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "Largest ETFs: Top 25 ETFs By Market Cap". ETFdb. Retrieved November 3, 2010. 
^ Michael Sackheim, Michael Schmidtberger & James Munsell, DB Commodity Index Tracking Fund: An Innovative Exchange-Traded Fund, Futures Industry (May/June 2006).
^ Koyfman, Yevgeniy (August 21, 2009). "No Gas: Barclays Halts Issuance of Natural Gas ETN". Indexuniverse.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ tom Lauricella (November 2, 2009). "Gold Mutual Funds Vs. Gold ETFs: It Depends on the Goal". Online.wsj.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "The Future of Commodity ETFs". News.morningstar.com. August 25, 2009. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ Jaffe, Chuck. "Bear Stearns Current Yield (YYY)". The Seattle Time. 
^ David Hoffman, Active ETFs are, well, less active; Dynamics of trading translate into little active management, Investment News (April 21, 2008).
^ Tran, Hung. "MINT Tops BOND As Biggest Active ETF". IndexUniverse. 
^ AlphaBaskets.com report on active vs. index ETFs, AlphaBaskets.com (April 11, 2011).
^ a b "Buttonwood: Against the odds". The Economist. 
^ "All The HOLDRS Are Now History, NYSE Says". ETF.com. 
^ Palash R. Ghosh (August 18, 2005). "HOLDRs Vs. ETFs: What Investors Should Know". Investment Advisor. Summit Business Media. Retrieved January 8, 2011. 
^ Staff, Investopedia (2007-11-04). "Inverse ETF". Investopedia. Retrieved 2017-02-28. 
^ "ProFunds readies first leveraged ETFs - ETF Investing". MarketWatch. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "RYDEX ETF TRUST (Form: 485APOS, Received: 11/08/2006 16:27:55)". Esignal.brand.edgar-online.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ http://olympiainv.com/Memos/ETFs.pdf
^ Maxey, Daisy (August 4, 2009). "Fidelity the Latest to Caution on ETFs". Online.wsj.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "A Guide To Shorting Leveraged ETFs". www.signalplot.com. 
^ Leung, Tim (2014). "Implied Volatility of Leveraged ETF Options". Applied Mathematical Finance, Taylor & Francis. SSRN 2164518 .  Check date values in: |access-date= (help); Missing or empty |url= (help); |access-date= requires |url= (help)
^ https://www.reuters.com/article/us-sec-etfs-idUSKCN18C2RO
^ John M. Baker, Creation Units and the Rise of Exchange-Traded Funds, Investment Adviser (July 2000).
^ Mutual Fund Fees Jump 5 Percent on moneywatch.bnet.com
^ Fidelity Offers iShares ETFs Commission-Free on news.morningstar.com
^ Yates, Tristan. "Tristan Yates: What Can we Learn from the 2008 Leveraged ETF Collapse?". Tradingmarkets.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ Dan Culloton, Are ETFs Really More Tax-Efficient Than Mutual Funds? Morningstar (February 14, 2006).
^ The Problem With Vanguard VIPERs ETFs (December 29, 2009).
^ Vanguard ETFs have Different Tax Considerations Than Other ETFs (December 29, 2009).
^ ETF Tax Efficiency (December 29, 2009).
^ Steve Lodge (April 16, 2010). "Are ETF dividends taxed differently? - Yahoo! UK & Ireland Finance". Uk.finance.yahoo.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ Gastineau, Gary (2002). The Exchange-Traded Funds Manual. John Wiley and Sons. p. 227. ISBN 978-0-471-21894-4. 
^ Larry Connors, "Trading Covered Calls with ETFs", Tradingmarkets (March 4, 2008).
^ a b Kirilenko, Andrei; Kyle, Albert S.; Samadi, Mehrdad; Tuzun, Tugkan (May 5, 2014), The Flash Crash: The Impact of High Frequency Trading on an Electronic Market (PDF), retrieved 24 April 2015 
^ Avellaneda and Zhang, “Path-Dependence of Leveraged ETF Returns” SIAM J. of Financial Math, Vol. 1, pp. 586–603 2013. https://www.math.nyu.edu/faculty/avellane/SIAMLETFS.pdf.pdf
^ Guo and Leung, “Understanding the Tracking Errors of Commodity Leveraged ETFs” SSRN, 2013. http://papers.ssrn.com/sol3/papers.cfm?abstract_id=2389411
^ Amount as of July 2015; figure taken from the home page of http://www.spdrgoldshares.com/.
^ a b John Rubino, “Emerging Threat Funds?” CFA Magazine, September–October 2011. pp. 30–33.
^ Stephen Kovaka, Just Say No to the Silver ETF, SilverSeek.com (April 27, 2007)
^ Theodore Butler, The Smoking Gun, SilverSeek.com (August 22, 2008)
^ Global Financial Stability Report: Durable Financial Stability: Getting There from Here, April 2011
^ Financial Stability Board, “Potential financial stability issues arising from recent trends in Exchange-Traded Funds (ETFs)”, April 2011.
^ International Monetary Fund, Global Financial Stability Report: Durable Financial Stability: Getting There from Here, April 2011.
^ Srichander Ramaswamy, “Market structures and systemic risks of exchange-traded funds.” Working paper 343, April 2011. Bank for International Settlements.
^ John C. Bogle, 'Value' Strategies, Wall Street Journal (February 9, 2007).
^ Ian Salisbury, Some ETFs Fall Short on Pricing; Certain Trades Slip Below Value of Holdings, Wall Street Journal (November 21, 2008).
^ ETFs Were Wider Off the Mark in 2009, Wall Street Journal (February 19, 2010).
^ Wilfred Dellva, Exchange-Traded Funds Not for Everyone, Journal of Financial Planning (April 2001).


Further reading[edit]

Carrell, Lawrence. ETFs for the Long Run: What They Are, How They Work, and Simple Strategies for Successful Long-Term Investing. JW Wiley, 2008. ISBN 978-0-470-13894-6
Ferri, Richard A. The ETF Book: All You Need to Know About Exchange-Traded Funds. Wiley, 2009. ISBN 0-470-53746-9
Humphries, William. Leveraged ETFs: The Trojan Horse Has Passed the Margin-Rule Gates. 34 Seattle U.L. Rev. 299 (2010), available at [2].
Koesterich, Russ. The ETF Strategist: Balancing Risk and Reward for Superior Returns. Portfolio, 2008. ISBN 978-1-59184-207-1
Lemke, Thomas P; Lins, Gerald T. & McGuire, W. John. Regulation of Exchange-Traded Funds. Matthew Bender, 2015. ISBN 978-0-7698-9131-6

External links[edit]

The ETF Hall of Fame: 25 People Who Revolutionized the ETF Industry—ETF Database
Exchange Traded Funds (ETF)—Johannesburg Stock Exchange (JSE)
Exchange Traded Funds (ETF)—London Stock Exchange (LSE)
Exchange Traded Funds (ETFs) & Index Funds—NASDAQ Stock Market
Exchange Traded Products—New York Stock Exchange
Exchange Traded Funds (ETF)—Toronto Stock Exchange (TSX)
Exchange Traded Funds (ETF)—Australian Stock Exchange (ASX)
Exchange Traded Funds (ETFs) listed on XETRA or on Nasdaq OMX Nordic—ETFSverige.se information website
Using ETFs in investment portfolios—Exchange Traded Fund Basics, Investor Knowledge Centre (Vanguard Investments Australia)
Benefits of ETFs—Australian ETF Information Network
Cross-referenced list of funds—U.S., Canadian, and U.K. ETFs organized by industry, region, and investment strategy
Global ETF browser—Free ETF Screener based on fundamentals
Find ETFs by Stock Tool—Free tool for finding ETFs by its stocks
Worldwide Exchange Traded Funds—Investing.com global ETFs by category







v
t
e


Investment management



Investment fund
structures



Common contractual fund
Exchange-traded fund
Fond commun de placement
Fund of funds
Index fund
Investment trust
Hedge fund
Listed investment company
Mutual fund
Offshore fund
Open-ended investment company
Pension Fund
Private equity fund
Real estate investment trust
Royalty trust
SICAV
Umbrella fund
Unit investment trust
Unit trust
Unitised insurance fund





Investment styles



Active / passive management
Impact investing
Manager of managers
Socially responsible investing
Value / growth investing





Theory · Terminology



Closed-end fund
Efficient-market hypothesis
Net asset value
Open-end fund





Related topics



Alternative investment
Asset management firms
Robo-advisor
Returns-based style analysis
Traditional investments
UCITS










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Exchange-traded_fund&oldid=792170490"					
Categories: Exchange-traded fundsHidden categories: CS1 errors: datesPages using web citations with no URLPages using citations with accessdate and no URLUse mdy dates from August 2014All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from June 2017Articles with unsourced statements from April 2015Articles with unsourced statements from March 2013Articles with unsourced statements from August 2010 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةБългарскиBosanskiCatalàČeštinaDeutschEestiEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Bahasa IndonesiaItalianoLietuviųNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsРусскийSuomiSvenskaதமிழ்中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 24 July 2017, at 22:07.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Exchange-traded fund - Wikipedia





















 






Exchange-traded fund

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

An exchange-traded fund (ETF) is an investment fund traded on stock exchanges, much like stocks.[1][2] An ETF holds assets such as stocks, commodities, or bonds and generally operates with an arbitrage mechanism designed to keep it trading close to its net asset value,[3] although deviations can occasionally occur. Most ETFs track an index, such as a stock index or bond index. ETFs may be attractive as investments because of their low costs, tax efficiency, and stock-like features.[4][5] By 2013, ETFs had become the most popular type of exchange-traded product.[citation needed]
ETF distributors only buy or sell ETFs directly from or to authorized participants, which are large broker-dealers with whom they have entered into agreements—and then, only in creation units, which are large blocks of tens of thousands of ETF shares, usually exchanged in-kind with baskets of the underlying securities. Authorized participants may wish to invest in the ETF shares for the long-term, but they usually act as market makers on the open market, using their ability to exchange creation units with their underlying securities to provide liquidity of the ETF shares and help ensure that their intraday market price approximates the net asset value of the underlying assets.[3] Other investors, such as individuals using a retail broker, trade ETF shares on this secondary market.
An ETF combines the valuation feature of a mutual fund or unit investment trust, which can be bought or sold at the end of each trading day for its net asset value, with the tradability feature of a closed-end fund, which trades throughout the trading day at prices that may be more or less than its net asset value. Closed-end funds are not considered to be ETFs, even though they are funds and are traded on an exchange. ETFs have been available in the US since 1993 and in Europe since 1999. ETFs traditionally have been index funds, but in 2008 the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission began to authorize the creation of actively managed ETFs.[3]
ETFs offer both tax efficiency and lower transaction costs. More than US$2 trillion were invested in ETFs in the United States between when they were introduced in 1993 and 2015. By the end of 2015, ETFs offered "1,800 different products, covering almost every conceivable market sector, niche and trading strategy".[6]



Contents


1 Structure

1.1 United States


2 History
3 Investment uses
4 Types

4.1 Index ETFs
4.2 Stock ETFs
4.3 Bond ETFs
4.4 Commodity ETFs
4.5 Currency ETFs
4.6 Actively managed ETFs
4.7 Exchange-traded grantor trusts
4.8 Inverse ETFs
4.9 Leveraged ETFs


5 ETFs compared to mutual funds

5.1 Costs
5.2 Taxation
5.3 Trading


6 Regulation
7 Risks

7.1 Tracking error
7.2 Effects on stability
7.3 Regulatory risk
7.4 Counterparty risk


8 Liquidity
9 Criticism
10 Issuers of ETFs
11 See also
12 References
13 Further reading
14 External links



Structure[edit]
An ETF is a type of fund. It owns assets (bonds, stocks, gold bars, etc.) and divides ownership of itself into shares that are held by shareholders. The details of the structure (such as a corporation or trust) will vary by country, and even within one country there may be multiple possible structures.[7] The shareholders indirectly own the assets of the fund, and they will typically get an annual report. Shareholders are entitled to a share of the profits, such as interest or dividends, and they may get a residual value in case the fund is liquidated. Their ownership interest in the fund can easily be bought and sold.
ETFs are similar in many ways to traditional mutual funds, except that shares in an ETF can be bought and sold throughout the day like stocks on a stock exchange through a broker-dealer. Unlike traditional mutual funds, ETFs do not sell or redeem their individual shares at net asset value (NAV). Instead, financial institutions purchase and redeem ETF shares directly from the ETF, but only in large blocks (such as 50,000 shares), called creation units. Purchases and redemptions of the creation units generally are in kind, with the institutional investor contributing or receiving a basket of securities of the same type and proportion held by the ETF, although some ETFs may require or permit a purchasing or redeeming shareholder to substitute cash for some or all of the securities in the basket of assets.[3]
The ability to purchase and redeem creation units gives ETFs an arbitrage mechanism intended to minimize the potential deviation between the market price and the net asset value of ETF shares. Existing ETFs have transparent portfolios, so institutional investors will know exactly what portfolio assets they must assemble if they wish to purchase a creation unit, and the exchange disseminates the updated net asset value of the shares throughout the trading day, typically at 15-second intervals.[3]
If there is strong investor demand for an ETF, its share price will temporarily rise above its net asset value per share, giving arbitrageurs an incentive to purchase additional creation units from the ETF and sell the component ETF shares in the open market. The additional supply of ETF shares reduces the market price per share, generally eliminating the premium over net asset value. A similar process applies when there is weak demand for an ETF: its shares trade at a discount from net asset value.
United States[edit]
In the United States, most ETFs are structured as open-end management investment companies (the same structure used by mutual funds and money market funds), although a few ETFs, including some of the largest ones, are structured as unit investment trusts. ETFs structured as open-end funds have greater flexibility in constructing a portfolio and are not prohibited from participating in securities lending programs or from using futures and options in achieving their investment objectives.[8]
Under existing regulations, a new ETF must receive an order from the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC), giving it relief from provisions of the Investment Company Act of 1940 that would not otherwise allow the ETF structure. In 2008, the SEC proposed rules that would allow the creation of ETFs without the need for exemptive orders. Under the SEC proposal, an ETF would be defined as a registered open-end management investment company that:

issues (or redeems) creation units in exchange for the deposit (or delivery) of basket assets the current value of which is disseminated per share by a national securities exchange at regular intervals during the trading day
identifies itself as an ETF in any sales literature
issues shares that are approved for listing and trading on a securities exchange
discloses each business day on its publicly available web site the prior business day's net asset value and closing market price of the fund's shares, and the premium or discount of the closing market price against the net asset value of the fund's shares as a percentage of net asset value
either is an index fund, or discloses each business day on its publicly available web site the identities and weighting of the component securities and other assets held by the fund[3]

The SEC rule proposal would allow ETFs either to be index funds or to be fully transparent actively managed funds. Historically, all ETFs in the United States had been index funds.[citation needed] In 2008, however, the SEC began issuing exemptive orders to fully transparent actively managed ETFs. The first such order was to PowerShares Actively Managed Exchange-Traded Fund Trust,[9] and the first actively managed ETF in the United States was the Bear Stearns Current Yield Fund, a short-term income fund that began trading on the American Stock Exchange under the symbol YYY on March 25, 2008.[10] The SEC rule proposal indicates that the SEC may still consider future applications for exemptive orders for actively managed ETFs that do not satisfy the proposed rule's transparency requirements.[3]
Some ETFs invest primarily in commodities or commodity-based instruments, such as crude oil and precious metals. Although these commodity ETFs are similar in practice to ETFs that invest in securities, they are not investment companies under the Investment Company Act of 1940.[3]
Publicly traded grantor trusts, such as Merrill Lynch's HOLDRs securities, are sometimes considered to be ETFs, although they lack many of the characteristics of other ETFs. Investors in a grantor trust have a direct interest in the underlying basket of securities, which does not change except to reflect corporate actions such as stock splits and mergers. Funds of this type are not investment companies under the Investment Company Act of 1940.[11]
As of 2009, there were approximately 1,500 exchange-traded funds traded on US exchanges.[12] This count uses the wider definition of ETF, including HOLDRs and closed-end funds.
History[edit]
ETFs had their genesis in 1989 with Index Participation Shares, an S&P 500 proxy that traded on the American Stock Exchange and the Philadelphia Stock Exchange. This product, however, was short-lived after a lawsuit by the Chicago Mercantile Exchange was successful in stopping sales in the United States.[13]
A similar product, Toronto Index Participation Shares, started trading on the Toronto Stock Exchange (TSE) in 1990. The shares, which tracked the TSE 35 and later the TSE 100 indices, proved to be popular. The popularity of these products led the American Stock Exchange to try to develop something that would satisfy SEC regulation in the United States.[13]
Nathan Most and Steven Bloom, under the direction of Ivers Riley, designed and developed Standard & Poor's Depositary Receipts (NYSE Arca: SPY), which were introduced in January 1993.[14][15] Known as SPDRs or "Spiders", the fund became the largest ETF in the world. In May 1995 they introduced the MidCap SPDRs (NYSE Arca: MDY).
Barclays Global Investors, a subsidiary of Barclays PLC, in conjunction with MSCI and as its underwriter, a Boston-based third party distributor, Funds Distributor Inc., entered the market in 1996 with World Equity Benchmark Shares (WEBS), which became iShares MSCI Index Fund Shares. WEBS tracked MSCI country indices, originally 17, of the funds' index provider, Morgan Stanley. WEBS were particularly innovative because they gave casual investors easy access to foreign markets. While SPDRs were organized as unit investment trusts, WEBS were set up as a mutual fund, the first of their kind.[16][17]
In 1998, State Street Global Advisors introduced "Sector Spiders", which follow nine sectors of the S&P 500.[18] Also in 1998, the "Dow Diamonds" (NYSE Arca: DIA) were introduced, tracking the famous Dow Jones Industrial Average. In 1999, the influential "cubes" (NASDAQ: QQQ), were launched attempting to replicate the movement of the NASDAQ-100.
In 2000, Barclays Global Investors put a significant effort behind the ETF marketplace, with a strong emphasis on education and distribution to reach long-term investors. The iShares line was launched in early 2000. Within five years iShares had surpassed the assets of any other ETF competitor in the U.S. and Europe. Barclays Global Investors was sold to BlackRock in 2009.
The Vanguard Group entered the market in 2001. The first fund was Vanguard Total Stock Market ETF (NYSE Arca: VTI), which has become quite popular, and they made the Vanguard Extended Market Index ETF (VXF). Some of Vanguard's ETFs are a share class of an existing mutual fund.
iShares made the first bond funds in July 2002, based on US Treasury bonds and corporate bonds, such as iShares iBoxx $ Invst Grade Crp Bond (LQD). They also created a TIPS fund. In 2007, they introduced funds based on junk and muni bonds; about the same time SPDR and Vanguard got in gear and created several of their bond funds.
Since then ETFs have proliferated, tailored to an increasingly specific array of regions, sectors, commodities, bonds, futures, and other asset classes. As of January 2014, there were over 1,500 ETFs traded in the U.S., with over $1.7 trillion in assets.[19] In December 2014, U.S. ETF assets went above $2 trillion.[20]
Investment uses[edit]
ETFs generally provide the easy diversification, low expense ratios, and tax efficiency of index funds, while still maintaining all the features of ordinary stock, such as limit orders, short selling, and options. Because ETFs can be economically acquired, held, and disposed of, some investors invest in ETF shares as a long-term investment for asset allocation purposes, while other investors trade ETF shares frequently to implement market timing investment strategies.[8] Among the advantages of ETFs are the following:[11][21]

Lower costs: ETFs generally have lower costs than other investment products because most ETFs are not actively managed and because ETFs are insulated from the costs of having to buy and sell securities to accommodate shareholder purchases and redemptions. ETFs typically have lower marketing, distribution and accounting expenses, and most ETFs do not have 12b-1 fees.
Buying and selling flexibility: ETFs can be bought and sold at current market prices at any time during the trading day, unlike mutual funds and unit investment trusts, which can only be traded at the end of the trading day. As publicly traded securities, their shares can be purchased on margin and sold short, enabling the use of hedging strategies, and traded using stop orders and limit orders, which allow investors to specify the price points at which they are willing to trade.
Tax efficiency: ETFs generally generate relatively low capital gains, because they typically have low turnover of their portfolio securities. While this is an advantage they share with other index funds, their tax efficiency is further enhanced because they do not have to sell securities to meet investor redemptions.
Market exposure and diversification: ETFs provide an economical way to rebalance portfolio allocations and to "equitize" cash by investing it quickly. An index ETF inherently provides diversification across an entire index. ETFs offer exposure to a diverse variety of markets, including broad-based indices, broad-based international and country-specific indices, industry sector-specific indices, bond indices, and commodities.
Transparency: ETFs, whether index funds or actively managed, have transparent portfolios and are priced at frequent intervals throughout the trading day.

Some of these advantages derive from the status of most ETFs as index funds.
Types[edit]
For more details on this topic, see List of American exchange-traded funds.
Index ETFs[edit]
Most ETFs are index funds that attempt to replicate the performance of a specific index. Indexes may be based on stocks, bonds, commodities, or currencies. An index fund seeks to track the performance of an index by holding in its portfolio either the contents of the index or a representative sample of the securities in the index.[8] As of June 2012, in the United States, about 1200 index ETFs exist, with about 50 actively managed ETFs. Index ETF assets are about $1.2 trillion, compared with about $7 billion for actively managed ETFs.[22] Some index ETFs, known as leveraged ETFs or inverse ETFs, use investments in derivatives to seek a return that corresponds to a multiple of, or the inverse (opposite) of, the daily performance of the index.[23]
Some index ETFs invest 100% of their assets proportionately in the securities underlying an index, a manner of investing called replication. Other index ETFs use representative sampling, investing 80% to 95% of their assets in the securities of an underlying index and investing the remaining 5% to 20% of their assets in other holdings, such as futures, option and swap contracts, and securities not in the underlying index, that the fund's adviser believes will help the ETF to achieve its investment objective. There are various ways the ETF can be weighted, such as equal weighting or revenue weighting.[24] For index ETFs that invest in indices with thousands of underlying securities, some index ETFs employ "aggressive sampling" and invest in only a tiny percentage of the underlying securities.[25][26]
Stock ETFs[edit]
The first and most popular ETFs track stocks. Many funds track national indexes; for example, Vanguard Total Stock Market ETF NYSE Arca: VTI tracks the CRSP U.S. Total Market Index, and several funds track the S&P 500, both indexes for US stocks. Other funds own stocks from many countries; for example, Vanguard Total International Stock Index NYSE Arca: VXUS tracks the MSCI All Country World ex USA Investable Market Index, while the iShares MSCI EAFE Index NYSE Arca: EFA tracks the MSCI EAFE Index, both "world ex-US" indexes.
Stock ETFs can have different styles, such as large-cap, small-cap, growth, value, et cetera. For example, the S&P 500 index is large- and mid-cap, so the SPDR S&P 500 ETF will not contain small-cap stocks. Others such as iShares Russell 2000 are mainly for small-cap stocks. There are many style ETFs such as iShares Russell 1000 Growth and iShares Russell 1000 Value. ETFs focusing on dividends have been popular in the first few years of the 2010s decade, such as iShares Select Dividend.[27]
ETFs can also be sector funds. These can be broad sectors, like finance and technology, or specific niche areas, like green power. They can also be for one country or global. Critics have said that no one needs a sector fund.[28] This point is not really specific to ETFs; the issues are the same as with mutual funds. The funds are popular since people can put their money into the latest fashionable trend, rather than investing in boring areas with no "cachet".
Bond ETFs[edit]
Exchange-traded funds that invest in bonds are known as bond ETFs.[29] They thrive during economic recessions because investors pull their money out of the stock market and into bonds (for example, government treasury bonds or those issued by companies regarded as financially stable). Because of this cause and effect relationship, the performance of bond ETFs may be indicative of broader economic conditions.[30] There are several advantages to bond ETFs such as the reasonable trading commissions, but this benefit can be negatively offset by fees if bought and sold through a third party.[31]
Commodity ETFs[edit]
Commodity ETFs (CETFs or ETCs) invest in commodities, such as precious metals, agricultural products, or hydrocarbons. Among the first commodity ETFs were gold exchange-traded funds, which have been offered in a number of countries. The idea of a Gold ETF was first officially conceptualised by Benchmark Asset Management Company Private Ltd in India when they filed a proposal with the SEBI in May 2002.[32] The first gold exchange-traded fund was Gold Bullion Securities launched on the ASX in 2003, and the first silver exchange-traded fund was iShares Silver Trust launched on the NYSE in 2006. As of November 2010 a commodity ETF, namely SPDR Gold Shares, was the second-largest ETF by market capitalization.[33]
However, generally commodity ETFs are index funds tracking non-security indices. Because they do not invest in securities, commodity ETFs are not regulated as investment companies under the Investment Company Act of 1940 in the United States, although their public offering is subject to SEC review and they need an SEC no-action letter under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. They may, however, be subject to regulation by the Commodity Futures Trading Commission.[34][35]
The earliest commodity ETFs, such as SPDR Gold Shares (NYSE Arca: GLD) and iShares Silver Trust (NYSE Arca: SLV), owned the physical commodity (e.g., gold and silver bars). Similar to these are ETFS Physical Palladium (NYSE Arca: PALL) and ETFS Physical Platinum (NYSE Arca: PPLT). However, most ETCs implement a futures trading strategy, which may produce quite different results from owning the commodity.
Commodity ETFs trade just like shares, are simple and efficient and provide exposure to an ever-increasing range of commodities and commodity indices, including energy, metals, softs and agriculture. However, it is important for an investor to realize that there are often other factors that affect the price of a commodity ETF that might not be immediately apparent. For example, buyers of an oil ETF such as USO might think that as long as oil goes up, they will profit roughly linearly. What isn't clear to the novice investor is the method by which these funds gain exposure to their underlying commodities. In the case of many commodity funds, they simply roll so-called front-month futures contracts from month to month. This does give exposure to the commodity, but subjects the investor to risks involved in different prices along the term structure, such as a high cost to roll.[36][37]
ETC can also refer to exchange-traded notes, which are not exchange-traded funds.
Currency ETFs[edit]
In 2005, Rydex Investments launched the first currency ETF called the Euro Currency Trust (NYSE Arca: FXE) in New York. Since then Rydex has launched a series of funds tracking all major currencies under their brand CurrencyShares. In 2007 Deutsche Bank's db x-trackers launched EONIA Total Return Index ETF in Frankfurt tracking the euro, and later in 2008 the Sterling Money Market ETF (LSE: XGBP) and US Dollar Money Market ETF (LSE: XUSD) in London. In 2009, ETF Securities launched the world's largest FX platform tracking the MSFXSM Index covering 18 long or short USD ETC vs. single G10 currencies. The funds are total return products where the investor gets access to the FX spot change, local institutional interest rates and a collateral yield.
Actively managed ETFs[edit]
See also: List of American exchange-traded funds § Active ETFs
Most ETFs are index funds, but some ETFs do have active management. Actively managed ETFs have been offered in the United States only since 2008. The first active ETF was Bear Stearns Current Yield ETF (Ticker: YYY).[38] Currently, actively managed ETFs are fully transparent, publishing their current securities portfolios on their web sites daily. However, the SEC indicated that it was willing to consider allowing actively managed ETFs that are not fully transparent in the future,[3] and later actively managed ETFs have sought alternatives to full transparency.
The fully transparent nature of existing ETFs means that an actively managed ETF is at risk from arbitrage activities by market participants who might choose to front run its trades as daily reports of the ETF's holdings reveals its manager's trading strategy. The initial actively managed equity ETFs addressed this problem by trading only weekly or monthly. Actively managed debt ETFs, which are less susceptible to front-running, trade their holdings more frequently.[39]
The actively managed ETF market has largely been seen as more favorable to bond funds, because concerns about disclosing bond holdings are less pronounced, there are fewer product choices, and there is increased appetite for bond products. Pimco's Enhanced Short Duration ETF NYSE: MINT is the largest actively managed ETF, with approximately $3.93 billion in assets as of May 16, 2014.[40]
Actively managed ETFs grew faster in their first three years of existence than index ETFs did in their first three years of existence. As track records develop, many see actively managed ETFs as a significant competitive threat to actively managed mutual funds.[41] However, many academic studies have questioned the value of active management. Jack Bogle of Vanguard Group wrote an article in the Financial Analysts Journal where he estimated that higher fees as well as hidden costs (such a more trading fees and lower return from holding cash) reduce returns for investors by around 2.66 percentage points a year "a huge differential considering that long-term real returns from American equities have been 6.45%."[42] Even without considering hidden costs, high fees negatively affect long-term performance. In another Financial Analysts Journal article, Nobel laureate, Bill Sharpe "calculated that someone who saved via a low-cost fund would have a standard of living in retirement 20% higher than someone who saved in a high-cost fund".[42]
Exchange-traded grantor trusts[edit]
An exchange-traded grantor trust was used to give a direct interest in a static basket of stocks selected from a particular industry. Such products have some properties in common with ETFs—low costs, low turnover, and tax efficiency:but are generally regarded as separate from ETFs. The leading example was Holding Company Depositary Receipts, or HOLDRs, a proprietary Merrill Lynch product, but these have now disappeared from the scene.[11][43][44] SPDR Gold Shares is a grantor trust.
Inverse ETFs[edit]
Main article: Inverse exchange-traded fund
Inverse ETFs are constructed by using various derivatives for the purpose of profiting from a decline in the value of the underlying benchmark. It is a similar type of investment to holding several short positions or using a combination of advanced investment strategies to profit from falling prices. Many inverse ETFs use daily futures as their underlying benchmark.[45]
Leveraged ETFs[edit]
Leveraged exchange-traded funds (LETFs or leveraged ETFs) are a type of ETF that attempt to achieve returns that are more sensitive to market movements than non-leveraged ETFs.[46] Leveraged index ETFs are often marketed as bull or bear funds. A leveraged bull ETF fund might for example attempt to achieve daily returns that are 2x or 3x more pronounced than the Dow Jones Industrial Average or the S&P 500. A leveraged inverse (bear) ETF fund on the other hand may attempt to achieve returns that are -2x or -3x the daily index return, meaning that it will gain double or triple the loss of the market. Leveraged ETFs require the use of financial engineering techniques, including the use of equity swaps, derivatives and rebalancing, and re-indexing to achieve the desired return.[47] The most common way to construct leveraged ETFs is by trading futures contracts.
The rebalancing and re-indexing of leveraged ETFs may have considerable costs when markets are volatile.[48][49] The rebalancing problem is that the fund manager incurs trading losses because he needs to buy when the index goes up and sell when the index goes down in order to maintain a fixed leverage ratio. A 2.5% daily change in the index will for example reduce value of a -2x bear fund by about 0.18% per day, which means that about a third of the fund may be wasted in trading losses within a year (1-(1-0.18%)252=36.5%). Investors may however circumvent this problem by buying or writing futures directly, accepting a varying leverage ratio.[citation needed] A more reasonable estimate of daily market changes is 0.5%, which leads to a 2.6% yearly loss of principal in a 3x leveraged fund.
The re-indexing problem of leveraged ETFs stems from the arithmetic effect of volatility of the underlying index.[50] Take, for example, an index that begins at 100 and a 2X fund based on that index that also starts at 100. In a first trading period (for example, a day), the index rises 10% to 110. The 2X fund will then rise 20% to 120. The index then drops back to 100 (a drop of 9.09%), so that it is now even. The drop in the 2X fund will be 18.18% (2*9.09). But 18.18% of 120 is 21.82. This puts the value of the 2X fund at 98.18. Even though the index is unchanged after two trading periods, an investor in the 2X fund would have lost 1.82%. This decline in value can be even greater for inverse funds (leveraged funds with negative multipliers such as -1, -2, or -3). It always occurs when the change in value of the underlying index changes direction. And the decay in value increases with volatility of the underlying index.
The effect of leverage is also reflected in the pricing of options written on leveraged ETFs. In particular, the terminal payoff of a leveraged ETF European/American put or call depends on the realized variance (hence the path) of the underlying index. The impact of leverage ratio can also be observed from the implied volatility surfaces of leveraged ETF options.[51] For instance, the implied volatility curves of inverse leveraged ETFs (with negative multipliers such as -1, -2, or -3) are commonly observed to be increasing in strike, which is characteristically different from the implied volatility smiles or skews seen for index options or non-leveraged ETF options.
The SEC, in May 2017, granted approval of a pair of 4x leveraged ETF related to S&P 500 Futures, before rescinding the approval a few weeks later. The decision concerns two potential products: ForceShares Daily 4X US Market Futures Long Fund, which would have listed under the ticker UP, and ForceShares Daily 4X US Market Futures Short Fund, with the ticker DOWN.[52]
ETFs compared to mutual funds[edit]
Costs[edit]
ETFs have a reputation for lower costs than traditional mutual funds. This will be evident as a lower expense ratio. This is mainly from two factors, the fact that most ETFs are index funds and some advantages of the ETF structure. However, this needs to be compared in each case, since some index mutual funds also have a very low expense ratio, and some ETFs' expense ratios are relatively high. An index fund is much simpler to run, since it does not require some security selection, and can be largely done by computer. Not only does an ETF have lower shareholder-related expenses, but because it does not have to invest cash contributions or fund cash redemptions, an ETF does not have to maintain a cash reserve for redemptions and saves on brokerage expenses.[53] Mutual funds can charge 1% to 3%, or more; index fund expense ratios are generally lower, while ETFs are almost always less than 1%. Over the long term, these cost differences can compound into a noticeable difference.[54]
Because ETFs trade on an exchange, each transaction is generally subject to a brokerage commission. Commissions depend on the brokerage and which plan is chosen by the customer. For example, a typical flat fee schedule from an online brokerage firm in the United States ranges from $10 to $20, but it can be as low as $0 with discount brokers. Due to this commission cost, the amount invested has a great bearing; someone who wishes to invest $100 per month may have a significant percentage of their investment destroyed immediately, while for someone making a $200,000 investment, the commission cost may be negligible. Generally, mutual funds obtained directly from the fund company itself do not charge a brokerage fee. Thus, when low or no-cost transactions are available, ETFs become very competitive.[55]
The cost difference is more evident when compared with mutual funds that charge a front-end or back-end load as ETFs do not have loads at all. The redemption fee and short-term trading fees are examples of other fees associated with mutual funds that do not exist with ETFs. Traders should be cautious if they plan to trade inverse and leveraged ETFs for short periods of time. Close attention should be paid to transaction costs and daily performance rates as the potential combined compound loss can sometimes go unrecognized and offset potential gains over a longer period of time.[56]
Taxation[edit]
ETFs are structured for tax efficiency and can be more attractive than mutual funds. In the U.S., whenever a mutual fund realizes a capital gain that is not balanced by a realized loss, the mutual fund must distribute the capital gains to its shareholders. This can happen whenever the mutual fund sells portfolio securities, whether to reallocate its investments or to fund shareholder redemptions. These gains are taxable to all shareholders, even those who reinvest the gains distributions in more shares of the fund. In contrast, ETFs are not redeemed by holders (instead, holders simply sell their ETF shares on the stock market, as they would a stock, or effect a non-taxable redemption of a creation unit for portfolio securities), so that investors generally only realize capital gains when they sell their own shares or when the ETF trades to reflect changes in the underlying index.[8]
In most cases, ETFs are more tax-efficient than conventional mutual funds in the same asset classes or categories.[57] Because Vanguard's ETFs are a share-class of their mutual funds, they don't get all the tax advantages if there are net redemptions on the mutual fund shares.[58] Although they do not get all the tax advantages, they get an additional advantage from tax loss harvesting any capital losses from net redemptions.[59][60]
In the U.K., ETFs can be shielded from capital gains tax by placing them in an Individual Savings Account or self-invested personal pension, in the same manner as many other shares. Because UK-resident ETFs would be liable for UK corporation tax on non-UK dividends, most ETFs which hold non-UK companies sold to UK investors are issued in Ireland or Luxembourg.[61]
Trading[edit]
An important benefit of an ETF is the stock-like features offered. A mutual fund is bought or sold at the end of a day's trading, whereas ETFs can be traded whenever the market is open. Since ETFs trade on the market, investors can carry out the same types of trades that they can with a stock. For instance, investors can sell short, use a limit order, use a stop-loss order, buy on margin, and invest as much or as little money as they wish (there is no minimum investment requirement).[62] Also, many ETFs have the capability for options (puts and calls) to be written against them. Covered call strategies allow investors and traders to potentially increase their returns on their ETF purchases by collecting premiums (the proceeds of a call sale or write) on calls written against them. Mutual funds do not offer those features.[63]
Regulation[edit]
New regulations were put in place following the 2010 Flash Crash, when prices of ETFs and other stocks and options became volatile, with trading markets spiking[64]:1 and bids falling as low as a penny a share[6] in what the Commodity Futures Trading Commission (CFTC) investigation described as one of the most turbulent periods in the history of financial markets.[64]:1
These regulations proved to be inadequate to protect investors in the August 24, 2015 flash crash,[6] "when the price of many ETFs appeared to come unhinged from their underlying value". ETFs were consequently put under even greater scrutiny by regulators and investors.[6] Analysts at Morningstar claimed in December 2015 that "ETFs are a “digital-age technology” governed by “Depression-era legislation,”"[6]
Risks[edit]
Tracking error[edit]
The ETF tracking error is the difference between the returns of the ETF and its reference index or asset. A non-zero tracking error therefore represents a failure to replicate the reference as stated in the ETF prospectus. The tracking error is computed based on the prevailing price of the ETF and its reference. It is different than the premium/discount which is the difference between the ETF’s NAV (updated only once a day) and its market price. Tracking errors are more significant when the ETF provider uses strategies other than full replication of the underlying index. Some of the most liquid equity ETFs tend to have better tracking performance because the underlying is also sufficiently liquid, allowing for full replication.[65] In contrast, some ETFs, such as commodities ETFs and their leveraged ETFs, do not necessarily employ full replication because the physical assets cannot be stored easily or used to create a leveraged exposure, or the reference asset or index is illiquid.[66] Futures-based ETFs may also suffer from negative roll yields, as seen in the VIX futures market.
Effects on stability[edit]
ETFs that buy and hold commodities or futures of commodities have become popular. For example, SPDR Gold Shares ETF (GLD) has 21 million ounces in trust.[67] The silver ETF, SLV, is also very large. The commodity ETFs are in effect consumers of their target commodities, thereby affecting the price in a spurious fashion.[68][69][70] In the words of the IMF, “Some market participants believe the growing popularity of exchange-traded funds (ETFs) may have contributed to equity price appreciation in some emerging economies, and warn that leverage embedded in ETFs could pose financial stability risks if equity prices were to decline for a protracted period.”[71]
Regulatory risk[edit]
Synthetic ETFs are attracting regulatory attention from the FSB,[72] the IMF,[73] and the BIS.[74] Areas of concern include the lack of transparency in products and increasing complexity; conflicts of interest; and lack of regulatory compliance.
Counterparty risk[edit]
A synthetic ETF has counterparty risk, because the counterparty is contractually obligated to match the return on the index. The deal is arranged with collateral posted by the swap counterparty. A potential hazard is that the investment bank offering the ETF might post its own collateral, and that collateral could be of dubious quality. Furthermore, the investment bank could use its own trading desk as counterparty. These types of set-ups are not allowed under the European guidelines, Undertakings for Collective Investment in Transferable Securities (UCITS), so the investor should look for UCITS III-compliant funds.[68]
Liquidity[edit]
ETFs have a wide range of liquidity. Some funds are constantly traded, with tens of millions of shares per day changing hands, while others trade only once in a while, even not trading for some days. There are many funds that do not trade very often. This just means that most trading is conducted in the most popular funds. The most active funds (such as SPY, IWM, QQQ, et cetera) are very liquid, with high volume and tight spreads. In these cases, the investor is almost sure to get a "reasonable" price, even in difficult conditions. With other funds, it is worthwhile to take some care in execution. This does not mean that less popular funds are not a quality investment. This is in contrast with traditional mutual funds, where everyone who trades on the same day gets the same price.
Criticism[edit]
John C. Bogle, founder of the Vanguard Group, a leading issuer of index mutual funds (and, since Bogle's retirement, of ETFs), has argued that ETFs represent short-term speculation, that their trading expenses decrease returns to investors, and that most ETFs provide insufficient diversification. He concedes that a broadly diversified ETF that is held over time can be a good investment.[75]
ETFs are dependent on the efficacy of the arbitrage mechanism in order for their share price to track net asset value. While the average deviation between the daily closing price and the daily NAV of ETFs that track domestic indices is generally less than 2%, the deviations may be more significant for ETFs that track certain foreign indices.[8] The Wall Street Journal reported in November 2008, during a period of market turbulence, that some lightly traded ETFs frequently had deviations of 5% or more, exceeding 10% in a handful of cases, although even for these niche ETFs, the average deviation was only a little more than 1%. The trades with the greatest deviations tended to be made immediately after the market opened.[76]
According to a study on ETF returns in 2009 by Morgan Stanley, ETFs missed in 2009 their targets by an average of 1.25 percentage points, a gap more than twice as wide as the 0.52-percentage-point average they posted in 2008.[77] Part of this so-called tracking error is attributed to the proliferation of ETFs targeting exotic investments or areas where trading is less frequent, such as emerging-market stocks, future-contracts based commodity indices and junk bonds.[citation needed]
The tax advantages of ETFs are of no relevance for investors using tax-deferred accounts (or indeed, investors who are tax-exempt in the first place).[78] However, the lower expense ratios are proving difficult for the proponents of traditional mutual funds to overcome.
In a survey of investment professionals, the most frequently cited disadvantage of ETFs was the unknown, untested indices used by many ETFs, followed by the overwhelming number of choices.[5]
Some critics claim that ETFs can be, and have been, used to manipulate market prices, including having been used for short selling that has been asserted by some observers (including Jim Cramer of theStreet.com) to have contributed to the market collapse of 2008.
Issuers of ETFs[edit]
Main article: List of exchange-traded funds

AdvisorShares: actively managed ETFs only, majority owned by Fund.com
Banco Itau: issues itnow in Bovespa
Bips Investment Managers: issues Bips (Beta Investment Performance Securities)
BNP Paribas: issues EasyETFs
BlackRock: issues iShares
Boost ETP: issues short (inverse) and leveraged exchange-traded products including 3X equity and commodity products
Charles Schwab: offers several commission-free ETFs for its clients
Deutsche Bank: issues db x-trackers ETFs, as well as managing PowerShares DB commodity- and currency-based ETFs
ETF Securities: issues ETFs or specialised commodity ETCs
Franklin Templeton: Issues liberty line of ETFs
Global X Funds: issues ETFs
Guggenheim Funds: issues specialty Guggenheim Funds ETFs
Horizons ETFs Management (USA): issues the Covered Call ETF (HSPX)
Indo Premier Investment Management: issues Premier ETFs in Indonesia Stock Exchange
Invesco: issues PowerShares ETFs, as well as BLDRS based on American Depositary Receipts
Lyxor Asset Management: issues Lyxor ETFs
Merrill Lynch: issues HOLDRs
ProShares: U.S.-based firm offering alternative ETFs
Source UK Services: a European joint-venture between Bank of America Merrill Lynch, Goldman Sachs, Morgan Stanley, Nomura and J. P. Morgan issues ETFs and ETCs
State Street Global Advisors: issues SPDRs
Van Eck Global: issues Market Vectors ETFs
Vanguard Group: issues Vanguard ETFs, formerly known as VIPERs
WisdomTree Investments

See also[edit]

Enhanced indexing
Pension fund
Separately managed account

References[edit]


^ "Introduction to Exchange-Traded Funds", Investopedia
^ "Exchange-Traded Funds (ETFs)". U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. Retrieved November 8, 2013. 
^ a b c d e f g h i Exchange-Traded Funds, SEC Release Nos. 33-8901, IC-28193, 73 Fed. Reg. 14618 (March 11, 2008).
^ State Street Global Advisors and Knowledge@Wharton, ETFs Changing the Way Advisors Do Business, According to State Street and Wharton Study, Business Wire (June 10, 2008).
^ a b The Impact of Exchange Traded Products on the Financial Advisory Industry: A Joint Study of State Street Global Advisors and Knowledge@Wharton (2008).
^ a b c d e Weinberg, Ari I. (6 December 2015). "Should You Fear the ETF? ETFs are scaring regulators and investors: Here are the dangers—real and perceived". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 7 December 2015. 
^ SPDR ETFs: Basics of Product Structure SSGA
^ a b c d e Actively Managed Exchange-Traded Funds, SEC Release No. IC-25258, 66 Fed. Reg. 57614 (November 8, 2001).
^ PowerShares Capital Management LLC, et al.; Notice of Application, Release No. IC-28140 (February 1, 2008), 73 Fed. Reg. 7328 (February 7, 2008) (notice); PowerShares Capital Management LLC, Release No. IC-28171 (February 27, 2008) (order). The SEC issued orders to Bear Stearns Asset Management, Inc., Barclays Global Fund Advisors, and WisdomTree Trust on the same day.
^ American Stock Exchange Lists First Actively-Managed Exchange Traded Fund (March 25, 2008).
^ a b c ETFConnect, "Index ETFs – Know Your Funds" (visited April 7, 2008).
^ Peaceful Gains. "A List of exchange-traded funds". Retrieved October 23, 2009. 
^ a b Gastineau, Gary (2002). The Exchange-Traded Funds Manual. John Wiley and Sons. p. 32. ISBN 978-0-471-21894-4. 
^ Carrel, Lawrence (2008), ETFs for the Long Run, John Wiley & Sons, ISBN 978-0-470-13894-6
^ Jennifer Bayot (December 10, 2004). "Nathan Most Is Dead at 90; Investment Fund Innovator". New York Times. Retrieved April 23, 2008. 
^ Wiandt, Jim; William McClatchy (2002). Exchange Traded Funds. John Wiley and Sons. p. 82. ISBN 0-471-22513-4. 
^ Fabozzi, Frank (2003). The Handbook of Financial Instruments. John Wiley and Sons. p. 532. ISBN 0-471-22092-2. 
^ Ferri, Richard A. (2008). The ETF Book, John Wiley and Sons, 191 ISBN 0-470-13063-6.
^ "ETF League Table as of Jan. 21, 2014". IndexUniverse. 
^ U.S. ETF Assets Hit $2 Trillion Milestone - Yahoo Finance
^ American Stock Exchange, ETFs – Individual Investor (visited April 7, 2008).
^ [ETF Statistics For June 2012: Actively Managed Assets Less Than 1% http://etfdailynews.com/2012/07/10/etf-statistics-for-june-2012-actively-managed-assets-less-than-1/]
^ The Case Against Leveraged ETFs, Seeking Alpha (May 17, 2007).
^ [1], Revenue Shares (July 10, 2015).
^ "Our Take on the Bond ETF Dilemma". News.morningstar.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ Stacy L. Fuller, The Evolution of Actively Managed Exchange-Traded Funds, Review of Securities & Commodities Regulation (April 16, 2008).
^ Banner Year of Dividend Growth Sends Cash to Dividend ETFs - Yahoo Finance
^ "Do You Need a Sector Fund?". Morningstar. 
^ Bond ETF Definition
^ "Indicators for Trading in Government Bond ETFs". Tradingmarkets.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "Bond ETFs: A Viable Alternative". Investopedia.com. September 19, 2009. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "Benchmark Asset Management Company conceptualises Gold ETF". Etfglobalinvestor.net. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "Largest ETFs: Top 25 ETFs By Market Cap". ETFdb. Retrieved November 3, 2010. 
^ Michael Sackheim, Michael Schmidtberger & James Munsell, DB Commodity Index Tracking Fund: An Innovative Exchange-Traded Fund, Futures Industry (May/June 2006).
^ Koyfman, Yevgeniy (August 21, 2009). "No Gas: Barclays Halts Issuance of Natural Gas ETN". Indexuniverse.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ tom Lauricella (November 2, 2009). "Gold Mutual Funds Vs. Gold ETFs: It Depends on the Goal". Online.wsj.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "The Future of Commodity ETFs". News.morningstar.com. August 25, 2009. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ Jaffe, Chuck. "Bear Stearns Current Yield (YYY)". The Seattle Time. 
^ David Hoffman, Active ETFs are, well, less active; Dynamics of trading translate into little active management, Investment News (April 21, 2008).
^ Tran, Hung. "MINT Tops BOND As Biggest Active ETF". IndexUniverse. 
^ AlphaBaskets.com report on active vs. index ETFs, AlphaBaskets.com (April 11, 2011).
^ a b "Buttonwood: Against the odds". The Economist. 
^ "All The HOLDRS Are Now History, NYSE Says". ETF.com. 
^ Palash R. Ghosh (August 18, 2005). "HOLDRs Vs. ETFs: What Investors Should Know". Investment Advisor. Summit Business Media. Retrieved January 8, 2011. 
^ Staff, Investopedia (2007-11-04). "Inverse ETF". Investopedia. Retrieved 2017-02-28. 
^ "ProFunds readies first leveraged ETFs - ETF Investing". MarketWatch. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "RYDEX ETF TRUST (Form: 485APOS, Received: 11/08/2006 16:27:55)". Esignal.brand.edgar-online.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ http://olympiainv.com/Memos/ETFs.pdf
^ Maxey, Daisy (August 4, 2009). "Fidelity the Latest to Caution on ETFs". Online.wsj.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "A Guide To Shorting Leveraged ETFs". www.signalplot.com. 
^ Leung, Tim (2014). "Implied Volatility of Leveraged ETF Options". Applied Mathematical Finance, Taylor & Francis. SSRN 2164518 .  Check date values in: |access-date= (help); Missing or empty |url= (help); |access-date= requires |url= (help)
^ https://www.reuters.com/article/us-sec-etfs-idUSKCN18C2RO
^ John M. Baker, Creation Units and the Rise of Exchange-Traded Funds, Investment Adviser (July 2000).
^ Mutual Fund Fees Jump 5 Percent on moneywatch.bnet.com
^ Fidelity Offers iShares ETFs Commission-Free on news.morningstar.com
^ Yates, Tristan. "Tristan Yates: What Can we Learn from the 2008 Leveraged ETF Collapse?". Tradingmarkets.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ Dan Culloton, Are ETFs Really More Tax-Efficient Than Mutual Funds? Morningstar (February 14, 2006).
^ The Problem With Vanguard VIPERs ETFs (December 29, 2009).
^ Vanguard ETFs have Different Tax Considerations Than Other ETFs (December 29, 2009).
^ ETF Tax Efficiency (December 29, 2009).
^ Steve Lodge (April 16, 2010). "Are ETF dividends taxed differently? - Yahoo! UK & Ireland Finance". Uk.finance.yahoo.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ Gastineau, Gary (2002). The Exchange-Traded Funds Manual. John Wiley and Sons. p. 227. ISBN 978-0-471-21894-4. 
^ Larry Connors, "Trading Covered Calls with ETFs", Tradingmarkets (March 4, 2008).
^ a b Kirilenko, Andrei; Kyle, Albert S.; Samadi, Mehrdad; Tuzun, Tugkan (May 5, 2014), The Flash Crash: The Impact of High Frequency Trading on an Electronic Market (PDF), retrieved 24 April 2015 
^ Avellaneda and Zhang, “Path-Dependence of Leveraged ETF Returns” SIAM J. of Financial Math, Vol. 1, pp. 586–603 2013. https://www.math.nyu.edu/faculty/avellane/SIAMLETFS.pdf.pdf
^ Guo and Leung, “Understanding the Tracking Errors of Commodity Leveraged ETFs” SSRN, 2013. http://papers.ssrn.com/sol3/papers.cfm?abstract_id=2389411
^ Amount as of July 2015; figure taken from the home page of http://www.spdrgoldshares.com/.
^ a b John Rubino, “Emerging Threat Funds?” CFA Magazine, September–October 2011. pp. 30–33.
^ Stephen Kovaka, Just Say No to the Silver ETF, SilverSeek.com (April 27, 2007)
^ Theodore Butler, The Smoking Gun, SilverSeek.com (August 22, 2008)
^ Global Financial Stability Report: Durable Financial Stability: Getting There from Here, April 2011
^ Financial Stability Board, “Potential financial stability issues arising from recent trends in Exchange-Traded Funds (ETFs)”, April 2011.
^ International Monetary Fund, Global Financial Stability Report: Durable Financial Stability: Getting There from Here, April 2011.
^ Srichander Ramaswamy, “Market structures and systemic risks of exchange-traded funds.” Working paper 343, April 2011. Bank for International Settlements.
^ John C. Bogle, 'Value' Strategies, Wall Street Journal (February 9, 2007).
^ Ian Salisbury, Some ETFs Fall Short on Pricing; Certain Trades Slip Below Value of Holdings, Wall Street Journal (November 21, 2008).
^ ETFs Were Wider Off the Mark in 2009, Wall Street Journal (February 19, 2010).
^ Wilfred Dellva, Exchange-Traded Funds Not for Everyone, Journal of Financial Planning (April 2001).


Further reading[edit]

Carrell, Lawrence. ETFs for the Long Run: What They Are, How They Work, and Simple Strategies for Successful Long-Term Investing. JW Wiley, 2008. ISBN 978-0-470-13894-6
Ferri, Richard A. The ETF Book: All You Need to Know About Exchange-Traded Funds. Wiley, 2009. ISBN 0-470-53746-9
Humphries, William. Leveraged ETFs: The Trojan Horse Has Passed the Margin-Rule Gates. 34 Seattle U.L. Rev. 299 (2010), available at [2].
Koesterich, Russ. The ETF Strategist: Balancing Risk and Reward for Superior Returns. Portfolio, 2008. ISBN 978-1-59184-207-1
Lemke, Thomas P; Lins, Gerald T. & McGuire, W. John. Regulation of Exchange-Traded Funds. Matthew Bender, 2015. ISBN 978-0-7698-9131-6

External links[edit]

The ETF Hall of Fame: 25 People Who Revolutionized the ETF Industry—ETF Database
Exchange Traded Funds (ETF)—Johannesburg Stock Exchange (JSE)
Exchange Traded Funds (ETF)—London Stock Exchange (LSE)
Exchange Traded Funds (ETFs) & Index Funds—NASDAQ Stock Market
Exchange Traded Products—New York Stock Exchange
Exchange Traded Funds (ETF)—Toronto Stock Exchange (TSX)
Exchange Traded Funds (ETF)—Australian Stock Exchange (ASX)
Exchange Traded Funds (ETFs) listed on XETRA or on Nasdaq OMX Nordic—ETFSverige.se information website
Using ETFs in investment portfolios—Exchange Traded Fund Basics, Investor Knowledge Centre (Vanguard Investments Australia)
Benefits of ETFs—Australian ETF Information Network
Cross-referenced list of funds—U.S., Canadian, and U.K. ETFs organized by industry, region, and investment strategy
Global ETF browser—Free ETF Screener based on fundamentals
Find ETFs by Stock Tool—Free tool for finding ETFs by its stocks
Worldwide Exchange Traded Funds—Investing.com global ETFs by category







v
t
e


Investment management



Investment fund
structures



Common contractual fund
Exchange-traded fund
Fond commun de placement
Fund of funds
Index fund
Investment trust
Hedge fund
Listed investment company
Mutual fund
Offshore fund
Open-ended investment company
Pension Fund
Private equity fund
Real estate investment trust
Royalty trust
SICAV
Umbrella fund
Unit investment trust
Unit trust
Unitised insurance fund





Investment styles



Active / passive management
Impact investing
Manager of managers
Socially responsible investing
Value / growth investing





Theory · Terminology



Closed-end fund
Efficient-market hypothesis
Net asset value
Open-end fund





Related topics



Alternative investment
Asset management firms
Robo-advisor
Returns-based style analysis
Traditional investments
UCITS










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Exchange-traded_fund&oldid=792170490"					
Categories: Exchange-traded fundsHidden categories: CS1 errors: datesPages using web citations with no URLPages using citations with accessdate and no URLUse mdy dates from August 2014All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from June 2017Articles with unsourced statements from April 2015Articles with unsourced statements from March 2013Articles with unsourced statements from August 2010 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةБългарскиBosanskiCatalàČeštinaDeutschEestiEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Bahasa IndonesiaItalianoLietuviųNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsРусскийSuomiSvenskaதமிழ்中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 24 July 2017, at 22:07.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Exchange-traded fund - Wikipedia





















 






Exchange-traded fund

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

An exchange-traded fund (ETF) is an investment fund traded on stock exchanges, much like stocks.[1][2] An ETF holds assets such as stocks, commodities, or bonds and generally operates with an arbitrage mechanism designed to keep it trading close to its net asset value,[3] although deviations can occasionally occur. Most ETFs track an index, such as a stock index or bond index. ETFs may be attractive as investments because of their low costs, tax efficiency, and stock-like features.[4][5] By 2013, ETFs had become the most popular type of exchange-traded product.[citation needed]
ETF distributors only buy or sell ETFs directly from or to authorized participants, which are large broker-dealers with whom they have entered into agreements—and then, only in creation units, which are large blocks of tens of thousands of ETF shares, usually exchanged in-kind with baskets of the underlying securities. Authorized participants may wish to invest in the ETF shares for the long-term, but they usually act as market makers on the open market, using their ability to exchange creation units with their underlying securities to provide liquidity of the ETF shares and help ensure that their intraday market price approximates the net asset value of the underlying assets.[3] Other investors, such as individuals using a retail broker, trade ETF shares on this secondary market.
An ETF combines the valuation feature of a mutual fund or unit investment trust, which can be bought or sold at the end of each trading day for its net asset value, with the tradability feature of a closed-end fund, which trades throughout the trading day at prices that may be more or less than its net asset value. Closed-end funds are not considered to be ETFs, even though they are funds and are traded on an exchange. ETFs have been available in the US since 1993 and in Europe since 1999. ETFs traditionally have been index funds, but in 2008 the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission began to authorize the creation of actively managed ETFs.[3]
ETFs offer both tax efficiency and lower transaction costs. More than US$2 trillion were invested in ETFs in the United States between when they were introduced in 1993 and 2015. By the end of 2015, ETFs offered "1,800 different products, covering almost every conceivable market sector, niche and trading strategy".[6]



Contents


1 Structure

1.1 United States


2 History
3 Investment uses
4 Types

4.1 Index ETFs
4.2 Stock ETFs
4.3 Bond ETFs
4.4 Commodity ETFs
4.5 Currency ETFs
4.6 Actively managed ETFs
4.7 Exchange-traded grantor trusts
4.8 Inverse ETFs
4.9 Leveraged ETFs


5 ETFs compared to mutual funds

5.1 Costs
5.2 Taxation
5.3 Trading


6 Regulation
7 Risks

7.1 Tracking error
7.2 Effects on stability
7.3 Regulatory risk
7.4 Counterparty risk


8 Liquidity
9 Criticism
10 Issuers of ETFs
11 See also
12 References
13 Further reading
14 External links



Structure[edit]
An ETF is a type of fund. It owns assets (bonds, stocks, gold bars, etc.) and divides ownership of itself into shares that are held by shareholders. The details of the structure (such as a corporation or trust) will vary by country, and even within one country there may be multiple possible structures.[7] The shareholders indirectly own the assets of the fund, and they will typically get an annual report. Shareholders are entitled to a share of the profits, such as interest or dividends, and they may get a residual value in case the fund is liquidated. Their ownership interest in the fund can easily be bought and sold.
ETFs are similar in many ways to traditional mutual funds, except that shares in an ETF can be bought and sold throughout the day like stocks on a stock exchange through a broker-dealer. Unlike traditional mutual funds, ETFs do not sell or redeem their individual shares at net asset value (NAV). Instead, financial institutions purchase and redeem ETF shares directly from the ETF, but only in large blocks (such as 50,000 shares), called creation units. Purchases and redemptions of the creation units generally are in kind, with the institutional investor contributing or receiving a basket of securities of the same type and proportion held by the ETF, although some ETFs may require or permit a purchasing or redeeming shareholder to substitute cash for some or all of the securities in the basket of assets.[3]
The ability to purchase and redeem creation units gives ETFs an arbitrage mechanism intended to minimize the potential deviation between the market price and the net asset value of ETF shares. Existing ETFs have transparent portfolios, so institutional investors will know exactly what portfolio assets they must assemble if they wish to purchase a creation unit, and the exchange disseminates the updated net asset value of the shares throughout the trading day, typically at 15-second intervals.[3]
If there is strong investor demand for an ETF, its share price will temporarily rise above its net asset value per share, giving arbitrageurs an incentive to purchase additional creation units from the ETF and sell the component ETF shares in the open market. The additional supply of ETF shares reduces the market price per share, generally eliminating the premium over net asset value. A similar process applies when there is weak demand for an ETF: its shares trade at a discount from net asset value.
United States[edit]
In the United States, most ETFs are structured as open-end management investment companies (the same structure used by mutual funds and money market funds), although a few ETFs, including some of the largest ones, are structured as unit investment trusts. ETFs structured as open-end funds have greater flexibility in constructing a portfolio and are not prohibited from participating in securities lending programs or from using futures and options in achieving their investment objectives.[8]
Under existing regulations, a new ETF must receive an order from the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC), giving it relief from provisions of the Investment Company Act of 1940 that would not otherwise allow the ETF structure. In 2008, the SEC proposed rules that would allow the creation of ETFs without the need for exemptive orders. Under the SEC proposal, an ETF would be defined as a registered open-end management investment company that:

issues (or redeems) creation units in exchange for the deposit (or delivery) of basket assets the current value of which is disseminated per share by a national securities exchange at regular intervals during the trading day
identifies itself as an ETF in any sales literature
issues shares that are approved for listing and trading on a securities exchange
discloses each business day on its publicly available web site the prior business day's net asset value and closing market price of the fund's shares, and the premium or discount of the closing market price against the net asset value of the fund's shares as a percentage of net asset value
either is an index fund, or discloses each business day on its publicly available web site the identities and weighting of the component securities and other assets held by the fund[3]

The SEC rule proposal would allow ETFs either to be index funds or to be fully transparent actively managed funds. Historically, all ETFs in the United States had been index funds.[citation needed] In 2008, however, the SEC began issuing exemptive orders to fully transparent actively managed ETFs. The first such order was to PowerShares Actively Managed Exchange-Traded Fund Trust,[9] and the first actively managed ETF in the United States was the Bear Stearns Current Yield Fund, a short-term income fund that began trading on the American Stock Exchange under the symbol YYY on March 25, 2008.[10] The SEC rule proposal indicates that the SEC may still consider future applications for exemptive orders for actively managed ETFs that do not satisfy the proposed rule's transparency requirements.[3]
Some ETFs invest primarily in commodities or commodity-based instruments, such as crude oil and precious metals. Although these commodity ETFs are similar in practice to ETFs that invest in securities, they are not investment companies under the Investment Company Act of 1940.[3]
Publicly traded grantor trusts, such as Merrill Lynch's HOLDRs securities, are sometimes considered to be ETFs, although they lack many of the characteristics of other ETFs. Investors in a grantor trust have a direct interest in the underlying basket of securities, which does not change except to reflect corporate actions such as stock splits and mergers. Funds of this type are not investment companies under the Investment Company Act of 1940.[11]
As of 2009, there were approximately 1,500 exchange-traded funds traded on US exchanges.[12] This count uses the wider definition of ETF, including HOLDRs and closed-end funds.
History[edit]
ETFs had their genesis in 1989 with Index Participation Shares, an S&P 500 proxy that traded on the American Stock Exchange and the Philadelphia Stock Exchange. This product, however, was short-lived after a lawsuit by the Chicago Mercantile Exchange was successful in stopping sales in the United States.[13]
A similar product, Toronto Index Participation Shares, started trading on the Toronto Stock Exchange (TSE) in 1990. The shares, which tracked the TSE 35 and later the TSE 100 indices, proved to be popular. The popularity of these products led the American Stock Exchange to try to develop something that would satisfy SEC regulation in the United States.[13]
Nathan Most and Steven Bloom, under the direction of Ivers Riley, designed and developed Standard & Poor's Depositary Receipts (NYSE Arca: SPY), which were introduced in January 1993.[14][15] Known as SPDRs or "Spiders", the fund became the largest ETF in the world. In May 1995 they introduced the MidCap SPDRs (NYSE Arca: MDY).
Barclays Global Investors, a subsidiary of Barclays PLC, in conjunction with MSCI and as its underwriter, a Boston-based third party distributor, Funds Distributor Inc., entered the market in 1996 with World Equity Benchmark Shares (WEBS), which became iShares MSCI Index Fund Shares. WEBS tracked MSCI country indices, originally 17, of the funds' index provider, Morgan Stanley. WEBS were particularly innovative because they gave casual investors easy access to foreign markets. While SPDRs were organized as unit investment trusts, WEBS were set up as a mutual fund, the first of their kind.[16][17]
In 1998, State Street Global Advisors introduced "Sector Spiders", which follow nine sectors of the S&P 500.[18] Also in 1998, the "Dow Diamonds" (NYSE Arca: DIA) were introduced, tracking the famous Dow Jones Industrial Average. In 1999, the influential "cubes" (NASDAQ: QQQ), were launched attempting to replicate the movement of the NASDAQ-100.
In 2000, Barclays Global Investors put a significant effort behind the ETF marketplace, with a strong emphasis on education and distribution to reach long-term investors. The iShares line was launched in early 2000. Within five years iShares had surpassed the assets of any other ETF competitor in the U.S. and Europe. Barclays Global Investors was sold to BlackRock in 2009.
The Vanguard Group entered the market in 2001. The first fund was Vanguard Total Stock Market ETF (NYSE Arca: VTI), which has become quite popular, and they made the Vanguard Extended Market Index ETF (VXF). Some of Vanguard's ETFs are a share class of an existing mutual fund.
iShares made the first bond funds in July 2002, based on US Treasury bonds and corporate bonds, such as iShares iBoxx $ Invst Grade Crp Bond (LQD). They also created a TIPS fund. In 2007, they introduced funds based on junk and muni bonds; about the same time SPDR and Vanguard got in gear and created several of their bond funds.
Since then ETFs have proliferated, tailored to an increasingly specific array of regions, sectors, commodities, bonds, futures, and other asset classes. As of January 2014, there were over 1,500 ETFs traded in the U.S., with over $1.7 trillion in assets.[19] In December 2014, U.S. ETF assets went above $2 trillion.[20]
Investment uses[edit]
ETFs generally provide the easy diversification, low expense ratios, and tax efficiency of index funds, while still maintaining all the features of ordinary stock, such as limit orders, short selling, and options. Because ETFs can be economically acquired, held, and disposed of, some investors invest in ETF shares as a long-term investment for asset allocation purposes, while other investors trade ETF shares frequently to implement market timing investment strategies.[8] Among the advantages of ETFs are the following:[11][21]

Lower costs: ETFs generally have lower costs than other investment products because most ETFs are not actively managed and because ETFs are insulated from the costs of having to buy and sell securities to accommodate shareholder purchases and redemptions. ETFs typically have lower marketing, distribution and accounting expenses, and most ETFs do not have 12b-1 fees.
Buying and selling flexibility: ETFs can be bought and sold at current market prices at any time during the trading day, unlike mutual funds and unit investment trusts, which can only be traded at the end of the trading day. As publicly traded securities, their shares can be purchased on margin and sold short, enabling the use of hedging strategies, and traded using stop orders and limit orders, which allow investors to specify the price points at which they are willing to trade.
Tax efficiency: ETFs generally generate relatively low capital gains, because they typically have low turnover of their portfolio securities. While this is an advantage they share with other index funds, their tax efficiency is further enhanced because they do not have to sell securities to meet investor redemptions.
Market exposure and diversification: ETFs provide an economical way to rebalance portfolio allocations and to "equitize" cash by investing it quickly. An index ETF inherently provides diversification across an entire index. ETFs offer exposure to a diverse variety of markets, including broad-based indices, broad-based international and country-specific indices, industry sector-specific indices, bond indices, and commodities.
Transparency: ETFs, whether index funds or actively managed, have transparent portfolios and are priced at frequent intervals throughout the trading day.

Some of these advantages derive from the status of most ETFs as index funds.
Types[edit]
For more details on this topic, see List of American exchange-traded funds.
Index ETFs[edit]
Most ETFs are index funds that attempt to replicate the performance of a specific index. Indexes may be based on stocks, bonds, commodities, or currencies. An index fund seeks to track the performance of an index by holding in its portfolio either the contents of the index or a representative sample of the securities in the index.[8] As of June 2012, in the United States, about 1200 index ETFs exist, with about 50 actively managed ETFs. Index ETF assets are about $1.2 trillion, compared with about $7 billion for actively managed ETFs.[22] Some index ETFs, known as leveraged ETFs or inverse ETFs, use investments in derivatives to seek a return that corresponds to a multiple of, or the inverse (opposite) of, the daily performance of the index.[23]
Some index ETFs invest 100% of their assets proportionately in the securities underlying an index, a manner of investing called replication. Other index ETFs use representative sampling, investing 80% to 95% of their assets in the securities of an underlying index and investing the remaining 5% to 20% of their assets in other holdings, such as futures, option and swap contracts, and securities not in the underlying index, that the fund's adviser believes will help the ETF to achieve its investment objective. There are various ways the ETF can be weighted, such as equal weighting or revenue weighting.[24] For index ETFs that invest in indices with thousands of underlying securities, some index ETFs employ "aggressive sampling" and invest in only a tiny percentage of the underlying securities.[25][26]
Stock ETFs[edit]
The first and most popular ETFs track stocks. Many funds track national indexes; for example, Vanguard Total Stock Market ETF NYSE Arca: VTI tracks the CRSP U.S. Total Market Index, and several funds track the S&P 500, both indexes for US stocks. Other funds own stocks from many countries; for example, Vanguard Total International Stock Index NYSE Arca: VXUS tracks the MSCI All Country World ex USA Investable Market Index, while the iShares MSCI EAFE Index NYSE Arca: EFA tracks the MSCI EAFE Index, both "world ex-US" indexes.
Stock ETFs can have different styles, such as large-cap, small-cap, growth, value, et cetera. For example, the S&P 500 index is large- and mid-cap, so the SPDR S&P 500 ETF will not contain small-cap stocks. Others such as iShares Russell 2000 are mainly for small-cap stocks. There are many style ETFs such as iShares Russell 1000 Growth and iShares Russell 1000 Value. ETFs focusing on dividends have been popular in the first few years of the 2010s decade, such as iShares Select Dividend.[27]
ETFs can also be sector funds. These can be broad sectors, like finance and technology, or specific niche areas, like green power. They can also be for one country or global. Critics have said that no one needs a sector fund.[28] This point is not really specific to ETFs; the issues are the same as with mutual funds. The funds are popular since people can put their money into the latest fashionable trend, rather than investing in boring areas with no "cachet".
Bond ETFs[edit]
Exchange-traded funds that invest in bonds are known as bond ETFs.[29] They thrive during economic recessions because investors pull their money out of the stock market and into bonds (for example, government treasury bonds or those issued by companies regarded as financially stable). Because of this cause and effect relationship, the performance of bond ETFs may be indicative of broader economic conditions.[30] There are several advantages to bond ETFs such as the reasonable trading commissions, but this benefit can be negatively offset by fees if bought and sold through a third party.[31]
Commodity ETFs[edit]
Commodity ETFs (CETFs or ETCs) invest in commodities, such as precious metals, agricultural products, or hydrocarbons. Among the first commodity ETFs were gold exchange-traded funds, which have been offered in a number of countries. The idea of a Gold ETF was first officially conceptualised by Benchmark Asset Management Company Private Ltd in India when they filed a proposal with the SEBI in May 2002.[32] The first gold exchange-traded fund was Gold Bullion Securities launched on the ASX in 2003, and the first silver exchange-traded fund was iShares Silver Trust launched on the NYSE in 2006. As of November 2010 a commodity ETF, namely SPDR Gold Shares, was the second-largest ETF by market capitalization.[33]
However, generally commodity ETFs are index funds tracking non-security indices. Because they do not invest in securities, commodity ETFs are not regulated as investment companies under the Investment Company Act of 1940 in the United States, although their public offering is subject to SEC review and they need an SEC no-action letter under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. They may, however, be subject to regulation by the Commodity Futures Trading Commission.[34][35]
The earliest commodity ETFs, such as SPDR Gold Shares (NYSE Arca: GLD) and iShares Silver Trust (NYSE Arca: SLV), owned the physical commodity (e.g., gold and silver bars). Similar to these are ETFS Physical Palladium (NYSE Arca: PALL) and ETFS Physical Platinum (NYSE Arca: PPLT). However, most ETCs implement a futures trading strategy, which may produce quite different results from owning the commodity.
Commodity ETFs trade just like shares, are simple and efficient and provide exposure to an ever-increasing range of commodities and commodity indices, including energy, metals, softs and agriculture. However, it is important for an investor to realize that there are often other factors that affect the price of a commodity ETF that might not be immediately apparent. For example, buyers of an oil ETF such as USO might think that as long as oil goes up, they will profit roughly linearly. What isn't clear to the novice investor is the method by which these funds gain exposure to their underlying commodities. In the case of many commodity funds, they simply roll so-called front-month futures contracts from month to month. This does give exposure to the commodity, but subjects the investor to risks involved in different prices along the term structure, such as a high cost to roll.[36][37]
ETC can also refer to exchange-traded notes, which are not exchange-traded funds.
Currency ETFs[edit]
In 2005, Rydex Investments launched the first currency ETF called the Euro Currency Trust (NYSE Arca: FXE) in New York. Since then Rydex has launched a series of funds tracking all major currencies under their brand CurrencyShares. In 2007 Deutsche Bank's db x-trackers launched EONIA Total Return Index ETF in Frankfurt tracking the euro, and later in 2008 the Sterling Money Market ETF (LSE: XGBP) and US Dollar Money Market ETF (LSE: XUSD) in London. In 2009, ETF Securities launched the world's largest FX platform tracking the MSFXSM Index covering 18 long or short USD ETC vs. single G10 currencies. The funds are total return products where the investor gets access to the FX spot change, local institutional interest rates and a collateral yield.
Actively managed ETFs[edit]
See also: List of American exchange-traded funds § Active ETFs
Most ETFs are index funds, but some ETFs do have active management. Actively managed ETFs have been offered in the United States only since 2008. The first active ETF was Bear Stearns Current Yield ETF (Ticker: YYY).[38] Currently, actively managed ETFs are fully transparent, publishing their current securities portfolios on their web sites daily. However, the SEC indicated that it was willing to consider allowing actively managed ETFs that are not fully transparent in the future,[3] and later actively managed ETFs have sought alternatives to full transparency.
The fully transparent nature of existing ETFs means that an actively managed ETF is at risk from arbitrage activities by market participants who might choose to front run its trades as daily reports of the ETF's holdings reveals its manager's trading strategy. The initial actively managed equity ETFs addressed this problem by trading only weekly or monthly. Actively managed debt ETFs, which are less susceptible to front-running, trade their holdings more frequently.[39]
The actively managed ETF market has largely been seen as more favorable to bond funds, because concerns about disclosing bond holdings are less pronounced, there are fewer product choices, and there is increased appetite for bond products. Pimco's Enhanced Short Duration ETF NYSE: MINT is the largest actively managed ETF, with approximately $3.93 billion in assets as of May 16, 2014.[40]
Actively managed ETFs grew faster in their first three years of existence than index ETFs did in their first three years of existence. As track records develop, many see actively managed ETFs as a significant competitive threat to actively managed mutual funds.[41] However, many academic studies have questioned the value of active management. Jack Bogle of Vanguard Group wrote an article in the Financial Analysts Journal where he estimated that higher fees as well as hidden costs (such a more trading fees and lower return from holding cash) reduce returns for investors by around 2.66 percentage points a year "a huge differential considering that long-term real returns from American equities have been 6.45%."[42] Even without considering hidden costs, high fees negatively affect long-term performance. In another Financial Analysts Journal article, Nobel laureate, Bill Sharpe "calculated that someone who saved via a low-cost fund would have a standard of living in retirement 20% higher than someone who saved in a high-cost fund".[42]
Exchange-traded grantor trusts[edit]
An exchange-traded grantor trust was used to give a direct interest in a static basket of stocks selected from a particular industry. Such products have some properties in common with ETFs—low costs, low turnover, and tax efficiency:but are generally regarded as separate from ETFs. The leading example was Holding Company Depositary Receipts, or HOLDRs, a proprietary Merrill Lynch product, but these have now disappeared from the scene.[11][43][44] SPDR Gold Shares is a grantor trust.
Inverse ETFs[edit]
Main article: Inverse exchange-traded fund
Inverse ETFs are constructed by using various derivatives for the purpose of profiting from a decline in the value of the underlying benchmark. It is a similar type of investment to holding several short positions or using a combination of advanced investment strategies to profit from falling prices. Many inverse ETFs use daily futures as their underlying benchmark.[45]
Leveraged ETFs[edit]
Leveraged exchange-traded funds (LETFs or leveraged ETFs) are a type of ETF that attempt to achieve returns that are more sensitive to market movements than non-leveraged ETFs.[46] Leveraged index ETFs are often marketed as bull or bear funds. A leveraged bull ETF fund might for example attempt to achieve daily returns that are 2x or 3x more pronounced than the Dow Jones Industrial Average or the S&P 500. A leveraged inverse (bear) ETF fund on the other hand may attempt to achieve returns that are -2x or -3x the daily index return, meaning that it will gain double or triple the loss of the market. Leveraged ETFs require the use of financial engineering techniques, including the use of equity swaps, derivatives and rebalancing, and re-indexing to achieve the desired return.[47] The most common way to construct leveraged ETFs is by trading futures contracts.
The rebalancing and re-indexing of leveraged ETFs may have considerable costs when markets are volatile.[48][49] The rebalancing problem is that the fund manager incurs trading losses because he needs to buy when the index goes up and sell when the index goes down in order to maintain a fixed leverage ratio. A 2.5% daily change in the index will for example reduce value of a -2x bear fund by about 0.18% per day, which means that about a third of the fund may be wasted in trading losses within a year (1-(1-0.18%)252=36.5%). Investors may however circumvent this problem by buying or writing futures directly, accepting a varying leverage ratio.[citation needed] A more reasonable estimate of daily market changes is 0.5%, which leads to a 2.6% yearly loss of principal in a 3x leveraged fund.
The re-indexing problem of leveraged ETFs stems from the arithmetic effect of volatility of the underlying index.[50] Take, for example, an index that begins at 100 and a 2X fund based on that index that also starts at 100. In a first trading period (for example, a day), the index rises 10% to 110. The 2X fund will then rise 20% to 120. The index then drops back to 100 (a drop of 9.09%), so that it is now even. The drop in the 2X fund will be 18.18% (2*9.09). But 18.18% of 120 is 21.82. This puts the value of the 2X fund at 98.18. Even though the index is unchanged after two trading periods, an investor in the 2X fund would have lost 1.82%. This decline in value can be even greater for inverse funds (leveraged funds with negative multipliers such as -1, -2, or -3). It always occurs when the change in value of the underlying index changes direction. And the decay in value increases with volatility of the underlying index.
The effect of leverage is also reflected in the pricing of options written on leveraged ETFs. In particular, the terminal payoff of a leveraged ETF European/American put or call depends on the realized variance (hence the path) of the underlying index. The impact of leverage ratio can also be observed from the implied volatility surfaces of leveraged ETF options.[51] For instance, the implied volatility curves of inverse leveraged ETFs (with negative multipliers such as -1, -2, or -3) are commonly observed to be increasing in strike, which is characteristically different from the implied volatility smiles or skews seen for index options or non-leveraged ETF options.
The SEC, in May 2017, granted approval of a pair of 4x leveraged ETF related to S&P 500 Futures, before rescinding the approval a few weeks later. The decision concerns two potential products: ForceShares Daily 4X US Market Futures Long Fund, which would have listed under the ticker UP, and ForceShares Daily 4X US Market Futures Short Fund, with the ticker DOWN.[52]
ETFs compared to mutual funds[edit]
Costs[edit]
ETFs have a reputation for lower costs than traditional mutual funds. This will be evident as a lower expense ratio. This is mainly from two factors, the fact that most ETFs are index funds and some advantages of the ETF structure. However, this needs to be compared in each case, since some index mutual funds also have a very low expense ratio, and some ETFs' expense ratios are relatively high. An index fund is much simpler to run, since it does not require some security selection, and can be largely done by computer. Not only does an ETF have lower shareholder-related expenses, but because it does not have to invest cash contributions or fund cash redemptions, an ETF does not have to maintain a cash reserve for redemptions and saves on brokerage expenses.[53] Mutual funds can charge 1% to 3%, or more; index fund expense ratios are generally lower, while ETFs are almost always less than 1%. Over the long term, these cost differences can compound into a noticeable difference.[54]
Because ETFs trade on an exchange, each transaction is generally subject to a brokerage commission. Commissions depend on the brokerage and which plan is chosen by the customer. For example, a typical flat fee schedule from an online brokerage firm in the United States ranges from $10 to $20, but it can be as low as $0 with discount brokers. Due to this commission cost, the amount invested has a great bearing; someone who wishes to invest $100 per month may have a significant percentage of their investment destroyed immediately, while for someone making a $200,000 investment, the commission cost may be negligible. Generally, mutual funds obtained directly from the fund company itself do not charge a brokerage fee. Thus, when low or no-cost transactions are available, ETFs become very competitive.[55]
The cost difference is more evident when compared with mutual funds that charge a front-end or back-end load as ETFs do not have loads at all. The redemption fee and short-term trading fees are examples of other fees associated with mutual funds that do not exist with ETFs. Traders should be cautious if they plan to trade inverse and leveraged ETFs for short periods of time. Close attention should be paid to transaction costs and daily performance rates as the potential combined compound loss can sometimes go unrecognized and offset potential gains over a longer period of time.[56]
Taxation[edit]
ETFs are structured for tax efficiency and can be more attractive than mutual funds. In the U.S., whenever a mutual fund realizes a capital gain that is not balanced by a realized loss, the mutual fund must distribute the capital gains to its shareholders. This can happen whenever the mutual fund sells portfolio securities, whether to reallocate its investments or to fund shareholder redemptions. These gains are taxable to all shareholders, even those who reinvest the gains distributions in more shares of the fund. In contrast, ETFs are not redeemed by holders (instead, holders simply sell their ETF shares on the stock market, as they would a stock, or effect a non-taxable redemption of a creation unit for portfolio securities), so that investors generally only realize capital gains when they sell their own shares or when the ETF trades to reflect changes in the underlying index.[8]
In most cases, ETFs are more tax-efficient than conventional mutual funds in the same asset classes or categories.[57] Because Vanguard's ETFs are a share-class of their mutual funds, they don't get all the tax advantages if there are net redemptions on the mutual fund shares.[58] Although they do not get all the tax advantages, they get an additional advantage from tax loss harvesting any capital losses from net redemptions.[59][60]
In the U.K., ETFs can be shielded from capital gains tax by placing them in an Individual Savings Account or self-invested personal pension, in the same manner as many other shares. Because UK-resident ETFs would be liable for UK corporation tax on non-UK dividends, most ETFs which hold non-UK companies sold to UK investors are issued in Ireland or Luxembourg.[61]
Trading[edit]
An important benefit of an ETF is the stock-like features offered. A mutual fund is bought or sold at the end of a day's trading, whereas ETFs can be traded whenever the market is open. Since ETFs trade on the market, investors can carry out the same types of trades that they can with a stock. For instance, investors can sell short, use a limit order, use a stop-loss order, buy on margin, and invest as much or as little money as they wish (there is no minimum investment requirement).[62] Also, many ETFs have the capability for options (puts and calls) to be written against them. Covered call strategies allow investors and traders to potentially increase their returns on their ETF purchases by collecting premiums (the proceeds of a call sale or write) on calls written against them. Mutual funds do not offer those features.[63]
Regulation[edit]
New regulations were put in place following the 2010 Flash Crash, when prices of ETFs and other stocks and options became volatile, with trading markets spiking[64]:1 and bids falling as low as a penny a share[6] in what the Commodity Futures Trading Commission (CFTC) investigation described as one of the most turbulent periods in the history of financial markets.[64]:1
These regulations proved to be inadequate to protect investors in the August 24, 2015 flash crash,[6] "when the price of many ETFs appeared to come unhinged from their underlying value". ETFs were consequently put under even greater scrutiny by regulators and investors.[6] Analysts at Morningstar claimed in December 2015 that "ETFs are a “digital-age technology” governed by “Depression-era legislation,”"[6]
Risks[edit]
Tracking error[edit]
The ETF tracking error is the difference between the returns of the ETF and its reference index or asset. A non-zero tracking error therefore represents a failure to replicate the reference as stated in the ETF prospectus. The tracking error is computed based on the prevailing price of the ETF and its reference. It is different than the premium/discount which is the difference between the ETF’s NAV (updated only once a day) and its market price. Tracking errors are more significant when the ETF provider uses strategies other than full replication of the underlying index. Some of the most liquid equity ETFs tend to have better tracking performance because the underlying is also sufficiently liquid, allowing for full replication.[65] In contrast, some ETFs, such as commodities ETFs and their leveraged ETFs, do not necessarily employ full replication because the physical assets cannot be stored easily or used to create a leveraged exposure, or the reference asset or index is illiquid.[66] Futures-based ETFs may also suffer from negative roll yields, as seen in the VIX futures market.
Effects on stability[edit]
ETFs that buy and hold commodities or futures of commodities have become popular. For example, SPDR Gold Shares ETF (GLD) has 21 million ounces in trust.[67] The silver ETF, SLV, is also very large. The commodity ETFs are in effect consumers of their target commodities, thereby affecting the price in a spurious fashion.[68][69][70] In the words of the IMF, “Some market participants believe the growing popularity of exchange-traded funds (ETFs) may have contributed to equity price appreciation in some emerging economies, and warn that leverage embedded in ETFs could pose financial stability risks if equity prices were to decline for a protracted period.”[71]
Regulatory risk[edit]
Synthetic ETFs are attracting regulatory attention from the FSB,[72] the IMF,[73] and the BIS.[74] Areas of concern include the lack of transparency in products and increasing complexity; conflicts of interest; and lack of regulatory compliance.
Counterparty risk[edit]
A synthetic ETF has counterparty risk, because the counterparty is contractually obligated to match the return on the index. The deal is arranged with collateral posted by the swap counterparty. A potential hazard is that the investment bank offering the ETF might post its own collateral, and that collateral could be of dubious quality. Furthermore, the investment bank could use its own trading desk as counterparty. These types of set-ups are not allowed under the European guidelines, Undertakings for Collective Investment in Transferable Securities (UCITS), so the investor should look for UCITS III-compliant funds.[68]
Liquidity[edit]
ETFs have a wide range of liquidity. Some funds are constantly traded, with tens of millions of shares per day changing hands, while others trade only once in a while, even not trading for some days. There are many funds that do not trade very often. This just means that most trading is conducted in the most popular funds. The most active funds (such as SPY, IWM, QQQ, et cetera) are very liquid, with high volume and tight spreads. In these cases, the investor is almost sure to get a "reasonable" price, even in difficult conditions. With other funds, it is worthwhile to take some care in execution. This does not mean that less popular funds are not a quality investment. This is in contrast with traditional mutual funds, where everyone who trades on the same day gets the same price.
Criticism[edit]
John C. Bogle, founder of the Vanguard Group, a leading issuer of index mutual funds (and, since Bogle's retirement, of ETFs), has argued that ETFs represent short-term speculation, that their trading expenses decrease returns to investors, and that most ETFs provide insufficient diversification. He concedes that a broadly diversified ETF that is held over time can be a good investment.[75]
ETFs are dependent on the efficacy of the arbitrage mechanism in order for their share price to track net asset value. While the average deviation between the daily closing price and the daily NAV of ETFs that track domestic indices is generally less than 2%, the deviations may be more significant for ETFs that track certain foreign indices.[8] The Wall Street Journal reported in November 2008, during a period of market turbulence, that some lightly traded ETFs frequently had deviations of 5% or more, exceeding 10% in a handful of cases, although even for these niche ETFs, the average deviation was only a little more than 1%. The trades with the greatest deviations tended to be made immediately after the market opened.[76]
According to a study on ETF returns in 2009 by Morgan Stanley, ETFs missed in 2009 their targets by an average of 1.25 percentage points, a gap more than twice as wide as the 0.52-percentage-point average they posted in 2008.[77] Part of this so-called tracking error is attributed to the proliferation of ETFs targeting exotic investments or areas where trading is less frequent, such as emerging-market stocks, future-contracts based commodity indices and junk bonds.[citation needed]
The tax advantages of ETFs are of no relevance for investors using tax-deferred accounts (or indeed, investors who are tax-exempt in the first place).[78] However, the lower expense ratios are proving difficult for the proponents of traditional mutual funds to overcome.
In a survey of investment professionals, the most frequently cited disadvantage of ETFs was the unknown, untested indices used by many ETFs, followed by the overwhelming number of choices.[5]
Some critics claim that ETFs can be, and have been, used to manipulate market prices, including having been used for short selling that has been asserted by some observers (including Jim Cramer of theStreet.com) to have contributed to the market collapse of 2008.
Issuers of ETFs[edit]
Main article: List of exchange-traded funds

AdvisorShares: actively managed ETFs only, majority owned by Fund.com
Banco Itau: issues itnow in Bovespa
Bips Investment Managers: issues Bips (Beta Investment Performance Securities)
BNP Paribas: issues EasyETFs
BlackRock: issues iShares
Boost ETP: issues short (inverse) and leveraged exchange-traded products including 3X equity and commodity products
Charles Schwab: offers several commission-free ETFs for its clients
Deutsche Bank: issues db x-trackers ETFs, as well as managing PowerShares DB commodity- and currency-based ETFs
ETF Securities: issues ETFs or specialised commodity ETCs
Franklin Templeton: Issues liberty line of ETFs
Global X Funds: issues ETFs
Guggenheim Funds: issues specialty Guggenheim Funds ETFs
Horizons ETFs Management (USA): issues the Covered Call ETF (HSPX)
Indo Premier Investment Management: issues Premier ETFs in Indonesia Stock Exchange
Invesco: issues PowerShares ETFs, as well as BLDRS based on American Depositary Receipts
Lyxor Asset Management: issues Lyxor ETFs
Merrill Lynch: issues HOLDRs
ProShares: U.S.-based firm offering alternative ETFs
Source UK Services: a European joint-venture between Bank of America Merrill Lynch, Goldman Sachs, Morgan Stanley, Nomura and J. P. Morgan issues ETFs and ETCs
State Street Global Advisors: issues SPDRs
Van Eck Global: issues Market Vectors ETFs
Vanguard Group: issues Vanguard ETFs, formerly known as VIPERs
WisdomTree Investments

See also[edit]

Enhanced indexing
Pension fund
Separately managed account

References[edit]


^ "Introduction to Exchange-Traded Funds", Investopedia
^ "Exchange-Traded Funds (ETFs)". U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. Retrieved November 8, 2013. 
^ a b c d e f g h i Exchange-Traded Funds, SEC Release Nos. 33-8901, IC-28193, 73 Fed. Reg. 14618 (March 11, 2008).
^ State Street Global Advisors and Knowledge@Wharton, ETFs Changing the Way Advisors Do Business, According to State Street and Wharton Study, Business Wire (June 10, 2008).
^ a b The Impact of Exchange Traded Products on the Financial Advisory Industry: A Joint Study of State Street Global Advisors and Knowledge@Wharton (2008).
^ a b c d e Weinberg, Ari I. (6 December 2015). "Should You Fear the ETF? ETFs are scaring regulators and investors: Here are the dangers—real and perceived". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 7 December 2015. 
^ SPDR ETFs: Basics of Product Structure SSGA
^ a b c d e Actively Managed Exchange-Traded Funds, SEC Release No. IC-25258, 66 Fed. Reg. 57614 (November 8, 2001).
^ PowerShares Capital Management LLC, et al.; Notice of Application, Release No. IC-28140 (February 1, 2008), 73 Fed. Reg. 7328 (February 7, 2008) (notice); PowerShares Capital Management LLC, Release No. IC-28171 (February 27, 2008) (order). The SEC issued orders to Bear Stearns Asset Management, Inc., Barclays Global Fund Advisors, and WisdomTree Trust on the same day.
^ American Stock Exchange Lists First Actively-Managed Exchange Traded Fund (March 25, 2008).
^ a b c ETFConnect, "Index ETFs – Know Your Funds" (visited April 7, 2008).
^ Peaceful Gains. "A List of exchange-traded funds". Retrieved October 23, 2009. 
^ a b Gastineau, Gary (2002). The Exchange-Traded Funds Manual. John Wiley and Sons. p. 32. ISBN 978-0-471-21894-4. 
^ Carrel, Lawrence (2008), ETFs for the Long Run, John Wiley & Sons, ISBN 978-0-470-13894-6
^ Jennifer Bayot (December 10, 2004). "Nathan Most Is Dead at 90; Investment Fund Innovator". New York Times. Retrieved April 23, 2008. 
^ Wiandt, Jim; William McClatchy (2002). Exchange Traded Funds. John Wiley and Sons. p. 82. ISBN 0-471-22513-4. 
^ Fabozzi, Frank (2003). The Handbook of Financial Instruments. John Wiley and Sons. p. 532. ISBN 0-471-22092-2. 
^ Ferri, Richard A. (2008). The ETF Book, John Wiley and Sons, 191 ISBN 0-470-13063-6.
^ "ETF League Table as of Jan. 21, 2014". IndexUniverse. 
^ U.S. ETF Assets Hit $2 Trillion Milestone - Yahoo Finance
^ American Stock Exchange, ETFs – Individual Investor (visited April 7, 2008).
^ [ETF Statistics For June 2012: Actively Managed Assets Less Than 1% http://etfdailynews.com/2012/07/10/etf-statistics-for-june-2012-actively-managed-assets-less-than-1/]
^ The Case Against Leveraged ETFs, Seeking Alpha (May 17, 2007).
^ [1], Revenue Shares (July 10, 2015).
^ "Our Take on the Bond ETF Dilemma". News.morningstar.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ Stacy L. Fuller, The Evolution of Actively Managed Exchange-Traded Funds, Review of Securities & Commodities Regulation (April 16, 2008).
^ Banner Year of Dividend Growth Sends Cash to Dividend ETFs - Yahoo Finance
^ "Do You Need a Sector Fund?". Morningstar. 
^ Bond ETF Definition
^ "Indicators for Trading in Government Bond ETFs". Tradingmarkets.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "Bond ETFs: A Viable Alternative". Investopedia.com. September 19, 2009. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "Benchmark Asset Management Company conceptualises Gold ETF". Etfglobalinvestor.net. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "Largest ETFs: Top 25 ETFs By Market Cap". ETFdb. Retrieved November 3, 2010. 
^ Michael Sackheim, Michael Schmidtberger & James Munsell, DB Commodity Index Tracking Fund: An Innovative Exchange-Traded Fund, Futures Industry (May/June 2006).
^ Koyfman, Yevgeniy (August 21, 2009). "No Gas: Barclays Halts Issuance of Natural Gas ETN". Indexuniverse.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ tom Lauricella (November 2, 2009). "Gold Mutual Funds Vs. Gold ETFs: It Depends on the Goal". Online.wsj.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "The Future of Commodity ETFs". News.morningstar.com. August 25, 2009. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ Jaffe, Chuck. "Bear Stearns Current Yield (YYY)". The Seattle Time. 
^ David Hoffman, Active ETFs are, well, less active; Dynamics of trading translate into little active management, Investment News (April 21, 2008).
^ Tran, Hung. "MINT Tops BOND As Biggest Active ETF". IndexUniverse. 
^ AlphaBaskets.com report on active vs. index ETFs, AlphaBaskets.com (April 11, 2011).
^ a b "Buttonwood: Against the odds". The Economist. 
^ "All The HOLDRS Are Now History, NYSE Says". ETF.com. 
^ Palash R. Ghosh (August 18, 2005). "HOLDRs Vs. ETFs: What Investors Should Know". Investment Advisor. Summit Business Media. Retrieved January 8, 2011. 
^ Staff, Investopedia (2007-11-04). "Inverse ETF". Investopedia. Retrieved 2017-02-28. 
^ "ProFunds readies first leveraged ETFs - ETF Investing". MarketWatch. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "RYDEX ETF TRUST (Form: 485APOS, Received: 11/08/2006 16:27:55)". Esignal.brand.edgar-online.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ http://olympiainv.com/Memos/ETFs.pdf
^ Maxey, Daisy (August 4, 2009). "Fidelity the Latest to Caution on ETFs". Online.wsj.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "A Guide To Shorting Leveraged ETFs". www.signalplot.com. 
^ Leung, Tim (2014). "Implied Volatility of Leveraged ETF Options". Applied Mathematical Finance, Taylor & Francis. SSRN 2164518 .  Check date values in: |access-date= (help); Missing or empty |url= (help); |access-date= requires |url= (help)
^ https://www.reuters.com/article/us-sec-etfs-idUSKCN18C2RO
^ John M. Baker, Creation Units and the Rise of Exchange-Traded Funds, Investment Adviser (July 2000).
^ Mutual Fund Fees Jump 5 Percent on moneywatch.bnet.com
^ Fidelity Offers iShares ETFs Commission-Free on news.morningstar.com
^ Yates, Tristan. "Tristan Yates: What Can we Learn from the 2008 Leveraged ETF Collapse?". Tradingmarkets.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ Dan Culloton, Are ETFs Really More Tax-Efficient Than Mutual Funds? Morningstar (February 14, 2006).
^ The Problem With Vanguard VIPERs ETFs (December 29, 2009).
^ Vanguard ETFs have Different Tax Considerations Than Other ETFs (December 29, 2009).
^ ETF Tax Efficiency (December 29, 2009).
^ Steve Lodge (April 16, 2010). "Are ETF dividends taxed differently? - Yahoo! UK & Ireland Finance". Uk.finance.yahoo.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ Gastineau, Gary (2002). The Exchange-Traded Funds Manual. John Wiley and Sons. p. 227. ISBN 978-0-471-21894-4. 
^ Larry Connors, "Trading Covered Calls with ETFs", Tradingmarkets (March 4, 2008).
^ a b Kirilenko, Andrei; Kyle, Albert S.; Samadi, Mehrdad; Tuzun, Tugkan (May 5, 2014), The Flash Crash: The Impact of High Frequency Trading on an Electronic Market (PDF), retrieved 24 April 2015 
^ Avellaneda and Zhang, “Path-Dependence of Leveraged ETF Returns” SIAM J. of Financial Math, Vol. 1, pp. 586–603 2013. https://www.math.nyu.edu/faculty/avellane/SIAMLETFS.pdf.pdf
^ Guo and Leung, “Understanding the Tracking Errors of Commodity Leveraged ETFs” SSRN, 2013. http://papers.ssrn.com/sol3/papers.cfm?abstract_id=2389411
^ Amount as of July 2015; figure taken from the home page of http://www.spdrgoldshares.com/.
^ a b John Rubino, “Emerging Threat Funds?” CFA Magazine, September–October 2011. pp. 30–33.
^ Stephen Kovaka, Just Say No to the Silver ETF, SilverSeek.com (April 27, 2007)
^ Theodore Butler, The Smoking Gun, SilverSeek.com (August 22, 2008)
^ Global Financial Stability Report: Durable Financial Stability: Getting There from Here, April 2011
^ Financial Stability Board, “Potential financial stability issues arising from recent trends in Exchange-Traded Funds (ETFs)”, April 2011.
^ International Monetary Fund, Global Financial Stability Report: Durable Financial Stability: Getting There from Here, April 2011.
^ Srichander Ramaswamy, “Market structures and systemic risks of exchange-traded funds.” Working paper 343, April 2011. Bank for International Settlements.
^ John C. Bogle, 'Value' Strategies, Wall Street Journal (February 9, 2007).
^ Ian Salisbury, Some ETFs Fall Short on Pricing; Certain Trades Slip Below Value of Holdings, Wall Street Journal (November 21, 2008).
^ ETFs Were Wider Off the Mark in 2009, Wall Street Journal (February 19, 2010).
^ Wilfred Dellva, Exchange-Traded Funds Not for Everyone, Journal of Financial Planning (April 2001).


Further reading[edit]

Carrell, Lawrence. ETFs for the Long Run: What They Are, How They Work, and Simple Strategies for Successful Long-Term Investing. JW Wiley, 2008. ISBN 978-0-470-13894-6
Ferri, Richard A. The ETF Book: All You Need to Know About Exchange-Traded Funds. Wiley, 2009. ISBN 0-470-53746-9
Humphries, William. Leveraged ETFs: The Trojan Horse Has Passed the Margin-Rule Gates. 34 Seattle U.L. Rev. 299 (2010), available at [2].
Koesterich, Russ. The ETF Strategist: Balancing Risk and Reward for Superior Returns. Portfolio, 2008. ISBN 978-1-59184-207-1
Lemke, Thomas P; Lins, Gerald T. & McGuire, W. John. Regulation of Exchange-Traded Funds. Matthew Bender, 2015. ISBN 978-0-7698-9131-6

External links[edit]

The ETF Hall of Fame: 25 People Who Revolutionized the ETF Industry—ETF Database
Exchange Traded Funds (ETF)—Johannesburg Stock Exchange (JSE)
Exchange Traded Funds (ETF)—London Stock Exchange (LSE)
Exchange Traded Funds (ETFs) & Index Funds—NASDAQ Stock Market
Exchange Traded Products—New York Stock Exchange
Exchange Traded Funds (ETF)—Toronto Stock Exchange (TSX)
Exchange Traded Funds (ETF)—Australian Stock Exchange (ASX)
Exchange Traded Funds (ETFs) listed on XETRA or on Nasdaq OMX Nordic—ETFSverige.se information website
Using ETFs in investment portfolios—Exchange Traded Fund Basics, Investor Knowledge Centre (Vanguard Investments Australia)
Benefits of ETFs—Australian ETF Information Network
Cross-referenced list of funds—U.S., Canadian, and U.K. ETFs organized by industry, region, and investment strategy
Global ETF browser—Free ETF Screener based on fundamentals
Find ETFs by Stock Tool—Free tool for finding ETFs by its stocks
Worldwide Exchange Traded Funds—Investing.com global ETFs by category







v
t
e


Investment management



Investment fund
structures



Common contractual fund
Exchange-traded fund
Fond commun de placement
Fund of funds
Index fund
Investment trust
Hedge fund
Listed investment company
Mutual fund
Offshore fund
Open-ended investment company
Pension Fund
Private equity fund
Real estate investment trust
Royalty trust
SICAV
Umbrella fund
Unit investment trust
Unit trust
Unitised insurance fund





Investment styles



Active / passive management
Impact investing
Manager of managers
Socially responsible investing
Value / growth investing





Theory · Terminology



Closed-end fund
Efficient-market hypothesis
Net asset value
Open-end fund





Related topics



Alternative investment
Asset management firms
Robo-advisor
Returns-based style analysis
Traditional investments
UCITS










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Exchange-traded_fund&oldid=792170490"					
Categories: Exchange-traded fundsHidden categories: CS1 errors: datesPages using web citations with no URLPages using citations with accessdate and no URLUse mdy dates from August 2014All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from June 2017Articles with unsourced statements from April 2015Articles with unsourced statements from March 2013Articles with unsourced statements from August 2010 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةБългарскиBosanskiCatalàČeštinaDeutschEestiEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Bahasa IndonesiaItalianoLietuviųNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsРусскийSuomiSvenskaதமிழ்中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 24 July 2017, at 22:07.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Exchange-traded fund - Wikipedia





















 






Exchange-traded fund

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

An exchange-traded fund (ETF) is an investment fund traded on stock exchanges, much like stocks.[1][2] An ETF holds assets such as stocks, commodities, or bonds and generally operates with an arbitrage mechanism designed to keep it trading close to its net asset value,[3] although deviations can occasionally occur. Most ETFs track an index, such as a stock index or bond index. ETFs may be attractive as investments because of their low costs, tax efficiency, and stock-like features.[4][5] By 2013, ETFs had become the most popular type of exchange-traded product.[citation needed]
ETF distributors only buy or sell ETFs directly from or to authorized participants, which are large broker-dealers with whom they have entered into agreements—and then, only in creation units, which are large blocks of tens of thousands of ETF shares, usually exchanged in-kind with baskets of the underlying securities. Authorized participants may wish to invest in the ETF shares for the long-term, but they usually act as market makers on the open market, using their ability to exchange creation units with their underlying securities to provide liquidity of the ETF shares and help ensure that their intraday market price approximates the net asset value of the underlying assets.[3] Other investors, such as individuals using a retail broker, trade ETF shares on this secondary market.
An ETF combines the valuation feature of a mutual fund or unit investment trust, which can be bought or sold at the end of each trading day for its net asset value, with the tradability feature of a closed-end fund, which trades throughout the trading day at prices that may be more or less than its net asset value. Closed-end funds are not considered to be ETFs, even though they are funds and are traded on an exchange. ETFs have been available in the US since 1993 and in Europe since 1999. ETFs traditionally have been index funds, but in 2008 the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission began to authorize the creation of actively managed ETFs.[3]
ETFs offer both tax efficiency and lower transaction costs. More than US$2 trillion were invested in ETFs in the United States between when they were introduced in 1993 and 2015. By the end of 2015, ETFs offered "1,800 different products, covering almost every conceivable market sector, niche and trading strategy".[6]



Contents


1 Structure

1.1 United States


2 History
3 Investment uses
4 Types

4.1 Index ETFs
4.2 Stock ETFs
4.3 Bond ETFs
4.4 Commodity ETFs
4.5 Currency ETFs
4.6 Actively managed ETFs
4.7 Exchange-traded grantor trusts
4.8 Inverse ETFs
4.9 Leveraged ETFs


5 ETFs compared to mutual funds

5.1 Costs
5.2 Taxation
5.3 Trading


6 Regulation
7 Risks

7.1 Tracking error
7.2 Effects on stability
7.3 Regulatory risk
7.4 Counterparty risk


8 Liquidity
9 Criticism
10 Issuers of ETFs
11 See also
12 References
13 Further reading
14 External links



Structure[edit]
An ETF is a type of fund. It owns assets (bonds, stocks, gold bars, etc.) and divides ownership of itself into shares that are held by shareholders. The details of the structure (such as a corporation or trust) will vary by country, and even within one country there may be multiple possible structures.[7] The shareholders indirectly own the assets of the fund, and they will typically get an annual report. Shareholders are entitled to a share of the profits, such as interest or dividends, and they may get a residual value in case the fund is liquidated. Their ownership interest in the fund can easily be bought and sold.
ETFs are similar in many ways to traditional mutual funds, except that shares in an ETF can be bought and sold throughout the day like stocks on a stock exchange through a broker-dealer. Unlike traditional mutual funds, ETFs do not sell or redeem their individual shares at net asset value (NAV). Instead, financial institutions purchase and redeem ETF shares directly from the ETF, but only in large blocks (such as 50,000 shares), called creation units. Purchases and redemptions of the creation units generally are in kind, with the institutional investor contributing or receiving a basket of securities of the same type and proportion held by the ETF, although some ETFs may require or permit a purchasing or redeeming shareholder to substitute cash for some or all of the securities in the basket of assets.[3]
The ability to purchase and redeem creation units gives ETFs an arbitrage mechanism intended to minimize the potential deviation between the market price and the net asset value of ETF shares. Existing ETFs have transparent portfolios, so institutional investors will know exactly what portfolio assets they must assemble if they wish to purchase a creation unit, and the exchange disseminates the updated net asset value of the shares throughout the trading day, typically at 15-second intervals.[3]
If there is strong investor demand for an ETF, its share price will temporarily rise above its net asset value per share, giving arbitrageurs an incentive to purchase additional creation units from the ETF and sell the component ETF shares in the open market. The additional supply of ETF shares reduces the market price per share, generally eliminating the premium over net asset value. A similar process applies when there is weak demand for an ETF: its shares trade at a discount from net asset value.
United States[edit]
In the United States, most ETFs are structured as open-end management investment companies (the same structure used by mutual funds and money market funds), although a few ETFs, including some of the largest ones, are structured as unit investment trusts. ETFs structured as open-end funds have greater flexibility in constructing a portfolio and are not prohibited from participating in securities lending programs or from using futures and options in achieving their investment objectives.[8]
Under existing regulations, a new ETF must receive an order from the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC), giving it relief from provisions of the Investment Company Act of 1940 that would not otherwise allow the ETF structure. In 2008, the SEC proposed rules that would allow the creation of ETFs without the need for exemptive orders. Under the SEC proposal, an ETF would be defined as a registered open-end management investment company that:

issues (or redeems) creation units in exchange for the deposit (or delivery) of basket assets the current value of which is disseminated per share by a national securities exchange at regular intervals during the trading day
identifies itself as an ETF in any sales literature
issues shares that are approved for listing and trading on a securities exchange
discloses each business day on its publicly available web site the prior business day's net asset value and closing market price of the fund's shares, and the premium or discount of the closing market price against the net asset value of the fund's shares as a percentage of net asset value
either is an index fund, or discloses each business day on its publicly available web site the identities and weighting of the component securities and other assets held by the fund[3]

The SEC rule proposal would allow ETFs either to be index funds or to be fully transparent actively managed funds. Historically, all ETFs in the United States had been index funds.[citation needed] In 2008, however, the SEC began issuing exemptive orders to fully transparent actively managed ETFs. The first such order was to PowerShares Actively Managed Exchange-Traded Fund Trust,[9] and the first actively managed ETF in the United States was the Bear Stearns Current Yield Fund, a short-term income fund that began trading on the American Stock Exchange under the symbol YYY on March 25, 2008.[10] The SEC rule proposal indicates that the SEC may still consider future applications for exemptive orders for actively managed ETFs that do not satisfy the proposed rule's transparency requirements.[3]
Some ETFs invest primarily in commodities or commodity-based instruments, such as crude oil and precious metals. Although these commodity ETFs are similar in practice to ETFs that invest in securities, they are not investment companies under the Investment Company Act of 1940.[3]
Publicly traded grantor trusts, such as Merrill Lynch's HOLDRs securities, are sometimes considered to be ETFs, although they lack many of the characteristics of other ETFs. Investors in a grantor trust have a direct interest in the underlying basket of securities, which does not change except to reflect corporate actions such as stock splits and mergers. Funds of this type are not investment companies under the Investment Company Act of 1940.[11]
As of 2009, there were approximately 1,500 exchange-traded funds traded on US exchanges.[12] This count uses the wider definition of ETF, including HOLDRs and closed-end funds.
History[edit]
ETFs had their genesis in 1989 with Index Participation Shares, an S&P 500 proxy that traded on the American Stock Exchange and the Philadelphia Stock Exchange. This product, however, was short-lived after a lawsuit by the Chicago Mercantile Exchange was successful in stopping sales in the United States.[13]
A similar product, Toronto Index Participation Shares, started trading on the Toronto Stock Exchange (TSE) in 1990. The shares, which tracked the TSE 35 and later the TSE 100 indices, proved to be popular. The popularity of these products led the American Stock Exchange to try to develop something that would satisfy SEC regulation in the United States.[13]
Nathan Most and Steven Bloom, under the direction of Ivers Riley, designed and developed Standard & Poor's Depositary Receipts (NYSE Arca: SPY), which were introduced in January 1993.[14][15] Known as SPDRs or "Spiders", the fund became the largest ETF in the world. In May 1995 they introduced the MidCap SPDRs (NYSE Arca: MDY).
Barclays Global Investors, a subsidiary of Barclays PLC, in conjunction with MSCI and as its underwriter, a Boston-based third party distributor, Funds Distributor Inc., entered the market in 1996 with World Equity Benchmark Shares (WEBS), which became iShares MSCI Index Fund Shares. WEBS tracked MSCI country indices, originally 17, of the funds' index provider, Morgan Stanley. WEBS were particularly innovative because they gave casual investors easy access to foreign markets. While SPDRs were organized as unit investment trusts, WEBS were set up as a mutual fund, the first of their kind.[16][17]
In 1998, State Street Global Advisors introduced "Sector Spiders", which follow nine sectors of the S&P 500.[18] Also in 1998, the "Dow Diamonds" (NYSE Arca: DIA) were introduced, tracking the famous Dow Jones Industrial Average. In 1999, the influential "cubes" (NASDAQ: QQQ), were launched attempting to replicate the movement of the NASDAQ-100.
In 2000, Barclays Global Investors put a significant effort behind the ETF marketplace, with a strong emphasis on education and distribution to reach long-term investors. The iShares line was launched in early 2000. Within five years iShares had surpassed the assets of any other ETF competitor in the U.S. and Europe. Barclays Global Investors was sold to BlackRock in 2009.
The Vanguard Group entered the market in 2001. The first fund was Vanguard Total Stock Market ETF (NYSE Arca: VTI), which has become quite popular, and they made the Vanguard Extended Market Index ETF (VXF). Some of Vanguard's ETFs are a share class of an existing mutual fund.
iShares made the first bond funds in July 2002, based on US Treasury bonds and corporate bonds, such as iShares iBoxx $ Invst Grade Crp Bond (LQD). They also created a TIPS fund. In 2007, they introduced funds based on junk and muni bonds; about the same time SPDR and Vanguard got in gear and created several of their bond funds.
Since then ETFs have proliferated, tailored to an increasingly specific array of regions, sectors, commodities, bonds, futures, and other asset classes. As of January 2014, there were over 1,500 ETFs traded in the U.S., with over $1.7 trillion in assets.[19] In December 2014, U.S. ETF assets went above $2 trillion.[20]
Investment uses[edit]
ETFs generally provide the easy diversification, low expense ratios, and tax efficiency of index funds, while still maintaining all the features of ordinary stock, such as limit orders, short selling, and options. Because ETFs can be economically acquired, held, and disposed of, some investors invest in ETF shares as a long-term investment for asset allocation purposes, while other investors trade ETF shares frequently to implement market timing investment strategies.[8] Among the advantages of ETFs are the following:[11][21]

Lower costs: ETFs generally have lower costs than other investment products because most ETFs are not actively managed and because ETFs are insulated from the costs of having to buy and sell securities to accommodate shareholder purchases and redemptions. ETFs typically have lower marketing, distribution and accounting expenses, and most ETFs do not have 12b-1 fees.
Buying and selling flexibility: ETFs can be bought and sold at current market prices at any time during the trading day, unlike mutual funds and unit investment trusts, which can only be traded at the end of the trading day. As publicly traded securities, their shares can be purchased on margin and sold short, enabling the use of hedging strategies, and traded using stop orders and limit orders, which allow investors to specify the price points at which they are willing to trade.
Tax efficiency: ETFs generally generate relatively low capital gains, because they typically have low turnover of their portfolio securities. While this is an advantage they share with other index funds, their tax efficiency is further enhanced because they do not have to sell securities to meet investor redemptions.
Market exposure and diversification: ETFs provide an economical way to rebalance portfolio allocations and to "equitize" cash by investing it quickly. An index ETF inherently provides diversification across an entire index. ETFs offer exposure to a diverse variety of markets, including broad-based indices, broad-based international and country-specific indices, industry sector-specific indices, bond indices, and commodities.
Transparency: ETFs, whether index funds or actively managed, have transparent portfolios and are priced at frequent intervals throughout the trading day.

Some of these advantages derive from the status of most ETFs as index funds.
Types[edit]
For more details on this topic, see List of American exchange-traded funds.
Index ETFs[edit]
Most ETFs are index funds that attempt to replicate the performance of a specific index. Indexes may be based on stocks, bonds, commodities, or currencies. An index fund seeks to track the performance of an index by holding in its portfolio either the contents of the index or a representative sample of the securities in the index.[8] As of June 2012, in the United States, about 1200 index ETFs exist, with about 50 actively managed ETFs. Index ETF assets are about $1.2 trillion, compared with about $7 billion for actively managed ETFs.[22] Some index ETFs, known as leveraged ETFs or inverse ETFs, use investments in derivatives to seek a return that corresponds to a multiple of, or the inverse (opposite) of, the daily performance of the index.[23]
Some index ETFs invest 100% of their assets proportionately in the securities underlying an index, a manner of investing called replication. Other index ETFs use representative sampling, investing 80% to 95% of their assets in the securities of an underlying index and investing the remaining 5% to 20% of their assets in other holdings, such as futures, option and swap contracts, and securities not in the underlying index, that the fund's adviser believes will help the ETF to achieve its investment objective. There are various ways the ETF can be weighted, such as equal weighting or revenue weighting.[24] For index ETFs that invest in indices with thousands of underlying securities, some index ETFs employ "aggressive sampling" and invest in only a tiny percentage of the underlying securities.[25][26]
Stock ETFs[edit]
The first and most popular ETFs track stocks. Many funds track national indexes; for example, Vanguard Total Stock Market ETF NYSE Arca: VTI tracks the CRSP U.S. Total Market Index, and several funds track the S&P 500, both indexes for US stocks. Other funds own stocks from many countries; for example, Vanguard Total International Stock Index NYSE Arca: VXUS tracks the MSCI All Country World ex USA Investable Market Index, while the iShares MSCI EAFE Index NYSE Arca: EFA tracks the MSCI EAFE Index, both "world ex-US" indexes.
Stock ETFs can have different styles, such as large-cap, small-cap, growth, value, et cetera. For example, the S&P 500 index is large- and mid-cap, so the SPDR S&P 500 ETF will not contain small-cap stocks. Others such as iShares Russell 2000 are mainly for small-cap stocks. There are many style ETFs such as iShares Russell 1000 Growth and iShares Russell 1000 Value. ETFs focusing on dividends have been popular in the first few years of the 2010s decade, such as iShares Select Dividend.[27]
ETFs can also be sector funds. These can be broad sectors, like finance and technology, or specific niche areas, like green power. They can also be for one country or global. Critics have said that no one needs a sector fund.[28] This point is not really specific to ETFs; the issues are the same as with mutual funds. The funds are popular since people can put their money into the latest fashionable trend, rather than investing in boring areas with no "cachet".
Bond ETFs[edit]
Exchange-traded funds that invest in bonds are known as bond ETFs.[29] They thrive during economic recessions because investors pull their money out of the stock market and into bonds (for example, government treasury bonds or those issued by companies regarded as financially stable). Because of this cause and effect relationship, the performance of bond ETFs may be indicative of broader economic conditions.[30] There are several advantages to bond ETFs such as the reasonable trading commissions, but this benefit can be negatively offset by fees if bought and sold through a third party.[31]
Commodity ETFs[edit]
Commodity ETFs (CETFs or ETCs) invest in commodities, such as precious metals, agricultural products, or hydrocarbons. Among the first commodity ETFs were gold exchange-traded funds, which have been offered in a number of countries. The idea of a Gold ETF was first officially conceptualised by Benchmark Asset Management Company Private Ltd in India when they filed a proposal with the SEBI in May 2002.[32] The first gold exchange-traded fund was Gold Bullion Securities launched on the ASX in 2003, and the first silver exchange-traded fund was iShares Silver Trust launched on the NYSE in 2006. As of November 2010 a commodity ETF, namely SPDR Gold Shares, was the second-largest ETF by market capitalization.[33]
However, generally commodity ETFs are index funds tracking non-security indices. Because they do not invest in securities, commodity ETFs are not regulated as investment companies under the Investment Company Act of 1940 in the United States, although their public offering is subject to SEC review and they need an SEC no-action letter under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. They may, however, be subject to regulation by the Commodity Futures Trading Commission.[34][35]
The earliest commodity ETFs, such as SPDR Gold Shares (NYSE Arca: GLD) and iShares Silver Trust (NYSE Arca: SLV), owned the physical commodity (e.g., gold and silver bars). Similar to these are ETFS Physical Palladium (NYSE Arca: PALL) and ETFS Physical Platinum (NYSE Arca: PPLT). However, most ETCs implement a futures trading strategy, which may produce quite different results from owning the commodity.
Commodity ETFs trade just like shares, are simple and efficient and provide exposure to an ever-increasing range of commodities and commodity indices, including energy, metals, softs and agriculture. However, it is important for an investor to realize that there are often other factors that affect the price of a commodity ETF that might not be immediately apparent. For example, buyers of an oil ETF such as USO might think that as long as oil goes up, they will profit roughly linearly. What isn't clear to the novice investor is the method by which these funds gain exposure to their underlying commodities. In the case of many commodity funds, they simply roll so-called front-month futures contracts from month to month. This does give exposure to the commodity, but subjects the investor to risks involved in different prices along the term structure, such as a high cost to roll.[36][37]
ETC can also refer to exchange-traded notes, which are not exchange-traded funds.
Currency ETFs[edit]
In 2005, Rydex Investments launched the first currency ETF called the Euro Currency Trust (NYSE Arca: FXE) in New York. Since then Rydex has launched a series of funds tracking all major currencies under their brand CurrencyShares. In 2007 Deutsche Bank's db x-trackers launched EONIA Total Return Index ETF in Frankfurt tracking the euro, and later in 2008 the Sterling Money Market ETF (LSE: XGBP) and US Dollar Money Market ETF (LSE: XUSD) in London. In 2009, ETF Securities launched the world's largest FX platform tracking the MSFXSM Index covering 18 long or short USD ETC vs. single G10 currencies. The funds are total return products where the investor gets access to the FX spot change, local institutional interest rates and a collateral yield.
Actively managed ETFs[edit]
See also: List of American exchange-traded funds § Active ETFs
Most ETFs are index funds, but some ETFs do have active management. Actively managed ETFs have been offered in the United States only since 2008. The first active ETF was Bear Stearns Current Yield ETF (Ticker: YYY).[38] Currently, actively managed ETFs are fully transparent, publishing their current securities portfolios on their web sites daily. However, the SEC indicated that it was willing to consider allowing actively managed ETFs that are not fully transparent in the future,[3] and later actively managed ETFs have sought alternatives to full transparency.
The fully transparent nature of existing ETFs means that an actively managed ETF is at risk from arbitrage activities by market participants who might choose to front run its trades as daily reports of the ETF's holdings reveals its manager's trading strategy. The initial actively managed equity ETFs addressed this problem by trading only weekly or monthly. Actively managed debt ETFs, which are less susceptible to front-running, trade their holdings more frequently.[39]
The actively managed ETF market has largely been seen as more favorable to bond funds, because concerns about disclosing bond holdings are less pronounced, there are fewer product choices, and there is increased appetite for bond products. Pimco's Enhanced Short Duration ETF NYSE: MINT is the largest actively managed ETF, with approximately $3.93 billion in assets as of May 16, 2014.[40]
Actively managed ETFs grew faster in their first three years of existence than index ETFs did in their first three years of existence. As track records develop, many see actively managed ETFs as a significant competitive threat to actively managed mutual funds.[41] However, many academic studies have questioned the value of active management. Jack Bogle of Vanguard Group wrote an article in the Financial Analysts Journal where he estimated that higher fees as well as hidden costs (such a more trading fees and lower return from holding cash) reduce returns for investors by around 2.66 percentage points a year "a huge differential considering that long-term real returns from American equities have been 6.45%."[42] Even without considering hidden costs, high fees negatively affect long-term performance. In another Financial Analysts Journal article, Nobel laureate, Bill Sharpe "calculated that someone who saved via a low-cost fund would have a standard of living in retirement 20% higher than someone who saved in a high-cost fund".[42]
Exchange-traded grantor trusts[edit]
An exchange-traded grantor trust was used to give a direct interest in a static basket of stocks selected from a particular industry. Such products have some properties in common with ETFs—low costs, low turnover, and tax efficiency:but are generally regarded as separate from ETFs. The leading example was Holding Company Depositary Receipts, or HOLDRs, a proprietary Merrill Lynch product, but these have now disappeared from the scene.[11][43][44] SPDR Gold Shares is a grantor trust.
Inverse ETFs[edit]
Main article: Inverse exchange-traded fund
Inverse ETFs are constructed by using various derivatives for the purpose of profiting from a decline in the value of the underlying benchmark. It is a similar type of investment to holding several short positions or using a combination of advanced investment strategies to profit from falling prices. Many inverse ETFs use daily futures as their underlying benchmark.[45]
Leveraged ETFs[edit]
Leveraged exchange-traded funds (LETFs or leveraged ETFs) are a type of ETF that attempt to achieve returns that are more sensitive to market movements than non-leveraged ETFs.[46] Leveraged index ETFs are often marketed as bull or bear funds. A leveraged bull ETF fund might for example attempt to achieve daily returns that are 2x or 3x more pronounced than the Dow Jones Industrial Average or the S&P 500. A leveraged inverse (bear) ETF fund on the other hand may attempt to achieve returns that are -2x or -3x the daily index return, meaning that it will gain double or triple the loss of the market. Leveraged ETFs require the use of financial engineering techniques, including the use of equity swaps, derivatives and rebalancing, and re-indexing to achieve the desired return.[47] The most common way to construct leveraged ETFs is by trading futures contracts.
The rebalancing and re-indexing of leveraged ETFs may have considerable costs when markets are volatile.[48][49] The rebalancing problem is that the fund manager incurs trading losses because he needs to buy when the index goes up and sell when the index goes down in order to maintain a fixed leverage ratio. A 2.5% daily change in the index will for example reduce value of a -2x bear fund by about 0.18% per day, which means that about a third of the fund may be wasted in trading losses within a year (1-(1-0.18%)252=36.5%). Investors may however circumvent this problem by buying or writing futures directly, accepting a varying leverage ratio.[citation needed] A more reasonable estimate of daily market changes is 0.5%, which leads to a 2.6% yearly loss of principal in a 3x leveraged fund.
The re-indexing problem of leveraged ETFs stems from the arithmetic effect of volatility of the underlying index.[50] Take, for example, an index that begins at 100 and a 2X fund based on that index that also starts at 100. In a first trading period (for example, a day), the index rises 10% to 110. The 2X fund will then rise 20% to 120. The index then drops back to 100 (a drop of 9.09%), so that it is now even. The drop in the 2X fund will be 18.18% (2*9.09). But 18.18% of 120 is 21.82. This puts the value of the 2X fund at 98.18. Even though the index is unchanged after two trading periods, an investor in the 2X fund would have lost 1.82%. This decline in value can be even greater for inverse funds (leveraged funds with negative multipliers such as -1, -2, or -3). It always occurs when the change in value of the underlying index changes direction. And the decay in value increases with volatility of the underlying index.
The effect of leverage is also reflected in the pricing of options written on leveraged ETFs. In particular, the terminal payoff of a leveraged ETF European/American put or call depends on the realized variance (hence the path) of the underlying index. The impact of leverage ratio can also be observed from the implied volatility surfaces of leveraged ETF options.[51] For instance, the implied volatility curves of inverse leveraged ETFs (with negative multipliers such as -1, -2, or -3) are commonly observed to be increasing in strike, which is characteristically different from the implied volatility smiles or skews seen for index options or non-leveraged ETF options.
The SEC, in May 2017, granted approval of a pair of 4x leveraged ETF related to S&P 500 Futures, before rescinding the approval a few weeks later. The decision concerns two potential products: ForceShares Daily 4X US Market Futures Long Fund, which would have listed under the ticker UP, and ForceShares Daily 4X US Market Futures Short Fund, with the ticker DOWN.[52]
ETFs compared to mutual funds[edit]
Costs[edit]
ETFs have a reputation for lower costs than traditional mutual funds. This will be evident as a lower expense ratio. This is mainly from two factors, the fact that most ETFs are index funds and some advantages of the ETF structure. However, this needs to be compared in each case, since some index mutual funds also have a very low expense ratio, and some ETFs' expense ratios are relatively high. An index fund is much simpler to run, since it does not require some security selection, and can be largely done by computer. Not only does an ETF have lower shareholder-related expenses, but because it does not have to invest cash contributions or fund cash redemptions, an ETF does not have to maintain a cash reserve for redemptions and saves on brokerage expenses.[53] Mutual funds can charge 1% to 3%, or more; index fund expense ratios are generally lower, while ETFs are almost always less than 1%. Over the long term, these cost differences can compound into a noticeable difference.[54]
Because ETFs trade on an exchange, each transaction is generally subject to a brokerage commission. Commissions depend on the brokerage and which plan is chosen by the customer. For example, a typical flat fee schedule from an online brokerage firm in the United States ranges from $10 to $20, but it can be as low as $0 with discount brokers. Due to this commission cost, the amount invested has a great bearing; someone who wishes to invest $100 per month may have a significant percentage of their investment destroyed immediately, while for someone making a $200,000 investment, the commission cost may be negligible. Generally, mutual funds obtained directly from the fund company itself do not charge a brokerage fee. Thus, when low or no-cost transactions are available, ETFs become very competitive.[55]
The cost difference is more evident when compared with mutual funds that charge a front-end or back-end load as ETFs do not have loads at all. The redemption fee and short-term trading fees are examples of other fees associated with mutual funds that do not exist with ETFs. Traders should be cautious if they plan to trade inverse and leveraged ETFs for short periods of time. Close attention should be paid to transaction costs and daily performance rates as the potential combined compound loss can sometimes go unrecognized and offset potential gains over a longer period of time.[56]
Taxation[edit]
ETFs are structured for tax efficiency and can be more attractive than mutual funds. In the U.S., whenever a mutual fund realizes a capital gain that is not balanced by a realized loss, the mutual fund must distribute the capital gains to its shareholders. This can happen whenever the mutual fund sells portfolio securities, whether to reallocate its investments or to fund shareholder redemptions. These gains are taxable to all shareholders, even those who reinvest the gains distributions in more shares of the fund. In contrast, ETFs are not redeemed by holders (instead, holders simply sell their ETF shares on the stock market, as they would a stock, or effect a non-taxable redemption of a creation unit for portfolio securities), so that investors generally only realize capital gains when they sell their own shares or when the ETF trades to reflect changes in the underlying index.[8]
In most cases, ETFs are more tax-efficient than conventional mutual funds in the same asset classes or categories.[57] Because Vanguard's ETFs are a share-class of their mutual funds, they don't get all the tax advantages if there are net redemptions on the mutual fund shares.[58] Although they do not get all the tax advantages, they get an additional advantage from tax loss harvesting any capital losses from net redemptions.[59][60]
In the U.K., ETFs can be shielded from capital gains tax by placing them in an Individual Savings Account or self-invested personal pension, in the same manner as many other shares. Because UK-resident ETFs would be liable for UK corporation tax on non-UK dividends, most ETFs which hold non-UK companies sold to UK investors are issued in Ireland or Luxembourg.[61]
Trading[edit]
An important benefit of an ETF is the stock-like features offered. A mutual fund is bought or sold at the end of a day's trading, whereas ETFs can be traded whenever the market is open. Since ETFs trade on the market, investors can carry out the same types of trades that they can with a stock. For instance, investors can sell short, use a limit order, use a stop-loss order, buy on margin, and invest as much or as little money as they wish (there is no minimum investment requirement).[62] Also, many ETFs have the capability for options (puts and calls) to be written against them. Covered call strategies allow investors and traders to potentially increase their returns on their ETF purchases by collecting premiums (the proceeds of a call sale or write) on calls written against them. Mutual funds do not offer those features.[63]
Regulation[edit]
New regulations were put in place following the 2010 Flash Crash, when prices of ETFs and other stocks and options became volatile, with trading markets spiking[64]:1 and bids falling as low as a penny a share[6] in what the Commodity Futures Trading Commission (CFTC) investigation described as one of the most turbulent periods in the history of financial markets.[64]:1
These regulations proved to be inadequate to protect investors in the August 24, 2015 flash crash,[6] "when the price of many ETFs appeared to come unhinged from their underlying value". ETFs were consequently put under even greater scrutiny by regulators and investors.[6] Analysts at Morningstar claimed in December 2015 that "ETFs are a “digital-age technology” governed by “Depression-era legislation,”"[6]
Risks[edit]
Tracking error[edit]
The ETF tracking error is the difference between the returns of the ETF and its reference index or asset. A non-zero tracking error therefore represents a failure to replicate the reference as stated in the ETF prospectus. The tracking error is computed based on the prevailing price of the ETF and its reference. It is different than the premium/discount which is the difference between the ETF’s NAV (updated only once a day) and its market price. Tracking errors are more significant when the ETF provider uses strategies other than full replication of the underlying index. Some of the most liquid equity ETFs tend to have better tracking performance because the underlying is also sufficiently liquid, allowing for full replication.[65] In contrast, some ETFs, such as commodities ETFs and their leveraged ETFs, do not necessarily employ full replication because the physical assets cannot be stored easily or used to create a leveraged exposure, or the reference asset or index is illiquid.[66] Futures-based ETFs may also suffer from negative roll yields, as seen in the VIX futures market.
Effects on stability[edit]
ETFs that buy and hold commodities or futures of commodities have become popular. For example, SPDR Gold Shares ETF (GLD) has 21 million ounces in trust.[67] The silver ETF, SLV, is also very large. The commodity ETFs are in effect consumers of their target commodities, thereby affecting the price in a spurious fashion.[68][69][70] In the words of the IMF, “Some market participants believe the growing popularity of exchange-traded funds (ETFs) may have contributed to equity price appreciation in some emerging economies, and warn that leverage embedded in ETFs could pose financial stability risks if equity prices were to decline for a protracted period.”[71]
Regulatory risk[edit]
Synthetic ETFs are attracting regulatory attention from the FSB,[72] the IMF,[73] and the BIS.[74] Areas of concern include the lack of transparency in products and increasing complexity; conflicts of interest; and lack of regulatory compliance.
Counterparty risk[edit]
A synthetic ETF has counterparty risk, because the counterparty is contractually obligated to match the return on the index. The deal is arranged with collateral posted by the swap counterparty. A potential hazard is that the investment bank offering the ETF might post its own collateral, and that collateral could be of dubious quality. Furthermore, the investment bank could use its own trading desk as counterparty. These types of set-ups are not allowed under the European guidelines, Undertakings for Collective Investment in Transferable Securities (UCITS), so the investor should look for UCITS III-compliant funds.[68]
Liquidity[edit]
ETFs have a wide range of liquidity. Some funds are constantly traded, with tens of millions of shares per day changing hands, while others trade only once in a while, even not trading for some days. There are many funds that do not trade very often. This just means that most trading is conducted in the most popular funds. The most active funds (such as SPY, IWM, QQQ, et cetera) are very liquid, with high volume and tight spreads. In these cases, the investor is almost sure to get a "reasonable" price, even in difficult conditions. With other funds, it is worthwhile to take some care in execution. This does not mean that less popular funds are not a quality investment. This is in contrast with traditional mutual funds, where everyone who trades on the same day gets the same price.
Criticism[edit]
John C. Bogle, founder of the Vanguard Group, a leading issuer of index mutual funds (and, since Bogle's retirement, of ETFs), has argued that ETFs represent short-term speculation, that their trading expenses decrease returns to investors, and that most ETFs provide insufficient diversification. He concedes that a broadly diversified ETF that is held over time can be a good investment.[75]
ETFs are dependent on the efficacy of the arbitrage mechanism in order for their share price to track net asset value. While the average deviation between the daily closing price and the daily NAV of ETFs that track domestic indices is generally less than 2%, the deviations may be more significant for ETFs that track certain foreign indices.[8] The Wall Street Journal reported in November 2008, during a period of market turbulence, that some lightly traded ETFs frequently had deviations of 5% or more, exceeding 10% in a handful of cases, although even for these niche ETFs, the average deviation was only a little more than 1%. The trades with the greatest deviations tended to be made immediately after the market opened.[76]
According to a study on ETF returns in 2009 by Morgan Stanley, ETFs missed in 2009 their targets by an average of 1.25 percentage points, a gap more than twice as wide as the 0.52-percentage-point average they posted in 2008.[77] Part of this so-called tracking error is attributed to the proliferation of ETFs targeting exotic investments or areas where trading is less frequent, such as emerging-market stocks, future-contracts based commodity indices and junk bonds.[citation needed]
The tax advantages of ETFs are of no relevance for investors using tax-deferred accounts (or indeed, investors who are tax-exempt in the first place).[78] However, the lower expense ratios are proving difficult for the proponents of traditional mutual funds to overcome.
In a survey of investment professionals, the most frequently cited disadvantage of ETFs was the unknown, untested indices used by many ETFs, followed by the overwhelming number of choices.[5]
Some critics claim that ETFs can be, and have been, used to manipulate market prices, including having been used for short selling that has been asserted by some observers (including Jim Cramer of theStreet.com) to have contributed to the market collapse of 2008.
Issuers of ETFs[edit]
Main article: List of exchange-traded funds

AdvisorShares: actively managed ETFs only, majority owned by Fund.com
Banco Itau: issues itnow in Bovespa
Bips Investment Managers: issues Bips (Beta Investment Performance Securities)
BNP Paribas: issues EasyETFs
BlackRock: issues iShares
Boost ETP: issues short (inverse) and leveraged exchange-traded products including 3X equity and commodity products
Charles Schwab: offers several commission-free ETFs for its clients
Deutsche Bank: issues db x-trackers ETFs, as well as managing PowerShares DB commodity- and currency-based ETFs
ETF Securities: issues ETFs or specialised commodity ETCs
Franklin Templeton: Issues liberty line of ETFs
Global X Funds: issues ETFs
Guggenheim Funds: issues specialty Guggenheim Funds ETFs
Horizons ETFs Management (USA): issues the Covered Call ETF (HSPX)
Indo Premier Investment Management: issues Premier ETFs in Indonesia Stock Exchange
Invesco: issues PowerShares ETFs, as well as BLDRS based on American Depositary Receipts
Lyxor Asset Management: issues Lyxor ETFs
Merrill Lynch: issues HOLDRs
ProShares: U.S.-based firm offering alternative ETFs
Source UK Services: a European joint-venture between Bank of America Merrill Lynch, Goldman Sachs, Morgan Stanley, Nomura and J. P. Morgan issues ETFs and ETCs
State Street Global Advisors: issues SPDRs
Van Eck Global: issues Market Vectors ETFs
Vanguard Group: issues Vanguard ETFs, formerly known as VIPERs
WisdomTree Investments

See also[edit]

Enhanced indexing
Pension fund
Separately managed account

References[edit]


^ "Introduction to Exchange-Traded Funds", Investopedia
^ "Exchange-Traded Funds (ETFs)". U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. Retrieved November 8, 2013. 
^ a b c d e f g h i Exchange-Traded Funds, SEC Release Nos. 33-8901, IC-28193, 73 Fed. Reg. 14618 (March 11, 2008).
^ State Street Global Advisors and Knowledge@Wharton, ETFs Changing the Way Advisors Do Business, According to State Street and Wharton Study, Business Wire (June 10, 2008).
^ a b The Impact of Exchange Traded Products on the Financial Advisory Industry: A Joint Study of State Street Global Advisors and Knowledge@Wharton (2008).
^ a b c d e Weinberg, Ari I. (6 December 2015). "Should You Fear the ETF? ETFs are scaring regulators and investors: Here are the dangers—real and perceived". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 7 December 2015. 
^ SPDR ETFs: Basics of Product Structure SSGA
^ a b c d e Actively Managed Exchange-Traded Funds, SEC Release No. IC-25258, 66 Fed. Reg. 57614 (November 8, 2001).
^ PowerShares Capital Management LLC, et al.; Notice of Application, Release No. IC-28140 (February 1, 2008), 73 Fed. Reg. 7328 (February 7, 2008) (notice); PowerShares Capital Management LLC, Release No. IC-28171 (February 27, 2008) (order). The SEC issued orders to Bear Stearns Asset Management, Inc., Barclays Global Fund Advisors, and WisdomTree Trust on the same day.
^ American Stock Exchange Lists First Actively-Managed Exchange Traded Fund (March 25, 2008).
^ a b c ETFConnect, "Index ETFs – Know Your Funds" (visited April 7, 2008).
^ Peaceful Gains. "A List of exchange-traded funds". Retrieved October 23, 2009. 
^ a b Gastineau, Gary (2002). The Exchange-Traded Funds Manual. John Wiley and Sons. p. 32. ISBN 978-0-471-21894-4. 
^ Carrel, Lawrence (2008), ETFs for the Long Run, John Wiley & Sons, ISBN 978-0-470-13894-6
^ Jennifer Bayot (December 10, 2004). "Nathan Most Is Dead at 90; Investment Fund Innovator". New York Times. Retrieved April 23, 2008. 
^ Wiandt, Jim; William McClatchy (2002). Exchange Traded Funds. John Wiley and Sons. p. 82. ISBN 0-471-22513-4. 
^ Fabozzi, Frank (2003). The Handbook of Financial Instruments. John Wiley and Sons. p. 532. ISBN 0-471-22092-2. 
^ Ferri, Richard A. (2008). The ETF Book, John Wiley and Sons, 191 ISBN 0-470-13063-6.
^ "ETF League Table as of Jan. 21, 2014". IndexUniverse. 
^ U.S. ETF Assets Hit $2 Trillion Milestone - Yahoo Finance
^ American Stock Exchange, ETFs – Individual Investor (visited April 7, 2008).
^ [ETF Statistics For June 2012: Actively Managed Assets Less Than 1% http://etfdailynews.com/2012/07/10/etf-statistics-for-june-2012-actively-managed-assets-less-than-1/]
^ The Case Against Leveraged ETFs, Seeking Alpha (May 17, 2007).
^ [1], Revenue Shares (July 10, 2015).
^ "Our Take on the Bond ETF Dilemma". News.morningstar.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ Stacy L. Fuller, The Evolution of Actively Managed Exchange-Traded Funds, Review of Securities & Commodities Regulation (April 16, 2008).
^ Banner Year of Dividend Growth Sends Cash to Dividend ETFs - Yahoo Finance
^ "Do You Need a Sector Fund?". Morningstar. 
^ Bond ETF Definition
^ "Indicators for Trading in Government Bond ETFs". Tradingmarkets.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "Bond ETFs: A Viable Alternative". Investopedia.com. September 19, 2009. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "Benchmark Asset Management Company conceptualises Gold ETF". Etfglobalinvestor.net. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "Largest ETFs: Top 25 ETFs By Market Cap". ETFdb. Retrieved November 3, 2010. 
^ Michael Sackheim, Michael Schmidtberger & James Munsell, DB Commodity Index Tracking Fund: An Innovative Exchange-Traded Fund, Futures Industry (May/June 2006).
^ Koyfman, Yevgeniy (August 21, 2009). "No Gas: Barclays Halts Issuance of Natural Gas ETN". Indexuniverse.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ tom Lauricella (November 2, 2009). "Gold Mutual Funds Vs. Gold ETFs: It Depends on the Goal". Online.wsj.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "The Future of Commodity ETFs". News.morningstar.com. August 25, 2009. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ Jaffe, Chuck. "Bear Stearns Current Yield (YYY)". The Seattle Time. 
^ David Hoffman, Active ETFs are, well, less active; Dynamics of trading translate into little active management, Investment News (April 21, 2008).
^ Tran, Hung. "MINT Tops BOND As Biggest Active ETF". IndexUniverse. 
^ AlphaBaskets.com report on active vs. index ETFs, AlphaBaskets.com (April 11, 2011).
^ a b "Buttonwood: Against the odds". The Economist. 
^ "All The HOLDRS Are Now History, NYSE Says". ETF.com. 
^ Palash R. Ghosh (August 18, 2005). "HOLDRs Vs. ETFs: What Investors Should Know". Investment Advisor. Summit Business Media. Retrieved January 8, 2011. 
^ Staff, Investopedia (2007-11-04). "Inverse ETF". Investopedia. Retrieved 2017-02-28. 
^ "ProFunds readies first leveraged ETFs - ETF Investing". MarketWatch. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "RYDEX ETF TRUST (Form: 485APOS, Received: 11/08/2006 16:27:55)". Esignal.brand.edgar-online.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ http://olympiainv.com/Memos/ETFs.pdf
^ Maxey, Daisy (August 4, 2009). "Fidelity the Latest to Caution on ETFs". Online.wsj.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ "A Guide To Shorting Leveraged ETFs". www.signalplot.com. 
^ Leung, Tim (2014). "Implied Volatility of Leveraged ETF Options". Applied Mathematical Finance, Taylor & Francis. SSRN 2164518 .  Check date values in: |access-date= (help); Missing or empty |url= (help); |access-date= requires |url= (help)
^ https://www.reuters.com/article/us-sec-etfs-idUSKCN18C2RO
^ John M. Baker, Creation Units and the Rise of Exchange-Traded Funds, Investment Adviser (July 2000).
^ Mutual Fund Fees Jump 5 Percent on moneywatch.bnet.com
^ Fidelity Offers iShares ETFs Commission-Free on news.morningstar.com
^ Yates, Tristan. "Tristan Yates: What Can we Learn from the 2008 Leveraged ETF Collapse?". Tradingmarkets.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ Dan Culloton, Are ETFs Really More Tax-Efficient Than Mutual Funds? Morningstar (February 14, 2006).
^ The Problem With Vanguard VIPERs ETFs (December 29, 2009).
^ Vanguard ETFs have Different Tax Considerations Than Other ETFs (December 29, 2009).
^ ETF Tax Efficiency (December 29, 2009).
^ Steve Lodge (April 16, 2010). "Are ETF dividends taxed differently? - Yahoo! UK & Ireland Finance". Uk.finance.yahoo.com. Retrieved October 3, 2011. 
^ Gastineau, Gary (2002). The Exchange-Traded Funds Manual. John Wiley and Sons. p. 227. ISBN 978-0-471-21894-4. 
^ Larry Connors, "Trading Covered Calls with ETFs", Tradingmarkets (March 4, 2008).
^ a b Kirilenko, Andrei; Kyle, Albert S.; Samadi, Mehrdad; Tuzun, Tugkan (May 5, 2014), The Flash Crash: The Impact of High Frequency Trading on an Electronic Market (PDF), retrieved 24 April 2015 
^ Avellaneda and Zhang, “Path-Dependence of Leveraged ETF Returns” SIAM J. of Financial Math, Vol. 1, pp. 586–603 2013. https://www.math.nyu.edu/faculty/avellane/SIAMLETFS.pdf.pdf
^ Guo and Leung, “Understanding the Tracking Errors of Commodity Leveraged ETFs” SSRN, 2013. http://papers.ssrn.com/sol3/papers.cfm?abstract_id=2389411
^ Amount as of July 2015; figure taken from the home page of http://www.spdrgoldshares.com/.
^ a b John Rubino, “Emerging Threat Funds?” CFA Magazine, September–October 2011. pp. 30–33.
^ Stephen Kovaka, Just Say No to the Silver ETF, SilverSeek.com (April 27, 2007)
^ Theodore Butler, The Smoking Gun, SilverSeek.com (August 22, 2008)
^ Global Financial Stability Report: Durable Financial Stability: Getting There from Here, April 2011
^ Financial Stability Board, “Potential financial stability issues arising from recent trends in Exchange-Traded Funds (ETFs)”, April 2011.
^ International Monetary Fund, Global Financial Stability Report: Durable Financial Stability: Getting There from Here, April 2011.
^ Srichander Ramaswamy, “Market structures and systemic risks of exchange-traded funds.” Working paper 343, April 2011. Bank for International Settlements.
^ John C. Bogle, 'Value' Strategies, Wall Street Journal (February 9, 2007).
^ Ian Salisbury, Some ETFs Fall Short on Pricing; Certain Trades Slip Below Value of Holdings, Wall Street Journal (November 21, 2008).
^ ETFs Were Wider Off the Mark in 2009, Wall Street Journal (February 19, 2010).
^ Wilfred Dellva, Exchange-Traded Funds Not for Everyone, Journal of Financial Planning (April 2001).


Further reading[edit]

Carrell, Lawrence. ETFs for the Long Run: What They Are, How They Work, and Simple Strategies for Successful Long-Term Investing. JW Wiley, 2008. ISBN 978-0-470-13894-6
Ferri, Richard A. The ETF Book: All You Need to Know About Exchange-Traded Funds. Wiley, 2009. ISBN 0-470-53746-9
Humphries, William. Leveraged ETFs: The Trojan Horse Has Passed the Margin-Rule Gates. 34 Seattle U.L. Rev. 299 (2010), available at [2].
Koesterich, Russ. The ETF Strategist: Balancing Risk and Reward for Superior Returns. Portfolio, 2008. ISBN 978-1-59184-207-1
Lemke, Thomas P; Lins, Gerald T. & McGuire, W. John. Regulation of Exchange-Traded Funds. Matthew Bender, 2015. ISBN 978-0-7698-9131-6

External links[edit]

The ETF Hall of Fame: 25 People Who Revolutionized the ETF Industry—ETF Database
Exchange Traded Funds (ETF)—Johannesburg Stock Exchange (JSE)
Exchange Traded Funds (ETF)—London Stock Exchange (LSE)
Exchange Traded Funds (ETFs) & Index Funds—NASDAQ Stock Market
Exchange Traded Products—New York Stock Exchange
Exchange Traded Funds (ETF)—Toronto Stock Exchange (TSX)
Exchange Traded Funds (ETF)—Australian Stock Exchange (ASX)
Exchange Traded Funds (ETFs) listed on XETRA or on Nasdaq OMX Nordic—ETFSverige.se information website
Using ETFs in investment portfolios—Exchange Traded Fund Basics, Investor Knowledge Centre (Vanguard Investments Australia)
Benefits of ETFs—Australian ETF Information Network
Cross-referenced list of funds—U.S., Canadian, and U.K. ETFs organized by industry, region, and investment strategy
Global ETF browser—Free ETF Screener based on fundamentals
Find ETFs by Stock Tool—Free tool for finding ETFs by its stocks
Worldwide Exchange Traded Funds—Investing.com global ETFs by category







v
t
e


Investment management



Investment fund
structures



Common contractual fund
Exchange-traded fund
Fond commun de placement
Fund of funds
Index fund
Investment trust
Hedge fund
Listed investment company
Mutual fund
Offshore fund
Open-ended investment company
Pension Fund
Private equity fund
Real estate investment trust
Royalty trust
SICAV
Umbrella fund
Unit investment trust
Unit trust
Unitised insurance fund





Investment styles



Active / passive management
Impact investing
Manager of managers
Socially responsible investing
Value / growth investing





Theory · Terminology



Closed-end fund
Efficient-market hypothesis
Net asset value
Open-end fund





Related topics



Alternative investment
Asset management firms
Robo-advisor
Returns-based style analysis
Traditional investments
UCITS










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Exchange-traded_fund&oldid=792170490"					
Categories: Exchange-traded fundsHidden categories: CS1 errors: datesPages using web citations with no URLPages using citations with accessdate and no URLUse mdy dates from August 2014All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from June 2017Articles with unsourced statements from April 2015Articles with unsourced statements from March 2013Articles with unsourced statements from August 2010 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةБългарскиBosanskiCatalàČeštinaDeutschEestiEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Bahasa IndonesiaItalianoLietuviųNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsРусскийSuomiSvenskaதமிழ்中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 24 July 2017, at 22:07.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 








Horizons ETF Trust I - Horizons S&P 500 Covered Call ETF: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 28, 2017 1:07 PM ET
Capital Markets

Company Overview of Horizons ETF Trust I - Horizons S&P 500 Covered Call ETF



Snapshot People




Company Overview
Horizons ETF Trust I - Horizons S&P 500 Covered Call ETF is an exchange traded fund launched and managed by Horizons ETFs Management (USA) LLC. It invests in public equity markets of the United States. The fund takes long and short positions to invest directly and through derivatives such as covered call options to invest in stocks of companies operating across diversified sectors. It invests in stocks of large-cap companies. The fund seeks to replicate the performance of the S&P 500 Stock Covered Call Index, by investing in stocks of companies as per their weightings in the index. It was formerly known as Exchange Listed Funds Trust - Horizons S&P 500 Covered Call ETF. Horizons ETF Trust I ...
Horizons ETF Trust I - Horizons S&P 500 Covered Call ETF is an exchange traded fund launched and managed by Horizons ETFs Management (USA) LLC. It invests in public equity markets of the United States. The fund takes long and short positions to invest directly and through derivatives such as covered call options to invest in stocks of companies operating across diversified sectors. It invests in stocks of large-cap companies. The fund seeks to replicate the performance of the S&P 500 Stock Covered Call Index, by investing in stocks of companies as per their weightings in the index. It was formerly known as Exchange Listed Funds Trust - Horizons S&P 500 Covered Call ETF. Horizons ETF Trust I - Horizons S&P 500 Covered Call ETF was formed on June 24, 2013 and is domiciled in the United States.
Detailed Description


10900 Hefner Pointe DriveSuite 207Oklahoma City, OK 73120United StatesFounded in 2013



Phone: 405-778-8377

Fax: 405-896-5825

us.horizonsetfs.com/ETF/HSPX







Key Executives for Horizons ETF Trust I - Horizons S&P 500 Covered Call ETF




Mr. Steven Hawkins


      	Portfolio Manager
      








Mr. Nicolas Piquard CFA


      	Portfolio Manager
      








Mr. Hans Albrecht


      	Portfolio Manager
      








Mr. Wade Guenther


      	Portfolio Manager
      








Mr. David Kunselman


      	Portfolio Manager
      





Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 

Horizons ETF Trust I - Horizons S&P 500 Covered Call ETF Key Developments

Horizons S&P 500® Covered Call ETF Announces September 2015 Distribution, Payable on or About October 7, 2015
Sep 29 15
Horizons ETFs Management (USA) LLC announced the monthly distribution for the Horizons S&P 500® Covered Call ETF in the amount of $0.39641 per share. The ex-dividend date for the distribution will be September 23, 2015 and will be paid on or about October 7, 2015 to all shareholders of record on September 25, 2015. HSPX distributed $0.37 per share unit during the previous monthly distribution, which occurred on September 10, 2015.


Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 @Visory LLC United States 1 Road Partners LLC United States 11T Partners, LLC United States 123Jump.com, Inc. United States 1509225 Ontario, Inc. United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target



No transactions available in the past 12 months.




Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Horizons ETF Trust I - Horizons S&P 500 Covered Call ETF, please visit us.horizonsetfs.com/ETF/HSPX.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close


































































Exchange Listed Funds Trust - Horizons S&P 500® Covered Call ETF (HSPX) Announces Adjournment of Special Shareholder Meeting - The Business Journals



































Menu









Select a City



National


Albany


Albuquerque


Atlanta


Austin


Baltimore


Birmingham


Boston


Buffalo


Charlotte


Chicago


Cincinnati


Columbus


Dallas


Dayton


Denver


Greensboro/Winston-Salem


Honolulu


Houston


Jacksonville


Kansas City


Los Angeles


Louisville


Memphis


Miami/Fort Lauderdale


Milwaukee


Minneapolis/St. Paul


Nashville


New York


Orlando


Philadelphia


Phoenix


Pittsburgh


Portland


Raleigh/Durham


Sacramento


San Antonio


San Francisco


Seattle


Silicon Valley


St. Louis


Tampa Bay


Washington, D.C.


Wichita

















Limited Time Offer
Subscribe Now







 Search


× Close











Sign In


Sign In
Your Account 




Your Account


Welcome
Your Account 










Sign In
Existing Users




Create Your FREE Account
Don't have an account?




 






Your Account




Subscriptions




Newsletters


 

Custom Notifications




My Custom Site




Manage Site Users


 

Sign Out











Sign In


Sign In
Your Account 











 Search








 Home




Industries & Topics 




All Industries & Topics



Banking & Financial Services




Career & Workplace




Commercial Real Estate




Education




Energy




Food & Lifestyle




Government & Regulations




Health Care




Manufacturing




Media & Marketing




Philanthropy & Nonprofits




Professional Services




Residential Real Estate




Retailing




Sports Business




Technology




Transportation




Travel & Tourism




Sponsored Content



CRE Now




We Value Your Business




Office Environments




Small Business Marketing




Know Your Neighborhood










News 





News



Latest News




Business Pulse




Press Releases






 


Lists & Awards 





Lists



All Lists




Build Your Own Lists






 


People & Companies 





Companies



Top Private Companies




Find Businesses for Sale




Search for Company News





People



People on the Move




Contact Top Executives




Executive Profiles




Search for People in the News






 


Events 





Events



Business Event Calendar




Nominations






 


More… 






Jobs
Find or post a job




Store
Subscriptions, reprints & more









How To
Grow your business, advance your career




Thought Leadership
Trends, tips and insights from our partners





 


Subscribers 








Manage your Account






 


About & Contact 








About The Business Journals




Advertise




Help & FAQs




Call Center Directory






 


Apps & Syndication 








Newsletters






 


ACBJ Publications 








Bizwomen




Upstart




Hemmings




Sports Business Journal




Inside Lacrosse




BostInno




DCInno




ChicagoInno




AustinInno






 


Select a City 




National


Albany


Albuquerque


Atlanta


Austin


Baltimore


Birmingham


Boston


Buffalo


Charlotte


Chicago


Cincinnati


Columbus


Dallas


Dayton


Denver


Greensboro/Winston-Salem


Honolulu


Houston


Jacksonville


Kansas City


Los Angeles


Louisville


Memphis


Miami/Fort Lauderdale


Milwaukee


Minneapolis/St. Paul


Nashville


New York


Orlando


Philadelphia


Phoenix


Pittsburgh


Portland


Raleigh/Durham


Sacramento


San Antonio


San Francisco


Seattle


Silicon Valley


St. Louis


Tampa Bay


Washington, D.C.


Wichita







Follow us




 Twitter


 LinkedIn


 Facebook


 Google +













 






Press Releases



Exchange Listed Funds Trust - Horizons S&P 500® Covered Call ETF (HSPX) Announces Adjournment of Special Shareholder Meeting






Jun 27, 2017, 5:36pm EDT














NEW YORK, June 27, 2017 /PRNewswire/ -- The special meeting of shareholders of Exchange Listed Funds Trust and its series Horizons S&P 500® Covered Call ETF (the "Existing Fund"), an exchange-traded index fund, has been adjourned in order to allow shareholders additional time to consider the approval of the Reorganization Agreement, which provides for: (i) the transfer of all of the assets and liabilities of the Existing Fund to a new series (the "New Fund") of Horizons ETFs Trust I, in exchange solely for shares of the New Fund, and (ii) the distribution of such New Fund shares pro rata to shareholders of the Existing Fund, which will be liquidated. 
The shareholder meeting for the Exchange Listed Funds Trust and the Existing Fund will reconvene on June 28, 2017 at 11:00 a.m. EST at the offices of Thompson Hine LLP, 335 Madison Avenue, New York, New York 10017-4611.  
In connection with the solicitation of proxies to approve the proposal described above, Exchange Listed Funds Trust and the Existing Fund have filed a proxy statement. Because the proxy statement contains important information, the shareholders are urged to read the proxy statement and accompanying materials carefully. The shareholders are also able to obtain copies of these documents by calling 1-800-817-5468. Representatives are available to answer your questions about the proxy material or about how to how to cast your vote.  
The proxy statement is also available free of charge at the website of the Securities and Exchange Commission, www.sec.gov. The foregoing is not an offer to sell, nor a solicitation of an offer to buy, shares of the New or Existing Funds, nor is it a solicitation of any proxy.  
Important Information 
You should consider the Existing Fund's investment objectives, risks, and charges and expenses carefully before investing. Contact Exchange Listed Funds Trust at 1-855-HZNETFS (1-855-496-3837) or visit  http://us.horizonsetfs.com/ to obtain a prospectus which contains information about the Existing Fund. The prospectus should be read carefully before investing.  
Shares are bought and sold at market price (not NAV), are not individually redeemable, and owners of the Shares may acquire those Shares from the Existing Fund and tender those shares for redemption to the Existing Fund in Creation Unit aggregations only, consisting of 50,000 Shares. Investing in the Existing Fund involves risk, including possible loss of principal. 
The Existing Fund's shares are distributed by Foreside Fund Services, LLC. 
Exchange Traded Concepts, LLC is the advisor. 
 
To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/exchange-listed-funds-trust---horizons-sp-500-covered-call-etf-hspx-announces-adjournment-of-special-shareholder-meeting-300480772.html
SOURCE  Exchange Traded Concepts, LLC




The information on this page is provided by PR Newswire. All rights reserved. Reproduction or redistribution of this content without prior written consent from PR Newswire is strictly prohibited.  is not responsible for this content. Learn more about this service.








 





 





About PR Newswire







                                            The information on this page is provided by PR Newswire. The Business Journals is not responsible for this content.
                                        



Learn More







 









 
 


 


  





Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft


















Exchange Listed Funds Trust - Horizons S&P 500® Covered Call ETF (HSPX) Announces Adjournment Of Special Shareholder Meeting - TheStreet




























































 

 




















Action Alerts PLUS

Access AAPJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 2017Charitable Trust PortfolioMost Recent Trade Alert25 Investing Rules10 Trading Commandments

Real Money

Access RM25 Rules of InvestingJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 201710 CommandmentsStressed Out StocksCramer's Blog

Cramer
Mad Money
ETFs
Futures
Markets
Much More

BanksBiotechRetailTechPersonal FinanceRetirementFinancial Advisor CenterHow to SpendOptionsFixed IncomeVideo










Privacy Policy|Terms of Use© 1996- TheStreet Inc. All rights reserved
















                                DJIA
                            







                                NASDAQ
                            







                                S&P 500
                            






Market Data updated






Sign In




Your Membership(s)








Your Account





Account Preferences


Alerts


Newsletters







Subscribe





Logout



Subscribe

Access insights and guidance from our Wall Street pros. Find the product that's right for you.
Action Alerts PLUS
Action Alerts OPTIONS
Daily Swing Trade
Income Seeker
Quant Ratings
Real Money
Real Money Pro
Stocks Under $10
Top Stocks
Trifecta Stocks
Real Money Pro Portfolio
Chairman's Club
Compare All 
Chatter on the Street













































 








































Exchange Listed Funds Trust - Horizons S&P 500® Covered Call ETF (HSPX) Announces Adjournment Of Special Shareholder Meeting









PR Newswire




Jun 27, 2017 5:36 PM EDT













 


















































  NEW YORK, June 27 , 2017 /PRNewswire/ -- The special meeting of shareholders of Exchange Listed Funds Trust and its series Horizons S&P 500 ® Covered Call ETF (the "Existing Fund"), an exchange-traded index fund, has been adjourned in order to allow shareholders additional time to consider the approval of the Reorganization Agreement, which provides for: (i) the transfer of all of the assets and liabilities of the Existing Fund to a new series (the "New Fund") of Horizons ETFs Trust I, in exchange solely for shares of the New Fund, and (ii) the distribution of such New Fund shares pro rata to shareholders of the Existing Fund, which will be liquidated. The shareholder meeting for the Exchange Listed Funds Trust and the Existing Fund will reconvene on June 28, 2017 at 11:00 a.m. EST at the offices of Thompson Hine LLP, 335 Madison Avenue, New York, New York 10017-4611.  In connection with the solicitation of proxies to approve the proposal described above, Exchange Listed Funds Trust and the Existing Fund have filed a proxy statement. Because the proxy statement contains important information, the shareholders are urged to read the proxy statement and accompanying materials carefully. The shareholders are also able to obtain copies of these documents by calling 1-800-817-5468. Representatives are available to answer your questions about the proxy material or about how to how to cast your vote.  The proxy statement is also available free of charge at the website of the Securities and Exchange Commission, www.sec.gov . The foregoing is not an offer to sell, nor a solicitation of an offer to buy, shares of the New or Existing Funds, nor is it a solicitation of any proxy.    Important Information   You should consider the Existing Fund's investment objectives, risks, and charges and expenses carefully before investing. Contact Exchange Listed Funds Trust at 1-855-HZNETFS (1-855-496-3837)  or visit    http://us.horizonsetfs.com/   to obtain a prospectus which contains information about the Existing Fund. The prospectus should be read carefully before investing.    Shares are bought and sold at market price (not NAV), are not individually redeemable, and owners of the Shares may acquire those Shares from the Existing Fund and tender those shares for redemption to the Existing Fund in Creation Unit aggregations only, consisting of 50,000 Shares. Investing in the Existing Fund involves risk, including possible loss of principal.  The Existing Fund's shares are distributed by Foreside Fund Services, LLC.  Exchange Traded Concepts, LLC is the advisor.  



 








 































































 











Trending


Amazon and General Electric Are Friday's Smoking Hot Tickers: AMZN, TSLA, SBUX, GE, AAPL, X


Starbucks Shares Are Crashing; Go Out and Buy!


U.S. Steel Shares Are Being Torched, Thanks to One Stock Analyst


Jim Cramer Nails Starbucks' Big Decline, Warns Again of Downside to $50


Apple Investing Billions in OLED Display











Advertising Partners



 






 






 






 


























 

























 































 


©1996-2017 TheStreet, Inc. All rights reserved.Action Alerts PLUS is a registered trademark of TheStreet, Inc.




Compare Brokers



 







 







 







 







 







 

































 



 Exchange Listed Funds Trust - Horizons S&P 500® Covered Call ETF (HSPX) Announces Adjournment of 
         










    










 













 











 



















Exchange Listed Funds Trust - Horizons S&P 500® Covered Call ETF (HSPX) Announces Adjournment of Special Shareholder Meeting
        																										
              











 News provided by
Exchange Traded Concepts, LLC  
Jun 27, 2017, 17:36 ET









 Share this article




























































NEW YORK, June 27, 2017 /PRNewswire/ -- The special meeting of shareholders of Exchange Listed Funds Trust and its series Horizons S&P 500® Covered Call ETF (the "Existing Fund"), an exchange-traded index fund, has been adjourned in order to allow shareholders additional time to consider the approval of the Reorganization Agreement, which provides for: (i) the transfer of all of the assets and liabilities of the Existing Fund to a new series (the "New Fund") of Horizons ETFs Trust I, in exchange solely for shares of the New Fund, and (ii) the distribution of such New Fund shares pro rata to shareholders of the Existing Fund, which will be liquidated. 








The shareholder meeting for the Exchange Listed Funds Trust and the Existing Fund will reconvene on June 28, 2017 at 11:00 a.m. EST at the offices of Thompson Hine LLP, 335 Madison Avenue, New York, New York 10017-4611.  
In connection with the solicitation of proxies to approve the proposal described above, Exchange Listed Funds Trust and the Existing Fund have filed a proxy statement. Because the proxy statement contains important information, the shareholders are urged to read the proxy statement and accompanying materials carefully. The shareholders are also able to obtain copies of these documents by calling 1-800-817-5468. Representatives are available to answer your questions about the proxy material or about how to how to cast your vote.  
The proxy statement is also available free of charge at the website of the Securities and Exchange Commission, www.sec.gov. The foregoing is not an offer to sell, nor a solicitation of an offer to buy, shares of the New or Existing Funds, nor is it a solicitation of any proxy.  
Important Information 
You should consider the Existing Fund's investment objectives, risks, and charges and expenses carefully before investing. Contact Exchange Listed Funds Trust at 1-855-HZNETFS (1-855-496-3837) or visit  http://us.horizonsetfs.com/ to obtain a prospectus which contains information about the Existing Fund. The prospectus should be read carefully before investing.  
Shares are bought and sold at market price (not NAV), are not individually redeemable, and owners of the Shares may acquire those Shares from the Existing Fund and tender those shares for redemption to the Existing Fund in Creation Unit aggregations only, consisting of 50,000 Shares. Investing in the Existing Fund involves risk, including possible loss of principal. 
The Existing Fund's shares are distributed by Foreside Fund Services, LLC. 
Exchange Traded Concepts, LLC is the advisor. 
 
To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/exchange-listed-funds-trust---horizons-sp-500-covered-call-etf-hspx-announces-adjournment-of-special-shareholder-meeting-300480772.html
SOURCE Exchange Traded Concepts, LLC



 













May 17, 2017, 16:33 ET
Preview: Exchange Traded Concepts to Close and Liquidate the REX Gold Hedged FTSE Emerging Markets ETF






My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.






 Also from this source




 

May 17, 2017, 16:33 ET
                                  				                                                                                     
                              Exchange Traded Concepts to Close and Liquidate the REX Gold...








 

Apr 04, 2017, 17:21 ET
                                  				                                                                                     
                              REX Shares Announces REX VolMAXX™ Short Volatility Fund ("VMIN")...





 Explore
 More news releases in similar topics

  Banking & Financial Services








 You just read:
Exchange Listed Funds Trust - Horizons S&P 500® Covered Call ETF (HSPX) Announces Adjournment of Special Shareholder Meeting


 News provided by
Exchange Traded Concepts, LLC  
Jun 27, 2017, 17:36 ET








 Share this article









































 











Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 





Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft




























Exchange Listed Funds Trust Plans 2 Dividend Growth ETFs - February 9, 2015 - Zacks.com























 




































 
Join

Sign In




Member Sign In


 Keep Me Signed In 
What does "Remember Me" do?
Forgot Password


Create a New Account







 




















 


You are being directed to ZacksTrade, a division of LBMZ Securities and licensed broker-dealer. ZacksTrade and Zacks.com are separate companies. The web link between the two companies is not a solicitation or offer to invest in a particular security or type of security. ZacksTrade does not endorse or adopt any particular investment strategy, any analyst opinion/rating/report or any approach to evaluating indiv idual securities.
If you wish to go to ZacksTrade, click OK. If you do not, click Cancel.
OK Cancel








Back to top











Exchange Listed Funds Trust Plans 2 Dividend Growth ETFs


Zacks Equity Research
                February 09, 2015

DGRO SDY VIG PFM PID IHDG 

Trades from
$1











 









Read MoreHide Full Article









Global easing has bolstered the appeal for dividend ETFs since the start of the year. The U.S. economy is presently sporting a low-rate environment. The ECB has launched a QE program with negative interest rates in January. Japan has long been pursuing the QE program with zero interest rates and several other developed nations along with emerging nations like India and Turkey are going for rate cuts since last month.
Global growth worries have taken the center stage with U.S. economic growth momentum slowing down in the final quarter of 2014. In such a scenario, it can be an excellent idea to focus on dividends. These cash payouts can safeguard one’s portfolio in bear market movements and ensure steady income in a low yield backdrop (read: 3 Top Performing Dividend ETFs to Watch in 2015).
Among dividend-oriented ETFs, tapping of companies that have a strong history of growing dividends seems a better idea than those which hand out the largest payouts or offer largest yields. Historically, dividend growers tacked on better gains than the other dividend ETFs. Probably, thanks to this pattern and to meet the need of the hour, Exchange Listed Funds Trust recently filed two dividend growth ETFs, one targeted at domestic companies and other at international companies.The Duo in Focus
The Defensive Dividend Growth ETF looks to track the large-cap, low volatility and dividend paying stocks based in the U.S. Per the prospectus, companies that have paid dividend in the last three years, those whose dividends have increased over the last three years and those with trailing 12-month dividend yields greater than 1% have the chance of being included in the index tracked by the fund.
After the selection, 100 large companies having the lowest volatility are selected.  The second one revolves around the international arena including emerging market issuers but with the same concept and criteria. The ticker codes and expense ratios of the funds are not disclosed yet.How Does it Fit in a Portfolio?
The ETFs will be intriguing options for investors looking for steady dividend income. International dividend investing especially in Europe can be a wise bet for yield-hungry investors at the current level as rates are prevailing at rock-bottom levels in the continent. Also, in the U.S., rates are rising slowly. Though the Fed is poised to hike key rates this year, global turmoil should keep long-term yields at check. In such a situation, the newly filed ETFs should reward investors with decent yields (read: Dividend ETFs Explained: What Investors Need to Know).ETF Competition
Focus on dividend growth in the U.S. market is definitely not a novel idea as the space already has some ultra-popular ETFs like iShares Core Dividend Growth ETF (DGRO), SPDR S&P Dividend ETF (SDY), Vanguard Dividend Appreciation ETF (VIG) and PowerShares Dividend Achievers ETF (PFM). Among these, VIG is the highest asset gatherer with about $13.8 billion in assets and 10 bps in fees followed by SDY with about $13.8 billion in assets and 0.35% expense ratio (read: Focus on Stocks with Strong Dividend Growth with These 5 ETFs).
The international dividend ETF space is also packed with products though not all with the same objective. However, the newly filed international fund may have to compete with the likes of PowerShares International Dividend Achievers Portfolio (PID) and International Hedged Dividend Growth Fund (IHDG). However, to give its peers a run for money, Exchange Listed Funds Trust has to price its products competitively.
Want the latest recommendations from Zacks Investment Research? Today, you can download 7 Best Stocks for the Next 30 Days . Click to get this free report >>















In-Depth Zacks Research for the Tickers Above
Normally $25 each - click below to receive one report FREE:
ISHRS-CORE DG (DGRO) - free report >>SPDR-SP DIV ETF (SDY) - free report >>VANGD-DIV APPRC (VIG) - free report >>PWRSH-DIV ACH (PFM) - free report >>PWRSH-INTL DVD (PID) - free report >>WISTR-INT HDG (IHDG) - free report >>

















More from Zacks ETF News And Commentary







5 Best Stocks of the July ETF Winner








Why You Should Buy the Dip in Amazon Shares with ETFs








ETF Winners & Losers on IMF Growth Forecast








German Business Confidence Hits Record High: ETFs to Buy








›
‹





You May Like








Top Ranked Momentum Stocks to Buy for July 28th









Top Ranked Income Stocks to Buy for July 28th









Top Ranked Growth Stocks to Buy for July 28th









Top Ranked Value Stocks to Buy for July 28th








›
‹




 









Zacks' 7 Breakout Stocksfor July, 2017
Free Report for Zacks.com Visitors Only
Our experts cut down 220 Zacks Rank #1 Strong Buys to the 7 that are most likely to jump in price immediately.
For 28 years, the full Strong Buy list has averaged a stellar +25% per year. See its 7 best stocks now.


  




Close This Panel X














 

Most Read








The Only Direction Cloud Companies Are Going Is Up



 




More Tech Earnings Reports



 




New Strong Buy Stocks for July 28th



 




AWS 7/28: Q2 GDP Lands at 2.6%, 1st Read



 




7/28: Are Investors Ready for 8:30am Friday?








›
‹



















 





















 







Managed Funds and ETP product list - ASX























































 
Skip to content












Submit


Search for multiple prices







ETFs and other ETPsManaged Funds and ETP product list


















Managed Funds and ETP product list




Research Managed Funds (A-REITs, Absolute Return Funds, LICs / LITs and Pooled Development Funds)and Exchange Traded Products (ETPs) by clicking on the ASX code for delayed prices, recent announcements, price history charts, past dividends and contact details. You can also go to individual websites by clicking on the name.
Note: MER (management expense ratio) figures have been extracted from the relevant PDS or as updated by the issuer of the product. Under the Corporations Regulations, management costs do not include transactional or operational costs or certain other fees and costs which may apply. Such costs may be significant. When considering a product or comparing between products you should refer to the relevant PDS(s) for more information on any additional costs associated with each product. You should obtain independent professional investment advice tailored to your specific circumstances prior to making any investment decision.
Latest product announcements

27 July 2017 - Convenience Retail REIT (ASX: CRR)
7 July 2017 - VanEck Vectors Australian Floating Rate ETF (ASX: FLOT)
 



A-REITS
Abs Return Funds
ETPs
ETPs-Single Asset
Infrastructure Funds
LICs & LITs
PDFs






Exposure
 ASX Code
Type
 Listing Date
Chart
Announcements


Diversified


360 Capital Industrial Fund
TIX
Units
Dec-12
 
Recent


Abacus Property Group 
ABP
Stapled
Nov-02
 
Recent


Australian Industrial REIT
ANI
Units
Oct-13
 
Recent


Carindale Property 
CDP
Units
Jun-99
 
Recent


Charter Hall Group 
CHC
Stapled
Jun-06
 
Recent


Charter Hall Long Wale REIT
CLW
Stapled
Nov-16

Recent


DEXUS Property Group 
DXS
Stapled
Oct-04
 
Recent


Folkestone Social Infrastructure Trust
FST
Stapled
Feb-11
 
Recent


Novion Property Group
NVN
Stapled
Apr-94
 
Recent


Industrial


360 Capital Group
TGP
Stapled
Jul-05
 
Recent


360 Capital Office Fund
TOF
Units
Apr-14
 
Recent


Asia Pacific Data Centre Group
AJD
Stapled
May-13
 
Recent


Astro Japan Property Group 
AJA
Stapled
Apr-05
 
Recent


Centuria Metropolitan REIT
CMA
Stapled
Feb-73
 
Recent


Cromwell Property Group 
CMW
Stapled
Feb-73
 
Recent


Folkstone Education Trust 
FET
Units
May-03
 
Recent


GDI Property Group
GDI
Stapled
Dec-13
 
Recent


Goodman Group 
GMG
Stapled
Feb-05
 
Recent


GPT Metro Office Fund
GMF
Units
Oct-14
 
Recent


Investa Office Fund 
IOF
Stapled
Jan-00
 
Recent


National Storage REIT
NSR
Stapled
Dec-13
 
Recent


US Masters Residential Property Fund
URF
Units
Jul-12
 
Recent


Miscellaneous


Viva Energy REIT
VVR
Stapled
Aug-16

Recent


360 Capital Total Return Fund
TOT
Stapled
Apr-15

Recent


Agricultural Land Trust 
AGJ
Units
Apr-03
 
Recent


AIMS Property Securities Fund
APW
Units
Dec-04
 
Recent


Arena REIT
ARF
Stapled
Jun-13

Recent


Aspen Group 
APZ
Stapled
Apr-91
 
Recent


BWP Trust 
BWP
Units
Sep-98
 
Recent


Brookfield Prime Property Fund 
BPA
Units
Jun-11
 
Recent


BlackWall Property Fund  
BWF
Units
Oct-11
 
Recent


BlackWall Property Trust
BWR
Units
Oct-11
 
Recent


Galileo Japan Trust 
GJT
Units
Dec-06
 
Recent


Generation Healthcare REIT
GHC
Units
May-06
 
Recent


Hotel Property Investments
HPI
Stapled
Dec-13
 
Recent


Industria REIT Fund
IDR
Stapled
Dec-13
 
Recent


Mirvac Group
MGR
Stapled
Jun-99

Recent


Multiplex European Property Fund 
MUE
Units
Jul-07
 
Recent


Real Estate Capital Partners USA Property Trust 
RCU
Units
Nov-05
 
Recent


RNY Property Trust
RNY
Units
Sep-06
 
Recent


Rural Fund Group
RFF
Stapled
Feb-14
 
Recent


Unity Pacific Group
UPG
Stapled
Dec-14
 
Recent


Residential


Growthpoint Properties Australia 
GOZ
Stapled
Jul-07
 
Recent


Ingenia Communities Group
INA
Stapled
Jul-04
 
Recent


Retail


Convenience Retail REIT
CRR
Stapled
Jul-17

Recent


Charter Hall Retail REIT 
CQR
Units
Nov-96

Recent


Elanor Retail Property Fund
ERF
Stapled
Nov-16

Recent


GPT Group 
GPT
Stapled
Apr-71
 
Recent


Lantern Hotel Group
LTN
Stapled
Jul-04
 
Recent


Scentre Group
SCG
Stapled
Jun-14
 
Recent


Shopping Centres Australasia Property Group
SCP
Stapled
Nov-12
 
Recent


Vicinity Centres 
VCX
Stapled
Dec-11

Recent


Westfield Corporation
WFD
Stapled
Jun-14
 
Recent


Specialised


ALE Property Group
LEP
Stapled
Nov-03
 
Recent


Stockland 
SGP
Stapled
Apr-88
 
Recent




S








Name
ASX Code
Type
Benchmark
MER%
Listing Date
Chart
Announcements


Alternative Investment Trust
AIQ
Units
-
0.75
Apr-05

Recent


Armidale Investment Corporation Limited
AIK
Units
-
-
Jan-03

Recent


Aurora Absolute Return Fund 
ABW
Units
RBA Cash Rate
0.00
Jul-06

Recent


Australian Enhanced Income Fund 
AYF
Units
UBS Warburg Bank Bill Index
-
Oct -06

Recent


Australian Leaders Fund Limited
ALF
Shares
XJOAI
2.72
Feb-04

Recent


Hastings High Yield Fund
HHY
Units
-
-
Apr-05

Recent


Katana Capital 
KAT
Shares
XAOAI
1.25 yes to out per fee
Dec-05

Recent


Millinium's Alternatives Fund
MAX
Units
 
 
Dec-06

Recent


WAA Active
WAA
Shares
XAOAI
2.7
Jan-08

Recent






ETF - Exchange Traded Funds
MF - Managed Fund
SP - Structured Product
*Share - Redeemable preference share
Specific risks for fixed income, inverse, leveraged, single-asset and synthetic ETPs as well as Structured Products can be found here.



Exposure
ASX Code

Type

iNAV Code
Benchmark
Lev/ Inv
Options
MER%
Admission Date
Chart
Announcements


Equity - Australia


BetaShares Australian Small Companies Select Fund (managed fund)
SMLL
MF
 
S&P/ASX Small Ordinaries Accumulation Index
 
 
0.39
Apr-17

Recent


iShares Edge MSCI Australia Multifactor ETF
AUMF
ETF
 
MSCI Australia IMI Diversified Multiple-Factor Index
 
 
0.30
Oct-16

Recent


iShares Edge MSCI Australia Minimum Volatility ETF
MVOL
ETF
 
MSCI Australia IMI Select Minimum Volatility Index
 
 
0.30
Oct-16

Recent


BetaShares Australian Ex-20 Portfolio Diversifier ETF
EX20
ETF
YEX2
NASDAQ Australia Completion Cap INdex
 
 
0.20
Oct-16

Recent


ETFS S&P/ASX 100 ETF
ZOZI
ETF
 
S&P/ASX 100 Index
 
 
0.24
Jun-15

Recent


BetaShares FTSE RAFI Australia 200 ETF
QOZ
ETF
 YQOZ
FTSE RAFI Australia 200

 

 
0.30
Jul-13
 

Recent



iShares  Core S&P/ASX 200 ETF 
IOZ
ETF
 
S&P/ASX 200
 
 
0.15
Dec-10
 
Recent


iShares S&P/ASX 20 ETF
ILC
ETF
 
S&P/ASX 20
 
 
0.24
Dec-10
 
Recent


iShares S&P/ASX Small Ordinaries ETF 
ISO
ETF
 
S&P/ASX Small Ordinaries
 
 
0.55
Dec-10
 
Recent


VanEck Vectors Australian Equal Weight ETF
MVW
ETF
 
MVIS Australia Equal Weight Index
 
 
0.35
Mar-14
 
Recent


VanEck Vectors Small Cap Dividend Payers ETF
MVS
ETF
YMVS
MVIS Australia Small-Cap Dividend Payers Index
 
 
0.49
May-15

Recent


SPDR 200 Fund
STW
ETF
 YSTW
S&P/ASX 200
 
 
0.19
Aug-01
 
Recent


SPDR 50 Fund
SFY
ETF
 YSFY
S&P/ASX 50
 
 
0.28
Aug-01
 
Recent


SPDR S&P/ASX Small Ordinaries Fund
SSO
ETF
 YSSO
S&P/ASX Small Ordinaries
 
 
0.50
Apr-11
 
Recent


UBS IQ MSCI Australia Ethical
UBA
ETF
YUBA
MSCI Australia ex Tobacco ex Controversial Weapons Index
 
 
0.17
Feb-15
 
Recent


Vanguard Australian Shares Index 
VAS
ETF
 
S&P/ASX 300
 
 
0.15
May-09
 
Recent


Vanguard MSCI Australian Large Companies Index 
VLC
ETF
 
MSCI Large Cap Index
 
 
0.20
May-11
 
Recent


Vanguard MSCI Australian Small Companies Index 
VSO
ETF
 
MSCI Small Cap Index
 
 
0.30
May-11
 
Recent


Equity - Australian Sectors


Beta Shares S&P/ASX 200 Financials Sector ETF 
QFN
ETF
 
S&P/ASX 200 Financials
 
 
0.39
Dec-10
 
Recent


Beta Shares S&P/ASX 200 Resources Sector ETF 
QRE
ETF
 
S&P/ASX 200 Resources
 
 
0.39
Dec-10
 
Recent


VanEck Vectors Australian Property ETF
MVA
ETF
 YMVA
MVIS Australian A-REIT Index
 
 
0.35
Oct-13
 
Recent


VanEck Vectors Australian Banks ETF
MVB
ETF
 YMVB
MVIS Australian Banks Index
 
 
0.28
Oct-13
 
Recent


VanEck Vectors S&P/ASX Midcap ETF
MVE
ETF
 YMVE
S&P/ASX MidCap 50 Index
 
 
0.49
Oct-13
 
Recent


VanEck Vectors Australian Resources ETF
MVR
ETF
 YMVR
MVIS Australian Energy & Mining Index
 
 

0.35

Oct-13
 
Recent


SPDR S&P/ASX 200 Listed Property Fund
SLF
ETF
 YSLF
S&P/ASX 200 A-REITs
 
 
0.40
Feb-02
 
Recent


SPDR S&P/ASX 200 Financials ex A-REITS Fund 
OZF
ETF
 YOZF
S&P/ASX 200 X-A-REITs
 
 
0.40
Apr-11
 
Recent


SPDR S&P/ASX 200 Resources Fund 
OZR
ETF
 YOZR
S&P/ASX 200 Resources
 
 
0.40
Apr-11
 
Recent


Vanguard Australian Property Securities Index ETF
VAP
ETF
 
S&P/ASX 300 A-REITs
 
 
0.25
Oct-10
 
Recent


Equity - Global


ETFS Morningstar Global Technology ETF
TECH
ETF
 
Morningstar Developed Markets Tecnology Moat Focus Index
 
 
0.45
Apr-17

Recent


BetaShares Global Sustainability Leaders ETF 
ETHI
ETF
 
NASDAQ Future Global Sustainability Leaders Index
 
 
0.59
Jan-17

Recent


iShares Edge MSCI World Minimum Volatility ETF
WVOL
ETF
 
MSCI World Minimum Volatility (AUD) Index
 
 
0.30
Oct-16

Recent


iShares Edge MSCI World Multifactor ETF
WDMF
ETF
 
MSCI World Diversified Multiple-Factor (AUD) Index
 
 
0.30
Oct-16

Recent


Schroders Real Return Fund (Managed Fund)
GROW
MF
 
RBA Inflation rate (Consumer Price Index) - trimmed mean + 5% pa.
 
 
0.90
Aug-16

Recent


AMP Capital Dynamic Markets Fund (Hedge Fund)
DMKT
MF
 
RBA Inflation rate (Consumer Price Index) - trimmed mean + 4.5% pa.
 
 
0.48
Aug-16

Recent


Magellan Infrastructure Fund (Currency Hedged) (Managed Fund)
MICH
MF
 
S&P Global Infrastructure Index A$ Hedged Net Total Return
 
 
0.95
Jul-16

Recent


ETFS EURO STOXX 50 ETF
ESTX
ETF
 
Euro Stoxx 50
 
 
0.35
Jul-16

Recent


ETFS S&P 500 High Yield Low Volatility ETF
ZYUS
ETF
 
S&P 500 Low Volatility High Dividend Index
 
 
0.35
Jun-15

Recent


BetaShares FTSE RAFI US 1000 ETF
QUS
ETF
 
FTSE RAFI US 1000
 
 
0.40
Dec-14
 
Recent


BetaShares Geared US Equity Fund - Currency Hedged (Hedge Fund)
GGUS
MF
 
S&P 500 Hedged AUD
Lev
 
0.74
Aug-15

Recent


BetaShares Managed Risk Global Share Fund (Managed Fund)
WRLD
MF
 
 
 
 
0.39
Dec-15

Recent


Betashares NASDAQ 100
NDQ
ETF
 
NASDAQ 100
 
 
0.38
May-15

Recent


Betashares S&P500 Yield Maximiser Fund (Managed Fund)
UMAX
MF
 
S&P 500
 
Opt
0.59
Sep-14
 
Recent


BetaShares WisdomTree Europe ETF - Currency Hedged
HEUR
ETF
 
WisdomTree Europe Hedged Equity Index
 
 
0.51
May-15

Recent


BetaShares WisdomTree Japan ETF - Currency Hedged
HJPN
ETF
 
WisdomTree Japan Hedged Equity Index
 
 
0.51
May-15

Recent


iShares Asia 50 ETF 
IAA
ETF
 
S&P Asia 50
 
 
0.50
Sep-08
 
Recent


iShares Core MSCI World All Cap AUD Hedged ETF
IHWL
ETF
 
MSCI World Investable Market Index (Net TR) 100% Heged to AUD
 
 
0.19
Apr-16

Recent


iShares Core MSCI World All Cap ETF
IWLD
ETF
 
MSCI World Investable Market Index (Net TR)
 
 
0.16
Apr-16

Recent


iShares MSCI BRIC ETF 
IBK
ETF
 
MSCI BRIC
 
 
0.69
Sept-08
 
Recent


iShares MSCI Taiwan ETF 
ITW
ETF
 
MSCI Taiwan
 
 
0.62
Nov-07
 
Recent


iShares MSCI South Korea Capped ETF
IKO
ETF
 
MSCI South Korea Capped Index Fund
 
 
0.62
Nov-07
 
Recent


iShares MSCI Hong Kong ETF 
IHK
ETF
 
MSCI Hong Kong
 
 
0.48
Nov-07
 
Recent


iShares MSCI Singapore ETF
ISG
ETF
 
MSCI Singapore
 
 
0.48
Nov-07
 
Recent


iShares Russell 2000 ETF 
IRU
ETF
 
Russell 2000
 
 
0.20
Nov-07
 
Recent


iShares China Large-Cap ETF
IZZ
ETF
 
FTSE China 25
 
 
0.74
Nov-07
 
Recent


iShares MSCI Japan ETF
IJP
ETF
 
MSCI Japan
 
 
0.48
Oct-07
 
Recent


iShares MSCI Emerging Markets ETF
IEM
ETF
 
MSCI Emerging Markets
 
 
0.68
Oct-07
 
Recent


iShares Global 100 ETF
IOO
ETF
 
S&P Global 100
 
 
0.40
Oct-07
 
Recent


iShares Global 100 AUD Hedged
IHOO
ETF
 
S&P Global 100 Hedged AUD
 
 
0.43
Dec-14

Recent


iShares S&P 500 
IVV
ETF
 
S&P 500
 
 

0.07

Oct-07
 

Recent



iShares S&P 500 AUD Hedged
IHVV
ETF
 
S&P 500 Hedged AUD
 
 
0.10
Dec-14
 
Recent


iShares S&P MidCap 400 
IJH
ETF
 
S&P Midcap 400
 
 
0.12
Oct-07
 
Recent


iShares S&P SmallCap 600 
IJR
ETF
 
S&P SmallCap 600
 
 
0.12
Oct-07
 
Recent


iShares MSCI EAFE ETF
IVE
ETF
 
MSCI EAFE
 
 
0.33
Oct-07
 
Recent


iShares Europe ETF
IEU
ETF
 
S&P Europe 350
 
 
0.60
Oct-07
 
Recent


K2 Global Equities Fund (Hedge Fund)
KII
MF
 
 
 
 
2.00
Jul-15

Recent


K2 Australian Small Cap Fund (Hedge Fund)
KSM
MF
 
 
 
 
2.05
Dec-15

Recent


Magellan Global Equities Fund (Managed Fund)
MGE
MF
 
MSCI World Net Total Return Index (AUD)
 
 
1.35
Mar-15
 
Recent


Magellan Global Equities Fund Currency Hedged (Managed Fund)
MHG
MF
 
MSCI World Net Total Return Index (hedged to AUD)
 
 
1.35
Aug-15

Recent


VanEck Vectors ChinaAMC CSI 300 ETF (Synthetic)
CETF
ETF
 
CSI 300 Index
 
 
0.72
Jun-15

Recent


VanEck Vectors Morningstar Wide Moat ETF
MOAT
ETF
 
Morningstar Wide Moat Focus Index
 
 
0.49
Jun-15

Recent


VanEck Vectors MSCI World Ex-Australia ETF
QUAL
ETF
 
MSCI World ex Australia Quality Index
 
 
0.40
Oct-14
 
Recent


SPDR MSCI World Quality Mix Fund
QMIX
ETF
 
MSIC World Quality Mix Index
 
 
0.40
Sep-15

Recent


SPDR S&P Emerging Markets Fund
WEMG
ETF
 
SPDR S&P Emerging Markets Large Mid Cap Index
 
 
0.65
Nov-13
 
Recent


SPDR S&P Global Dividend Fund
WDIV
ETF
 
SPDR S&P Global Dividend Aristocrats Fund
 
 
0.50
Nov-13
 
Recent


SPDR S&P World Ex Australia (Hedged) Fund 
WXHG
ETF
 
S&P Developed ex Australia LargeMidCap Hedged AUD Index
 
 
0.35
Jul-13
 
Recent


SPDR S&P World Ex Australia Fund 
WXOZ
ETF
 
S&P Developed ex Australia LargeMidCap AUD Index.
 
 
0.30
Mar-13
 
Recent


SPDR S&P 500 ETF Trust
SPY
ETF
 
S&P 500
 
 
0.09
Oct-14
 
Recent


UBS IQ MSCI Asia APREX 50 Ethical ETF
UBP
ETF
 
MSCI Asia APEX 50 ex Tobacco ex Controversial Weapons Index
 
 
0.45
May-15

Recent


UBS IQ MSCI World ex Australia Ethical ETF
UBW
ETF
 
MSCI World ex Australia ex Tobacco ex Controversial Weapons Index
 
 
0.35
Feb-15
 
Recent


UBS IQ MSCI Europe Ethical ETF
UBE
ETF
 
MSCI Europe ex Australia ex Tobacco ex Controversial Weapons Index
 
 
0.40
Feb-15
 
Recent


UBS IQ MSCI Japan Ethical ETF
UBJ
ETF
 
MSCI Japan ex Tobacco ex Controversial Weapons Index
 
 
0.40
Mar-15

Recent


UBS IQ MSCI USA Ethical ETF
UBU
ETF
 
MSCI USA ex Australia ex Tobacco ex Controversial Weapons Index
 
 
0.20
Feb-15
 
Recent


Vanguard All-World EX US Shares Index 
VEU
ETF
 
FTSE All World Ex-US
 
 
0.13
May-09
 
Recent


Vanguard FTSE Asia Ex-Japan Shares index 
VAE
ETF
 
FTSE Asia Ex-Japan, Australia and New Zealand (with net dividends invested)
 
 
0.40
Dec-15

Recent


Vanguard FTSE Emerging Markets Shares
VGE
ETF
 
FTSE Emerging Index (in AUD)
 
 
0.48
Nov-13
 
Recent


Vanguard FTSE Europe Shares ETF
VEQ
ETF
 
FTSE Developed Europe Index
 
 
0.35
Dec-15

Recent


Vanguard MSCI Index International Series
VGS
ETF
 
MSCI World ex-Australia
 
 
0.18
Nov-14
 
Recent


Vanguard MSCI Index International Series (Hedged)
VGAD
ETF
 
MSCI World ex-Australia (hedged AUD)
 
 
0.21
Nov-14
 
Recent


Vanguard US Total Market Shares Index 
VTS
ETF
 
CRSP US Broad Market Index
 
 
0.05
May-09
 
Recent


Equity - Global Sectors


BetaShares Global Cybersecurity ETF
HACK
ETF
 
NASDAQ CTA Cybersecurity Index
 
 
0.57
Sep-16

Recent


BetaShares Global Healthcare ETF - Currency Hedged
DRUG
ETF
 
NASDAQ Global ex-Australia Healthcare Companies Hedged AUD Index
 
 
0.47
Aug-16

Recent


BetaShares Global Agriculture Companies ETF - Currency Hedged
FOOD
ETF
 
NASDAQ Global ex-Australia Agriculture Companies Hedged AUD Index
 
 
0.47
Aug-16

Recent


BetaShares Global Banks ETF - Currency Hedged
BNKS
ETF
 
NASDAQ Global ex-Australia Banks Hedged AUD Index
 
 
0.47
Aug-16

Recent


BetaShares Global Gold Miners ETF - Currency Hedged
MNRS
ETF
 
NASDAQ Global ex-Australia Gold Miners Hedged AUD Index
 
 
0.47
Jul-16

Recent


AMP Global Infrastructure Securities Fund (Managed Fund)
GLIN
MF
 
 
 
 
0.95
Jun-16

Recent


AMP Capital Global Property Securities Fund (Managed Fund)
RENT
MF
 
 
 
 
0.9916
Jun-16

Recent


BetaShares Global Energy Companies ETF - Currency Hedged
FUEL
ETF
 
NASDAQ Global ex-Australia Energy Hedged AUD Index
 
 
0.47
Jun-16

Recent


iShares Global Consumer Staples ETF 
IXI
ETF
 
S&P Global Consumer Staples
 
 
0.47
Mar-09
 
Recent


iShares Global Healthcare ETF
IXJ
ETF
 
S&P Global Healthcare
 
 
0.47
Mar-09
 
Recent


iShares Global Telecom ETF
IXP
ETF
 
S&P Global Telecommunications
 
 
0.47
Mar-09
 
Recent


VanEck Vectors FTSE Global Infrastructure (Hedged) ETF
IFRA
ETF
 
FTSE Developed Core Infrastructure 50/50 hedged into AUD Index
 
 
0.52
May-16

Recent


VanEck Vectors Gold Miners ETF
GDX
ETF
 
NYSE Arca Gold Miners Index
 
 
0.53
Jun-15

Recent


SPDR Dow Jones Global Real Estate Fund
DJRE
ETF
 
SPDR Dow Jones Global Select Real Estate Securities Index
 
 
0.50
Nov-13
 
Recent


Equity - Australian Strategy


ETFS S&P/ASX 300 High Yield Plus ETF
ZYAU
ETF
 
S&P/ASX Shareholder Yield Index
 
 
0.35
Jun-15

Recent


Aurora Dividend Income Trust (Managed Fund) 
AOD
MF
 
S&P/ASX 200 Accumulation Index
Lev
Opt
1.30
Nov-05
 
Recent


BetaShares Australian Dividend Harvester Fund (Managed Fund)
HVST
MF
 
S&P/ASX 200 Accumulation Index
 
 
0.65
Nov-14
 
Recent


BetaShares Australian Equities Bear (Hedge Fund)
BEAR
MF
 
S&P/ASX 200
Inv
 
1.19
Jul-12
 
Recent


BetaShares Austrlian Equities Strong Bear (Hedge Fund)
BBOZ
MF
 
S&P/ASX 200
Inv / Lev
 
1.19
Apr-15

Recent


BetaShares Australian Top 20 Equity Yield Maximiser Fund
YMAX
MF
 
S&P/ASX 20
 
Opt
0.59
Nov-12
 
Recent


BetaShares Geared Australian Equity Fund (Hedge Fund)
GEAR
MF
YGEA
S&P/ASX 200
Lev
 
0.80
May-14
 
Recent


BetaShares Managed Risk Australian Share Fund (Managed Fund)
AUST
MF
 
S&P/ASX 200
 
 
0.39
Nov-15

Recent


iShares S&P/ASX Dividend Opportunities Fund ETF
IHD
ETF
 
S&P/ASX Dividend Opportunities Index
 
 
0.30
Dec-10
 
Recent


Russell Australian Responsbile Investment ETF
RARI
ETF
 
Russell Australia ESG High Dividend Index
 
 
0.45
Apr-15

Recent


Russell High Dividend Australian Shares ETF 
RDV
ETF
 YRDV
Russell High Dividend Index
 
 
0.34
May-10
 
Recent


Russell Australia Value ETF
RVL
ETF
 YRVL
Russell Australian Value Index
 
 
0.34
Mar-11
 
Recent


SPDR MSCI Australia Select High Dividend Yield Fund 
SYI
ETF
 YSYI
MSCI Australian Select High Dividend Yield Index
 
 
0.35
Sep-10
 
Recent


Switzer Dividend Growth Fund (Managed Fund)
SWTZ
MF
 
 
 
 
0.89
Feb-17

Recent


VanEck Vectors S&P/ASX Franked Dividend ETF
FDIV
ETF
YFDI
S&P/ASX Franked Dividend Index
 
 
0.35
May-16

Recent


Vanguard Australian Shares High Yield ETF 
VHY
ETF
 
FTSE ASFA Australian High Dividend Yield Index
 
 
0.25
May-11
 
Recent


UBS IQ Morningstar Australia Dividend Yield ETF
DIV
ETF
YDIV
Morningstar Australia Dividend Yield Focus Index
 
 
0.30
Jan-14
 
Recent


UBS IQ Morningstar Australian Quality ETF
ETF
ETF
 YETF
Morningstar Australia Moat Focus Index
 
 
0.30
Oct-12
 
Recent


Currency


BetaShares Strong Australian Dollar Fund (hedge fund)
AUDS
MF
 
 
Inv / Lev
 
1.38
Jan-17

Recent


BetaShares Strong U.S. Dollar Fund (hedge fund)
YANK
MF
 
 
Inv / Lev
 
1.38
Jan-17

Recent


ETFS Physical Renminbi ETF
ZCNH
ETF
 
Renminbi
 
 
0.30
Jun-15

Recent


ETFS Physical US Dollar ETF
ZUSD
ETF
 
US Dollar
 
 
0.30
Jun-15

Recent


BetaShares Euro ETF 
EEU
ETF
 
Euro
 
 
0.45
Jul-11
 
Recent


BetaShares British Pound ETF 
POU
ETF
 
British Pound
 
 
0.45
Jul-11
 
Recent


BetaShares U.S. Dollar ETF
USD
ETF
 
US Dollar
 
 
0.45
Feb-11
 
Recent


Fixed Income - Australian Dollar


VanEck Vectors Australian Floating Rate ETF
FLOT
ETF
 
Bloomberg AusBond Credit FRN 0+ Yr Index
 
 
0.22
Jul-17

Recent


BetaShares Australian Bank Senior Floating Rate Bond ETF 
QPON
ETF
 
Solactive Australian Bank Senior Floating Rate Bond Index
 
 
0.22
Jun-17

Recent


iShares Core Cash ETF
BILL
ETF
 
Australian Cash
 
 
0.07
Jun-17

Recent


iShares Enhanced Cash ETF
ISEC
ETF
 
Australian Cash
 
 
0.12
Jun-17

Recent


UBS IQ Cash ETF
MONY
ETF
 
Australian Cash
 
 
0.18
May-17

Recent


VanEck Vectors Australian Corporate Bond Plus ETF
PLUS
ETF
 
Markit iBoxx AUD Corporates Yield Plus Index
 
 
0.32
May-17

Recent


Australian High Interest Cash ETF 
AAA
ETF
 
Australian Cash
 
 
0.18
Mar-12
 
Recent


iShares Core Composite Bond ETF
IAF
ETF
 
Bloomberg AusBond Composite Index
 
 
0.20
Mar-12
 
Recent


iShares Government Inflation ETF
ILB
ETF
 
Bloomberg AusBond Inflation Government Index
 
 
0.26
Mar-12
 
Recent


iShares Treasury ETF
IGB
ETF
 
Bloomberg AusBond Treasury Index
 
 
0.26
Mar-12
 
Recent


Russell Australian Government Bond ETF 
RGB
ETF
 
Australian Government Bonds
 
 
0.24
Mar-12
 
Recent


Russell Australian Semi-Government Bond ETF 
RSM
ETF
 
Australian Semi-Government Bonds
 
 
0.26
Mar-12
 
Recent


Russell Australian Select Corporate Bond ETF  
RCB
ETF
 
Australian  Corporate Bonds
 
 
0.28
Mar-12
 
Recent


SPDR S&P/ASX Australian Bond Fund 
BOND
ETF
 
S&P/ASX Australian Fixed Income Index
 
 
0.24
Jul-12
 
Recent


SPDR S&P/ASX Australian Government Bond Fund 
GOVT
ETF
 
S&P /ASX Bond Index
 
 
0.22
Jul-12
 
Recent


Vanguard Australian Corporate Fixed Interest Index Fund
VACF
ETF
 
Bloomberg AusBond Credit 0+ Yr Index
 
 
0.26
May-16

Recent


Vanguard Australian Fixed Interest Index  
VAF
ETF
 
Bloomberg AusBond Composite Index
 
 
0.20
Oct-12
 
Recent


Vanguard Australian Government Bond Index ETF
VGB
ETF
 
Bloomberg AusBond Government Index
 
 
0.20
Apr-12
 
Recent


Fixed Income - Global


iShares Global High Yield Bond (AUD Hedged) ETF
IHHY
ETF
 
Markit iBoxx Global Developed markets Liquid High Yield Capped Index (AUD Hedged)
 
 
0.56
Dec-15

Recent


iShares Core Global Corporate Bond (AUD Hedged) ETF
IHCB
ETF
 
Barclays Global Aggregate Corporate Bond Index (AUD Hedged)
 
 
0.26
Dec-15

Recent


iShares J.P. Morgan USD Emerging Markets Bond (AUD Hedged) ETF
IHEB
ETF
 
J.P. Morgan EMBI Global Core Index (AUD Hedged)
 
 
0.51
Dec-15

Recent


Vanguard International Credit Securities Index (Hedged) ETF
VCF
ETF
 
Barclays Global Aggregate Governement related and Corporate Index hedged into Australian dollars
 
 
0.30
Dec-15

Recent


Vanguard International Fixed Interest Index (Hedged) ETF
VIF
ETF
 
Barclays Global Treasury Index hedged into Australian dollars
 
 
0.20
Dec-15

Recent


Commodity


ETFS Physical Singapore Gold ETF
ZGOL
ETF
 
Gold
 
 
0.40
Jun-15

Recent


BetaShares Agricultural ETF - Currency Hedged (Synthetic)
QAG
ETF
 
S&P/GSCI Agriculture Index
 
 
0.69
Dec-11
 
Recent


BetaShares Gold Bullion ETF - Currency Hedged 
QAU
ETF
 
Gold
 
 
0.49
May-11
 
Recent


BetaShares Commodities Basket ETF - Currency Hedged (Synthetic)
QCB
ETF
 
S&P/GSCI Light Energy Index
 
 
0.69
Dec-11
 
Recent


BetaShares Crude Oil Index ETF- Currency Hedged (Synthetic)
OOO
ETF
 
S&P/GSCI Crude Oil Index
 
 
0.69
Nov-11
 
Recent


ETFS Physical Precious Metal Basket 
ETPMPM
SP
 
Basket of precious metals
 
 
0.44
Jan-09
 
Recent


ETFS Physical Platinum 
ETPMPT
SP
 
Platinum
 
 
0.49
Jan-09
 
Recent


ETFS Physical Silver 
ETPMAG
SP
 
Silver
 
 
0.49
Jan-09
 
Recent


ETFS Physical Palladium 
ETPMPD
SP
 
Palladium
 
 
0.49
Jan-09
 
Recent


ETFS Physical Gold 
GOLD
Share*
 
Gold
 
 
0.40
Mar-03
 
Recent


Perth Mint Gold 
PMGOLD
SP
 
Gold
 
 
0.15
Dec-10
 
Recent



 
 



ETF - Exchange Traded Funds
MF - Managed Fund
SP - Structured Product
*Share - Redeemable preference share
#See the relevant Product Disclosure Statement for a full explanation of the Fees and Other Costs
Specific risks for fixed income, inverse, leveraged, single-asset and synthetic ETPs as well as Structured Products can be found here.



Exposure
ASX Code

Type


Undelrying Bond Issuer (Parent Entity)


Underlying


ASX Code of Underlying  Issuer or Parent Entity

MER%
Admission Date
Chart
Announcements


Australian Corporate Bonds


ACBC ANZ (MF)
YTMANZ
MF
ANZ Banking Group Ltd
3.25% 3 June 2020
ANZ
#
Oct-16

Recent


ACBC AGL (MF)
YTMAPL
MF
AGL Energy Limited
5.00% 5 November 2021

AGL

#
May-16

Recent


ACBC APA (MF)
YTMAPA
MF
APA Pipelines (APA Group)
7.75% 22 July 2020
APA
#
Nov-15

Recent


ACBC Alumina (MF)
YTMAWC
MF
Alumina Limited
5.50% 19 November 2019
AWC
#
May-16

Recent


ACBC Ausnet (MF)
YTMAST
MF
Ausnet Services Holdings Pty Limited (Ausnet Services Limited)
5.75% 28 June 2022
AST
#
May-16

Recent


ACBC Aurizon Network (MF)
YTMAZJ
MF
Aurizon Network Pty Ltd (Aurizon Holdings Ltd)
5.75% 28 October 2020
AZJ
#
May-15

Recent


ACBC BHP Biliton Finance (MF)
YTMBHP
MF
BHP Billiton Finance Ltd (BHP Billiton Ltd)
3.75% 18 October 2017
BHP
#
May-15

Recent


ACBC BHP Biliton Finance (MF)
YTMBH1
MF
BHP Billiton Finance Ltd (BHP Billiton Ltd)
3.00% 30 March 2020
BHP
#
May-16

Recent


ACBC BOQ (MF)
YTMBOQ
MF
Bank of Queensland Limited
4.00% 12 June 2018
BOQ
#
Nov-15

Recent


ACBC Caltex (MF)
YTMCTX
MF
Caltex Australia Limited
7.25% 23 Nov 2018
CTX
#
Nov-15

Recent


ACBC Coca Cola Amatil (MF)
YTMCCA
MF
Coca Cola Amatil Limited
4.25% 13 November 2019
CCA
#
Nov-15

Recent


ACBC Crown Group Finance (MF)
YTMCWN
MF
Crown Group Finance Ltd (Crown Resorts Ltd)
5.75% 18 July 2017
CWN
#
May-15

Recent


ACBC Downer (MF)
YTMDOW
MF
Downer Group Finance Pty Limited (Downer EDI Limited)
5.75% 29 November 2018
DOW
#
May-16

Recent


ACBC Downer (MF)
YTMDO1
MF
Downer Group Finance Pty Limited (Downer EDI Limited)
4.50% 11 March 2022
DOW
#
May-16

Recent


ACBC Dexus Finance (MF)
YTMDXS
MF
Dexus Finance Pty Ltd (Dexus Property Group)
5.75% 10 September 2018
DXS
#
May-15

Recent


ACBC Dexus Finance (MF)
YTMDX1
MF
Dexus Finance Pty Ltd (Dexus Property Group)
4.75% 5 November 2025
DXS
#
Jun-17

Recent


ACBC GPT RE (MF)
YTMGPT
MF
GPT RE Ltd as RE for the General Property Trust (General Property Trust)
6.75% 24 January 2019
GPT
#
May-15

Recent


ACBC Incitec Pivot (MF)
YTMIPL
MF
Incitec Pivot Ltd
5.75% 21 February 2019
IPL

#

May-15

Recent


ACBC Lend Lease Finance (MF)
YTMLLC
MF
Lend Lease Finance Limited (Lend Lease Corporation Limited)
5.50% 13 November 2018
LLC
#
May-15

Recent


ACBC Lend Lease Finance (MF)
YTMLL1
MF
Lend Lease Finance Limited (Lend Lease Corporation Limited)
6.00% 13 May 2020
LLC
#
May-15

Recent


ACBC Mirvac Group Finance (MF)
YTMMGR
MF
Mirvac Group Finance Limited (Mirvac Group)
5.75% 18 September 2020
MGR
#
May-15

Recent


ACBC Mirvac Group Finance 1 (MF)
YTMMG1
MF
Mirvac Group Finance Limited (Mirvac Group)
5.50% 18 December 2017
MGR
#
Nov-15

Recent


ACBC Macquarie Group (MF)
YTMMQG
MF
Macquarie Group Limited
3.25% 3 March 2020
MQG
#
Oct-16

Recent


ACBC NAB (MF) 
YTMNA1
MF
National Australia Bank Limited
4.00% 16 December 2021
NAB
#
Oct-16

Recent


ACBC NAB (MF)
YTMNAB
MF
National Australia Bank Limited
4.25% 20 May 2019
NAB
#
Nov-15

Recent


ACBC Novion (MF)
YTMNVN
MF
Novion RE Ltd (as RE for the Novion Trust formerly Commonwealth Managed Investments Ltd as RE for the CFS Retail Property Trust 1)
5.00% 19 December 2019
NVN
#
May-15

Recent


ACBC Qantas 1 (MF)
YTMQF1
MF
Qantas Airlines Limited
6.50% 27 April 2020
QAN
#
Nov-15

Recent


ACBC Qantas 2 (MF) 
YTMQF2
MF
Qantas Airlines Limited
7.50% 11 June 2021
QAN
#
Nov-15

Recent


ACBC Qantas 3 (MF)
YTMQF3
MF
Qantas Airlines Limited
7.75% 19 May 2022
QAN
#
Nov-15

Recent


ACBC Scentre Group (MF)
YTMSCG
MF
RE1 Ltd as Trustee and RE of Westfield Retail Trust 1 (Scentre Group)
5.00% 23 October 2019
SCG
#
May-15

Recent


ACBC Stockland Trust (MF)
YTMSGP
MF
Stockland Trust Management Ltd as RE for the Stockland Trust (Stockland)
5.50% 6 September 2019
SGP
#
May-15

Recent


ACBC Stockland Trust 1 (MF)
YTMSG1
MF
Stockland Trust Management Ltd as RE for the Stockland Trust (Stockland)
8.25% 25 November 2020
SGP
#
May-15

Recent


ACBC Sydney Airport (MF)
YTMSYD
MF
Sydney Airport Finance Company Pty Ltd (Sydney Airport)
7.75% 6 July 2018
SYD
#
Nov-15

Recent


ACBC Transurban (MF)
YTMTCL
MF
Transurban Queensland Finance Pty Limited (Transurban Group)
4.75% 8 December 2021
TCL
#
Jun-17

Recent


ACBC Telstra Corporation (MF)
YTMTLS
MF
Telstra Corporation Limited
7.75% 15 July 2020
TLS
#
May-15

Recent


ACBC Telstra Corporation (MF)
YTMTL1
MF
Telstra Corporation Limited
4% 16 September  2022
TLS
#
Jun-17

Recent


ACBC Westpac (MF)
YTMWB1
MF
Westpac Banking Corporation
3.50% 28 July 2020
WBC
#
Oct-16

Recent


ACBC Westpac (MF)
YTMWBC
MF
Westpac Banking Corporation
3.25% 22 January 2020
WBC
#
Oct-16

Recent


ACBC Wesfarmers (MF)
YTMWES
MF
Wesfarmers Limited
6.25% 28 March 2019
WES
#
May-15

Recent


ACBC Wesfarmers 1 (MF)
YTMWE1
MF
Wesfarmers Limited
4.75% 12 March 2020
WES
#
May-15

Recent


ACBC Woolworths (MF)
YTMWOW
MF
Woolworths Limited
6.00% 21 March 2019
WOW
#
May-15

Recent


ACBC  AMP (MF)
YTMF01
MF
AMP Bank Limited (AMP Limited)
6 June 2018 FRN (3 Month BBSW +0.87%)
AMP
#
Nov-15

Recent


ACBC BOQ (MF)
YTMF02
MF
Bank of Queensland Limited
7 November 2016 FRN (3 Month BBSW +1.15%)
BOQ
#
Nov-15

Recent


ACBC BOQ 1(MF)
YTMF03
MF
Bank of Queensland Limited
12 June 2018 FRN (3 Month BBSW +1.00%)
BOQ
#
Nov-15

Recent


ACBC NAB (MF)
YTMF04
MF
National Australia Bank Limited
8 November 2018 FRN (3 Month BBSW +0.88%)
NAB
#
Nov-15

Recent


ACBC NAB 1 (MF)
YTMF05
MF
National Australia Bank Limited
20 May 2019 FRN (3 Month BBSW +0.85%)
NAB
#
Nov-15

Recent


ACBC SUN (MF)
YTMF06
MF
Suncorp Metway Limited (Suncorp Group Limited)
23 April 2019 FRN (3 Month BBSW +1.10%)
SUN
#
Nov-15

Recent


ACBC ANZ (MF)
YTMF07
MF
ANZ Banking Group Ltd
17 April 2020 FRN (3 Month BBSW + 0.82%)
ANZ
#
Oct-16

Recent


ACBC BOQ (MF)
YTMF08
MF
Bank of Queensland Limited
6 November 2019 FRN (3 Month BBSW + 1.07%)
BOQ
#
Oct-16

Recent


ACBC Macquarie Group (MF)
YTMF09
MF
Macquarie Group Limited
3 March 2020 FRN (3 Month BBSW + 1.10%)
MQG
#
Oct-16

Recent


ACBC NAB (MF)
YTMF10
MF
National Australia Bank Limited
3 June 2020 FRN (3 Month BBSW + 0.80%)
NAB
#
Oct-16

Recent


ACBC Westpac (MF)
YTMF11
MF
Westpac Banking Corporation
28 July 2020 FRN (3 Month BBSW + 0.90%)
WBC
#
Oct-16

Recent



 
 







Name
ASX Code
Type
Exposure
Listing Date
Chart
Announcements


APA Group 
APA
Stapled
Gas Utilities
Jun-00
 
Recent


AusNet Services
AST
Shares
Electric Utilities
Dec-05
 
Recent


DUET Group 
DUE
Stapled
Multi-Utilities
Aug-04
 
Recent


Ethane Pipeline Income Fund
EPX
Stapled
Gas Utilities
Sep-06
 
Recent


Infigen Energy 
IFN
Stapled
Independent Power Producers & Energy Trader
Oct-05
 
Recent


Macquarie Atlas Roads
MQA
Stapled
Highways & Railtracks
Jan-10
 
Recent


Spark Infrastructure Group
SKI
Stapled
Electric Utilities
Mar-07
 
Recent


Sydney Airports  
SYD
Stapled
Airport Services
Aug-02
 
Recent


Transurban Group
TCL
Stapled
Highways & Railtracks
Mar-96
 
Recent











Exposure
ASX Code
Type
Benchmark
MER%
Outperf' Fee
Listing Date
Chart
Announcements


Australian Shares


8IP Emerging Companies Limited
8EC
Shares
RBA cash rate + 2% pa.
-
-
Dec-15

Recent


Absolute Equity Performance Fund Limited
AEG
Units
-
-
-
Dec-15

Recent


Acorn Captial Investment Fund Limited
ACQ
Shares
-
-
-
May-04
 
Recent


Aberdeen Leaders 
ALR
Shares
 XJOAI
2.4
No
Sep-87
 
Recent


AFIC 
AFI
Shares
XJOAI
0.18
No
Jan-36
 
Recent


AMCIL 
AMH
Shares
XJOAI
0.77
No
Feb-00
 
Recent


Australian Leaders Fund Limited
ALF
Shares
All Ordinaries Accumulation Index
1.00
Yes
Feb-04

Recent


Antipodes Global Investment Company Ltd
APL
Shares
MSCI All Country World World Net Index (AUD)
1.10
Yes
Oct-16

Recent


Australian Enhanced Income Fund
AYF
Units
 
0.85
No
Oct-06

Recent


Australian Governance Masters Index Funds Limited 
AQF
Shares
XJOAI
0.49
No
Mar-10
 
Recent


Argo Investments 
ARG
Shares
XJOAI
0.18
No
Jan-47
 
Recent


Aurora Absolute Return Fund
ABW
Units
RBA cash rate
-
-
Jul-06

Recent


Aurora Property Buy-Write Income Trust
AUP
Units
UBS Aus Bank Bill
2.00
Yes
Jul-07
 
Recent


Australian United Investment 
AUI
Shares
XKOAI
0.13
No
Jan-74
 
Recent


Arowana Australasian Value Opportunities Fund
AWQ
Shares
XJOAI
1.00
Yes
Jan-15
 
Recent


Bentley International 
BEL
Shares
XAOAI
-
Yes
Oct-86
 
Recent


BKI Investment Company Limited 
BKI
Shares
XKOAI
0.19
No
Dec-03
 
Recent


Barrack St Investments Limited
BST
Shares
 
1.30
Yes
Aug-14
 
Recent


Bailador Technology Investments limited
BTI
Shares
 
1.75
Yes
Nov-14
 
Recent


Bisan Limited
BSN
Shares
 
 
 
Jan-87
 
 


CBG Capital Limited
CBC
Shares
XJOAI
1.00
Yes
Dec-14

Recent


Cadence Capital 
CDM
Shares
XKOAI
1.00
Yes
Dec-06
 
Recent


Carlton Investments
CIN
Shares
XJOAI
0.10
No
Jun-70
 
Recent


Century Australia 
CYA
Shares
XKOAI
1.08
No
Apr-04
 
Recent


Clime Capital Limied 
CAM
Shares
XAOAI
-
-
Feb-04
 
Recent


Contango Income Generator Limited
CIE
Shares
 
0.95
No
Aug-15

Recent


Contango MicroCap 
CTN
Shares
XAOAI
1.25
Yes
Mar-04
 
Recent


Diversified United Investment 
DUI
Shares
XKOAI
0.17
No
Dec-91
 
Recent


Djerriwarrh Investments 
DJW
Shares
XFLAI
0.39
No
Jun-95
 
Recent


Duxton Water Limited
D2O
Shares
 
0.85
Yes
Sep-16

Recent


Future Generation Investment Fund Limited
FGX
Shares
 
1.00
No
Sep-14
 
Recent


Forager Australian Shares Fund
FOR
Units
S&P/ASX All Ordinaries Accumulation Index
1.00
Yes
Dec-16

Recent


Fat Prophets Global Contrarian Fund Limited 
FPC
Shares
 
1.25
Yes
Mar-17

Recent


Flagship Investments Limited
FSI
Shares
UBS Aus Bank Bill
-
Yes
Dec-00
 
Recent


Glennon Small Companies Limited
GC1
Shares
XSOAI
1.00
Yes
Aug-15

Recent


Hastings High Yield Fund
HHY
Units
 
0.93
Yes
Apr-05

Recent


Henry Morgan Limited
HML
Shares
 
2.00
Yes
Feb-16

Recent


Ironbark Capital Limited 
IBC
Shares
XKOAI
0.65
Yes
Apr-87
 
Recent


Katana Capital Limited
KAT
Shares
ASX All Ordinaries
0.10
Yes
Dec-05

Recent


Millinium's Alternatives Fund
MAX
Units
 
0.205
Yes
Dec-06

Recent


Mercantile Investment Company Limited
MVT
Shares
-
-
-
Apr-07
 
Recent


Milton Corporation 
MLT
Shares
XOAI
0.14
No
Apr-62
 
Recent


Mirrabooka Investments 
MIR
Shares
XMDAI
0.70
No
Jun-01
 
Recent


Monash Absolute Investment Company Limited
MA1
Shares
 
1.50
Yes
Apr-16

Recent


Naos Absolute Opportunities Company Limited
NAC
Shares
 
1.75
Yes
Nov-14
 
Recent


NAOS Emerging Opportunities Company Limited
NCC
Shares
XSOAI
1.25
Yes
Feb-13
 
Recent


New Guinea Energy Ltd
NGE
Shares
 
 
 
Nov-16

Recent


Orion Equities Limited 
OEQ
Shares
-
-
-
Nov-70
 
Recent


Ozgrowth Limited 
OZG
Shares
7% return
1.00
Yes
Jan-08
 
Recent


Plato Income Maximiser Limited
PL8
Shares
S&P/ASX 200 Franking Credit Adjusted Daily Total Return Index (Tax Exempt)
0.80
No
May-17

Recent


Perpetual Investment Company
PIC
Shares
XKOAI
1.00
No
Dec-14
 
Recent


QV Equities Limited
QVE
Shares
 
0.90
No
Aug-14

Recent


Ryder Capital Limited
RYD
Shares
RBA cash rate+4.25% pa.
1.25
Yes
Sep-15

Recent


Sandon Capital Investments Limited
SNC
Shares
-
1.25
Yes
Dec-13
 
Recent


WAM Active Limited
WAA
Shares
-
0.083
No
Jan-08

Recent


WAM Capital 
WAM
Shares
S&P/ASX All Ordinaries Accumulation Index
1.00
Yes
Aug-99
 
Recent


WAM Leaders Limited
WLE
Shares
S&P/ASX 200 Accumulation Index
1.00
Yes
May-16

Recent


WAM Microcap Limited
WMI
Shares
S&P/ASX All Ordinaries Accumulation Index
1.00
Yes
Jun-17

Recent


WAM Research Limited
WAX
Shares
S&P/ASX All Ordinaries Accumulation Index
1.00
Yes
Aug-03
 
Recent


Wealth Defender Equities Limited
WDE
Shares
 S&P/ASX 300 accumulation index
0.98
Yes
May-15

Recent


Westoz Investment Company Limited 
WIC
Shares
10% return
1.28
Yes
Sep-09
 
Recent


Whitefield 
WHF
Shares
S&P/ASX 200 Accumulation Index
0.35
No
Aug-71
 
Recent


Watermark Market Neutral Fund Limited
WMK
Shares
-
1.00
 Yes
Jul-13
 
Recent


International Shares


8I Holdings Ltd
8IH
CDIs
 
-
-
Dec-14

Recent


Aurora Global Income Trust 
AIB
Units
UBS Aus Bank Bill
1.33
No
Dec-07
 
Recent


Alternative Investment Trust
AIQ
Units
-
1.1
Yes
May-05

Recent


Asian MastersFund Limited 
AUF
Shares
-
1.00
Yes
Dec-07
 
Recent


Benjamin Hornigold Limited
BHD
Shares
 
3.00
Yes
May-17

Recent


Contango Global Growth Limited
CQG
Shares
MSCI All Country World Index ex-Australia with gross dividends reinvested reported in Australian dollars and unhedged)
0.75
Yes
Jun-17

Recent


Ellerston Asian Investments Limited
EAI
Shares
MSCI AC Asia Ex Japan
0.95
Yes
Sep-15

Recent


Ellerston Global Investments Limited
EGI
Shares
 
0.75
Yes
Oct-14
 
Recent


Emerging Markets Masters Fund 
EMF
Units
-
1.08
No
Oct-12
 
Recent


Future Generation Global Investment Company Limited
FGG
Shares
 
1.00
No
Sep-15

Recent


Global Masters Fund
GFL
Shares
-
0.85
No
May-06
 
Recent


Global Value Fund Limited
GVF
Shares
-
1.50
Yes
Aug-14
 
Recent


Hunter Hall Global Value 
HHV
Shares
MSCI World
1.77
Yes
Mar-04
 
Recent


Morphic Ethical Equities Fund Limited
MEC
Shares
MSCI All Countries Total Return Daily INdex
1.25
Yes
May-17

Recent


Magellan Flagship Fund 
MFF
Shares
MSCI World
1.25
Yes
Dec-06
 
Recent


PM Capital Asian Opportunities Fund Limited
PAF
Shares
-
1.00
Yes
May-14
 
Recent


PM Capital Global Opportunities Fund Limited
PGF
Shares
MSCI World
1.00
-
Dec-13
 
Recent


Platinum Asia Investments Limited
PAI
Shares
MSCI All country Asia ex Japan Net (AUD)
1.10
Yes
Sep-15

Recent


Platinum Capital Limited 
PMC
Shares
MSCI World
1.50
 Yes
Jun-94
 
Recent


Sunvest Corporation Limited
SVS
Shares
-
-
-
Aug-87
 
Recent


Thorney Technologies Ltd
TEK
Shares
 
0.75
Yes
Jan-17

Recent


Templeton Global Growth 
TGG
Shares
MSCI World
1.00
No
May-87
 
Recent


URB Investments Limited
URB
Shares
 
1.20
No
Apr-17

Recent


US Select Private Opportunities Fund
USF
Units
-
0.33
No
Aug-12
 
Recent


US Select Private Opportunities Fund 2
USG
Units
-
-
-
Apr-13
 
Recent


US Select Private Opportunities Fund 3
USP
Units
-
-
-
Jul-16
 
Recent


Watermark Global Leaders Fund Limited
WGF
Shares
RBA cash rate
1.20
Yes
Dec-16

Recent


Zeta Resources Limited
ZER
Shares
S&P.ASX 300 Metals & Mining Index
0.50
Yes
Jun-13

Recent


Infrastructure


Argo Global Listed Infrastructure Limited
ALI
Shares
FTSE Global Core Infrastructure 50/50 Index (net total return AUD) & BofA Merrill Lynch Fixed Rate Preferred Securities Index (AUD)
1.20
No
Jul-15

Recent


Private Equity


IPE Limited
IPE
Shares
XKOAI
1.50
Yes
Nov-04
 
Recent


Specialist Shares


Australian Masters Yield Fund No 1 Limited
AYD
Shares
-
0.59
Yes
Nov-12
 
Recent


Australian Masters Yield Fund No 2 Limited
AYH
Shares
-
0.59
Yes
Nov-12
 
Recent


Australian Masters Yield Fund No 3 Limited
AYJ
Shares
-
0.59
Yes
Oct-13
 
Recent


Australian Masters Yield Fund No 4 Limited
AYK
Shares
-
0.59
Yes
Oct-13
 
Recent


Australian Masters Yield Fund No 5 Limited
AYZ
Shares
-
0.65
No
Aug-15

Recent


Blue Sky Alternatives Access Fund Limited
BAF
Shares
-
1.20
Yes
Jun-14
 
Recent


Lion Selection Group Limited
LSX
Shares
-
1.50
Yes
Mar-13
 
Recent


Thorney Opportunities Limited
TOP
Shares
-
-
-
Mar-00
 
Recent










Name
ASX Code
Type
Listing Date
Chart
Announcements


Austock Group Limited
ACK
Shares
Dec-07
 
Recent


Acrux
ACR
Shares
Sept-04
 
Recent


Authorised Investment Fund
AIY
Shares
Mar-04
 
Recent


Biotech Capital
BTC
Shares
Aug-00
 
Recent


MEC Resources Limited
MMR
Shares
May-06
 
Recent


Strategic Elements Limited
SOR
Shares
Aug-11
 
Recent










Sponsored links













































